 
 
UNITED ST ATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☑ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13  OR 15(d)  OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended  December 31, 2020
or
 
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d)  OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ______________ to ______________         
 
Commission File Number: 001-13545  (Prologis, Inc.) 001-14245  (Prologis, L.P .)
 
 
Prologis, Inc.
Prologis, L.P .
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
Maryland  (Prologis, Inc.)
Delaware  (Prologis, L.P .)94-3281941  (Prologis, Inc.)
94-3285362  (Prologis, L.P .)
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
  
Pier 1, Bay 1 , San Francisco , California 94111
(Address or principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
 
(415) 394-9000
(Registrant’ s telephone number , including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
 
  Title of Each Class  Trading Symbol(s)  Name of Each Exchange on Which Registered
Prologis, Inc.  Common Stock, $0.01 par value  PLD  New Y ork Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  3.375% Notes due 2024  PLD/24  New Y ork Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  3.000% Notes due 2026  PLD/26  New Y ork Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  2.250% Notes due 2029  PLD/29  New Y ork Stock Exchange
       
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
Prologis, Inc. – NONE
Prologis, L.P . – NONE
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.
Prologis, Inc.:  Yes ☑  No ☐ Prologis, L.P .:  Yes ☑  No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.
Prologis, Inc.:  Yes ☐ No ☑ Prologis, L.P .:  Yes ☐ No ☑
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant: (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the
preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past
90 days. Prologis, Inc.: Yes ☑  No ☐  Prologis, L.P.:  Yes ☑  No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T
during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter periods that the registrant was required to submit such files). Prologis, Inc.: Yes ☑  No ☐ Prologis, L.P.:  Yes ☑  No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth
company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange
Act (check one):
 
Prologis, Inc.: ☑ Large accelerated filer ☐ Accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company
 ☐ Non-accelerated filer  ☐ Emerging growth company
 
Prologis, L.P.: ☐ Large accelerated filer ☐ Accelerated filer ☐   Smaller reporting company
 ☑ Non-accelerated filer  ☐   Emerging growth company
 
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised
financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.  ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over financial
reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report.  ☑
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934).
Prologis, Inc.:  Yes ☐  No ☑ Prologis, L.P.:  Yes ☐  No ☑
 
Based on the closing price of Prologis, Inc.’s common stock on June 30, 2020, the aggregate market value of the voting common equity held by nonaffiliates of Prologis,
Inc. was $68,586,769,164.
 
The number of shares of Prologis, Inc.’s common stock outstanding at February 5, 2021, was approximately 739,500,000.
 
 
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
 
Portions of Part III of this report are incorporated by reference to the registrant’s definitive proxy statement for the 2021 annual meeting of its stockholders or will be
provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
 
 
 
EXPLANATORY NOTE
 
This report combines the annual reports on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020, of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .
Unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to “Prologis, Inc.” or the “Parent” mean Prologis, Inc. and its
consolidated subsidiaries; and references to “Prologis, L.P .” or the “Operating Partnership” or the “OP” mean Prologis, L.P ., and its
consolidated subsidiaries. The terms “the Company ,” “Prologis,” “we,” “our” or “us” means the Parent and the OP collectively .
 
The Parent is a real estate investment trust (a “REIT”) and the general partner of the OP . At December 31, 2020, the Parent owned
97.35% common general partnership interest in the OP and 100% of the preferred units in the OP . The remaining 2.65% common
limited partnership interests are owned by unaf filiated investors and certain current and former directors and of ficers of the Parent.
 
We operate the Parent and the OP as one enterprise. The management of the Parent consists of the same members as the
management of the OP . These members are of ficers of the Parent and employees of the OP or one of its subsidiaries. As sole general
partner , the Parent has control of the OP through complete responsibility and discretion in the day-to-day management and therefore,
consolidates the OP for financial reporting purposes. Because the only significant asset of the Parent is its investment in the OP , the
assets and liabilities of the Parent and the OP are the same on their respective financial statements.
 
We believe combining the annual reports on Form 10-K of the Parent and the OP into this single report results in the following
benefits:
 
• enhances investors’ understanding of the Parent and the OP by enabling investors to view the business as a whole in the same
manner as management views and operates the business;
 
• eliminates duplicative disclosure and provides a more streamlined and readable presentation as a substantial portion of the
Company’ s disclosure applies to both the Parent and the OP; and
 
• creates time and cost ef ficiencies through the preparation of one combined report instead of two separate reports.
 
It is important to understand the few dif ferences between the Parent and the OP in the context of how we operate the Company . The
Parent does not conduct business itself, other than acting as the sole general partner of the OP and issuing public equity from time to
time. The OP holds substantially all the assets of the business, directly or indirectly . The OP conducts the operations of the business
and is structured as a partnership with no publicly traded equity . Except for net proceeds from equity issuances by the Parent, which
are contributed to the OP in exchange for partnership units, the OP generates capital required by the business through the OP’ s
operations, incurrence of indebtedness and issuance of partnership units to third parties.
 
The presentation of noncontrolling interests, stockholders’ equity and partners’ capital are the main areas of dif ference between the
consolidated financial statements of the Parent and those of the OP . The dif ferences in the presentations between stockholders’ equity
and partners’ capital result from the dif ferences in the equity and capital issuances in the Parent and in the OP .
                
The preferred stock, common stock, additional paid-in capital, accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and distributions in
excess of net earnings of the Parent are presented as stockholders’ equity in the Parent’ s consolidated financial statements. These
items represent the common and preferred general partnership interests held by the Parent in the OP and are presented as general
partner ’s capital within partners’ capital in the OP’ s consolidated financial statements. The common limited partnership interests held
by the limited partners in the OP are presented as noncontrolling interest within equity in the Parent’ s consolidated financial
statements and as limited partners’ capital within partners’ capital in the OP’ s consolidated financial statements.
 
To highlight the dif ferences between the Parent and the OP , separate sections in this report, as applicable, individually discuss the
Parent and the OP , including separate financial statements and separate Exhibit 31 and 32 certifications. In the sections that combine
disclosure of the Parent and the OP , this report refers to actions or holdings as being actions or holdings of Prologis.
 
 
 
 
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
Item  Description  Page
  PART I   
1.  Business  3
  The Company  3
  Operating Segments  5
  Future Growth  6
  Code of Ethics and Business Conduct  9
  Environmental Stewardship, Social Responsibility and Governance  9
  Environmental Matters  10
  Governmental Matters  10
  Insurance Coverage  10
1A.  Risk Factors  10
1B.  Unresolved Staf f Comments  19
2.  Properties  19
  Geographic Distribution  19
  Lease Expirations  22
  Co-Investment V entures  23
3.  Legal Proceedings  23
4.  Mine Safety Disclosures  23
  PART II   
5.  Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities  23
  Market Information and Holders  23
  Preferred Stock Dividends  24
  Sale of Unregistered Securities  24
  Purchases of Equity Securities  25
  Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans  25
  Other Stockholder Matters  25
6.  Selected Financial Data  25
7.  Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  25
  Management’ s Overview  26
  Results of Operations  27
  Environmental Matters  36
  Liquidity and Capital Resources  36
  Critical Accounting Policies  40
  New Accounting Pronouncements  41
  Funds from Operations Attributable to Common Stockholders/Unitholders  41
7A.  Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk  43
8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data  44
9.  Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure  44
9A.  Controls and Procedures  44
9B.  Other Information  46
  PART III   
10.  Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance  46
11.  Executive Compensation  46
12.  Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters  46
13.  Certain Relationships and Related T ransactions, and Director Independence  46
14.  Principal Accounting Fees and Services  46
  PART IV   
15.  Exhibits, Financial Statements and Schedules  46
16.  Form 10-K Summary  47
 
2
The statements in this report that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the
Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. These forward-looking
statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about the industry and markets in which we operate as well as
management’s beliefs and assumptions. Such statements involve uncertainties that could significantly impact our financial results. Words
such as “expects,” “anticipates,” “intends,” “plans,” “believes,” “seeks,” and “estimates” including variations of such words and similar
expressions are intended to identify such forward-looking statements, which generally are not historical in nature. All statements that
address operating performance, events or developments that we expect or anticipate will occur in the future — including statements
relating to rent and occupancy growth, acquisition and development activity, contribution and disposition activity, general conditions in the
geographic areas where we operate, our debt, capital structure and financial position, our ability to form new co-investment ventures and
the availability of capital in existing or new co-investment ventures — are forward-looking statements. These statements are not
guarantees of future performance and involve certain risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Although we believe
the expectations reflected in any forward-looking statements are based on reasonable assumptions, we can give no assurance that our
expectations will be attained, and therefore actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in
such forward-looking statements. Some of the factors that may affect outcomes and results include, but are not limited to: (i) national,
international, regional and local economic and political climates; (ii) changes in global financial markets, interest rates and foreign
currency exchange rates; (iii) increased or unanticipated competition for our properties; (iv) risks associated with acquisitions, dispositions
and development of properties; (v) maintenance of Real Estate Investment Trust (“REIT”) status, tax structuring and changes in income
tax laws and rates; (vi) availability of financing and capital, the levels of debt that we maintain and our credit ratings; (vii) risks related to
our investments in our co-investment ventures, including our ability to establish new co-investment ventures; (viii) risks of doing business
internationally, including currency risks; (ix) environmental uncertainties, including risks of natural disasters; (x) risks related to the
coronavirus (“COVID-19”) pandemic; and (xi) those additional factors discussed under Item 1A. Risk Factors in this report. We undertake
no duty to update any forward-looking statements appearing in this report except as may be required by law.
 
PART I
 
ITEM 1. Business
 
Prologis, Inc. is a self-administered and self-managed REIT and is the sole general partner of Prologis, L.P . through which it holds
substantially all of its assets. W e operate Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P . as one enterprise and, therefore, our discussion and
analysis refers to Prologis, Inc. and its consolidated subsidiaries, including Prologis, L.P . We invest in real estate through wholly
owned subsidiaries and other entities through which we co-invest with partners and investors. W e have a significant ownership
interest in the co-investment ventures, which may be consolidated or unconsolidated based on our level of control of the entity .
 
Prologis, Inc. began operating as a fully integrated real estate company in 1997 and elected to be taxed as a REIT under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (“Internal Revenue Code” or “IRC”). W e believe the current organization and method of
operation will enable Prologis, Inc. to maintain its status as a REIT . Prologis, L.P . was also formed in 1997.
 
We operate and manage our business on an owned and managed (“O&M”) basis and therefore evaluate the operating performance of
the properties in our O&M portfolio, which includes our consolidated properties and properties owned by our unconsolidated co-
investment ventures, which we manage. W e make operating decisions based on our total O&M portfolio, as we manage the properties
similarly regardless of ownership. W e evaluate our results based on our proportionate economic ownership of each property included
in the O&M portfolio (“our share”) to reflect our share of the financial results of the O&M portfolio.
 
Included in our discussion below are references to funds from operations (“FFO”) and net operating income (“NOI”), neither of which
are U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”). See Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations for a reconciliation of Net Earnings Attributable to Common Stockholders  in the Consolidated
Statements of Income to our FFO measures and a reconciliation of NOI to Operating Income, the most directly comparable GAAP
measures.
 
Our corporate headquarters is located at Pier 1, Bay 1, San Francisco, California 94111, and our other principal of fice locations are in
Amsterdam, Denver , Luxembourg, Mexico City , Shanghai, Singapore and T okyo.
 
Our Internet address is www .prologis.com. All reports required to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”) are
available and can be accessed free of charge through the Investor Relations section of our website. The common stock of Prologis,
Inc. is listed on the New Y ork Stock Exchange (“NYSE”) under the ticker “PLD” and is a component of the Standard & Poor ’s (“S&P”)
500.
 
THE COMPANY
 
We are the global leader in logistics real estate with a focus on high-barrier , high growth markets. W e own, manage and develop well-
located, high-quality logistics facilities in 19 countries across four continents. Our local teams actively manage our portfolio, which
encompasses leasing, property management, capital deployment and opportunistic dispositions. Our disposition activities allow us to
recycle capital and largely self-fund our development and acquisition activities. The majority of our properties in the United States
(“U.S.”) are wholly owned, while our international properties are primarily held in our co-investment ventures, which has the benefit of
mitigating our exposure to foreign currency movements.
 
Our portfolio is focused on the world’ s most vibrant centers of commerce and our scale allows us to respond to our customers’ needs
for the highest-quality buildings across these locations. There is an emergence of two new structural demand drivers for our real
estate: (i) the need for more inventory as supply chains emphasize resilience over ef ficiency and (ii) the acceleration of e-commerce
adoption.
3
As service time increasingly moves to the forefront of the global supply chain, it drives demand for logistics real estate close to the
end-consumer . We have invested in properties located withi n infill and urban areas in our  largest global markets with same day
access (defined as Last T ouch ®) and next day  access (defined as city distribution ), to the consumer population. This positioning gives
us the unique ability to provide our customers with the right real estate solutions for their supply chains  that,  in turn , allows them to
meet end -consumer delivery expectations.
 
As we look to the future of logistics real estate, we are focused on solving our customers’ pain points, innovating in pursuit of creative
solutions and operational excellence. W e are listening and responding to our customers’ needs for skilled labor through initiatives to
create community workforce programs to develop their talent pool, utilize our proprietary data and analytics to ensure ef ficient
distribution solutions and negotiate better pricing on common products and services that our customers need. Our customers turn to
us because they know that a strategic partnership with Prologis is a competitive advantage. W e accomplish all of this by employing
individuals who continue to grow , embrace change and draw strength from inclusion and diversity .
 
At December 31, 2020, we owned or had investments in properties, on a wholly-owned basis or through ventures, in the following
geographies (dollars in billions, based on gross book value and total expected investment (as defined below) and square feet in
millions):
 
 
2020 Significant Events
 
On January 8, 2020, our two U.S. co-investment ventures, Prologis U.S. Logistics V enture, LLC (“USL V”) and Prologis T argeted U.S.
Logistics Fund (“USLF”), acquired the wholly-owned real estate assets of Industrial Property T rust Inc. (“IPT”) for approximately $2.0
billion each, which we refer to as the “IPT T ransaction” and is detailed in Notes 4, 5, 8 and 11 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements. The portfolio included 235 properties, aggregating 37 million square feet and were highly complementary to our U.S.
portfolio in terms of product quality , location and growth potential. Our aggregate investment in the IPT T ransaction was $1.6 billion.
 
On February 4, 2020, we acquired Liberty Property T rust and Liberty Property Limited Partnership (collectively “Liberty”) through a
merger transaction that we refer to as the “Liberty T ransaction” and is detailed in Note 3 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
The Liberty portfolio was primarily comprised of logistics real estate assets, including 519 operating properties, aggregating 100
million square feet and were highly complementary to our U.S. portfolio in terms of product quality , location and growth potential. The
portfolio also included properties under development, land for future development and of fice properties. The acquisition expanded our
presence in target markets such as Lehigh V alley, Chicago, Houston, Central Pennsylvania, New Jersey and Southern California. The
total acquisition price, including transaction costs, was approximately $13 billion and was funded through the issuance of equity and
the assumption of debt. As a result of the closely aligned portfolios and similar business strategy , we integrated the IPT and Liberty
properties while adding minimal property management and general and administrative expenses, further scaling our operations.
 
On a combined basis, there were 42 million square feet of non-strategic industrial properties with a gross book value of approximately
$3 billion acquired in both the Liberty T ransaction and the IPT T ransaction that we do not intend to operate long-term . Depending on
the expected hold period, these assets were either classified as Assets Held for Sale or Contribution  or other real estate investments
within Investments in Real Estate Properties  at the time of acquisition in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Since acquisition some of
these non-strategic industrial properties have been sold.
4
 
In early 2020, COVID-19 was characterized as a global pandemic by the W orld Health Organization. The COVID-19 outbreak has
disrupted financial markets and global, national and local economies since this time. Our operating results have remained strong in
the COVID-19 environment and our business has been resilient. W e expect operating conditions in our portfolio to continue to
strengthen in 2021. However , with the continued uncertainty across the globe, we cannot predict the impact on our business, future
financial condition or operating results. For discussion on current operating results and our operational and financial outlook, as well
as our response to help protect employees and customers, see the Summary of 2020 section in Item 7. Management’ s Discussion
and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
 
Throughout this discussion, we reflect amounts in U.S. dollars, our reporting currency . Included in these amounts are consolidated
and unconsolidated investments denominated in foreign currencies, principally the British pound sterling, euro and Japanese yen that
are impacted by fluctuations in exchange rates when translated to U.S. dollars. W e mitigate our exposure to foreign currency
fluctuations by investing outside the U.S. through co-investment ventures, borrowing in the functional currency of our subsidiaries and
utilizing derivative financial instruments.
 
OPERATING SEGMENTS
 
Our business comprises two operating segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital.
 
Below is information summarizing consolidated activity within our segments over the last three years (in millions):
 
 
(1)  NOI from Real Estate Operations is calculated directly from our Consolidated Financial Statements as Rental Revenues  and
Development Management and Other Revenues less Rental Expenses  and Other Expenses.
 
(2) A developed property moves into the operating portfolio when it meets our definition of stabilization, which is the earlier of one
year after completion or 90% occupancy . Amounts represent our total expected investment (“TEI”), which includes the estimated
cost of development, land, construction and leasing costs.
 
 
Real Estate Operations
 
Rental.  Rental operations comprise the largest component of our operating segments and generally contribute 85% to 90% of our
consolidated revenues, earnings and funds from operations (“FFO”). W e collect rent from our customers through operating leases,
including reimbursements for the majority of our property operating costs. W e expect to generate internal growth by increasing rents,
maintaining high occupancy rates and controlling expenses. The primary driver of our revenue growth will be rolling in-place leases to
current market rents as leases expire. W e believe our active portfolio management, combined with the skills of our property , leasing,
maintenance, capital, energy , sustainability and risk management teams allow us to maximize NOI across our portfolio. A majority of
our consolidated rental revenue, NOI and cash flows are generated in the U.S.
 
Development. Given the scarcity of modern logistics facilities in our target markets, our development business provides us the
opportunity to build what our customers need. W e develop properties to meet these needs, deepen our market presence and maintain
a modern portfolio. W e believe we have a competitive advantage due to (i) the strategic locations of our land bank and redevelopment
sites; (ii) the development expertise of our local teams; and (iii) the depth of our customer relationships. Successful development and
redevelopment ef forts provide significant earnings growth as projects are leased, generate income and increase the net asset value of
our Real Estate Operations segment. Based on our current estimates, our consolidated land, including options, has the potential to
support the development of $11.8 billion of TEI of new logistics space. In addition to our land portfolio, we have also made
investments in other properties that have the potential to be redeveloped to increase value. Generally , we develop properties in the
U.S. for long-term hold and outside the U.S. for contribution to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
Strategic Capital
 
Our strategic capital segment allows us to partner with many of the world’ s largest institutional investors and capitalize our business
through private equity , principally perpetual open-ended or long-term ventures. W e also access capital in this segment through two
publicly traded vehicles: Nippon Prologis REIT , Inc. in Japan and FIBRA Prologis in Mexico. W e align our interests with our partners
by holding significant ownership interests in all of our 9 unconsolidated co-investment ventures (ranging from 15% to 50%), which
allows us to reduce our exposure to foreign currency movements for investments outside the U.S.
5
 
This segment produces stable, long-term cash flows and generally contributes 10% to 15% of our recurring consolidated revenues,
earnings and FFO. W e generate strategic capital revenues from our unconsolidated co-investment ventures, principally through asset
and property management services. W e earn additional revenues by providing leasing, acquisition, construction, development and
disposition services. In certain ventures, we also have the ability to earn revenues through incentive fees (“promotes” or “promote
revenues”) periodically during the life of a venture or upon liquidation. W e plan to profitably grow this business by increasing our
assets under management in existing or new ventures. Most of the strategic capital revenues are generated outside the U.S. NOI in
this segment is calculated directly from our Consolidated Financial Statements as Strategic Capital Revenues  less Strategic Capital
Expenses  and excludes property-related NOI.
 
FUTURE GROWTH
 
We believe the quality and scale of our global portfolio, the expertise of our team, the depth of our customer relationships and the
strength of our balance sheet give us unique competitive advantages to grow revenues, NOI, earnings, FFO and cash flows.
 
 
(1) General and Administrative (“G&A”) Expenses  is a line item in the Consolidated Financial Statements. Adjusted G&A expenses
is calculated from our Consolidated Financial Statements as G&A Expenses and Strategic Capital Expenses , less expenses
under the Prologis Promote Plan (“PPP”) and property-level management expenses for the properties owned by the ventures .
 
• Rent Growth.  Despite the COVID-19 pandemic and the current economic environment, we expect rents in our markets to
increase due to demand for the location and quality of our properties. In addition, due to strong market rent growth over the last
several years, our in-place leases have considerable upside potential. W e estimate that the rental rates of our leases are 13%
below current market on the basis of our weighted average ownership at December 31, 2020. Therefore, even if market rent
growth is flat, a lease renewal will likely translate into increased future rental income, on a consolidated basis or through the
earnings we recognize from our unconsolidated co-investment ventures based on our ownership. W e have experienced positive
rent change on rollover (comparing the net ef fective rent (“NER”) of the new lease to the prior lease for the same space) in every
quarter since 2013. W e expect this trend to continue for several more years due to our current in-place rents being below
market. W e also expect future growth in market rents to further contribute to increased rental income.
 
• Value Creation from Development.  A successful development and redevelopment program involves maintaining control of
well-located and entitled land and redevelopment sites. W e believe that the carrying value of our land bank is below its current
fair value. Due to the strategic nature of our land bank, development expertise of our teams and strength of our customer
relationships, we expect to create value as we build new properties. W e measure the estimated value creation of a development
project as the margin above our anticipated cost to develop. As properties under development stabilize, we expect to realize the
value creation principally through contributions to the unconsolidated co-investment ventures and increases in the NOI of our
operating portfolio.
 
• Balance Sheet Strength.  Through the acquisitions of Liberty and IPT and execution of several opportunistic debt refinancings
at historically low rates, we further enhanced our financial position during 2020 while maintaining low leverage. At December 31,
2020, we had total available liquidity of $4.8 billion. As a result of our low leverage and available liquidity , we have significant
capacity to capitalize on value-added investment opportunities that will translate into future earnings growth.
 
• Economies of Scale from Growth.  We use adjusted G&A expenses as a percentage of the O&M portfolio to measure and
evaluate our overhead costs. W e have scalable systems and infrastructure in place to grow both our consolidated and O&M
portfolios with limited incremental G&A expense. W e believe we can continue to grow NOI and strategic capital revenues
organically and through accretive development and acquisition activity while further reducing G&A as a percentage of our
investments in real estate. As noted in the graph above, the acquisitions of the Liberty and IPT portfolios are key examples of
this ef fort, where we increased our investments in real estate in the O&M portfolio by over 20% in the first quarter of 2020 and
had minimal increases to G&A expenses , which results in lower G&A expenses as a percentage of the investments in real
estate.
 
• Staying “Ahead of What’ s Next™”.  We are working on initiatives to create value beyond the real estate by enhancing our
customers’ experience, utilizing our scale to streamline our procurement activities and negotiating better pricing on products and
services for us and our customers, as well as delivering improvements to our business through innovation, data analytics and
6
digitization ef forts.  Underlying our future strategy for growth is our ongoing commitment to , and initiatives in, environmental
stewardship, social responsibility and governance (“ESG”).
 
Competition
 
Real estate ownership is highly fragmented, and we therefore face competition from many owners and operators. Competitively priced
logistics space could impact our occupancy rates and have an adverse ef fect on how much rent we can charge, which in turn could
affect our operating results. W e may face competition regarding our capital deployment activities, including local, regional and national
operators or developers. W e also face competition from investment managers for institutional capital within our strategic capital
business.
 
Despite the competition we may face, our strategic focus over the years has given us distinct competitive advantages, including the
following:
 
• a portfolio of properties strategically located in markets characterized by large population densities, growing consumption and
high barriers to entry , typically near large labor pools and extensive transportation infrastructure, including our Last T ouch ®
facilities;
 
• an investment in ESG practices that enhances asset values while improving sustainability performance, including the
development of logistics facilities with sustainable design features that meet customer needs for high-quality buildings;
 
• established relationships with customers served by our experienced and responsive local and regional teams;
 
• the ability to leverage our organizational scale and structure to provide a single point of contact for our focus customers to
address their needs through our in-house global customer solutions team;
 
• proven property management and leasing expertise;
 
• relationships and successful track record with current and prospective investors in our strategic capital business;
 
• a strategically located land bank and redevelopment sites;
 
• local teams with development expertise; and
 
• a strong balance sheet and credit ratings, coupled with significant liquidity and borrowing capacity .
 
Customers
 
Our broad customer base represents a spectrum of international, national, regional and local logistics users. At December 31, 2020, in
our Real Estate Operations segment representing our consolidated properties, we had more than 3,400 customers occupying 446
million square feet of logistics operating properties.
 
7
 
In order to provide for a customer-centric location strategy , we have invested in properties located within infill and urban areas in our
largest global markets with same day and next day access to the consumer population, these are our Last T ouch ® and city distribution
facilities, respectively . To support these distribution facilities, we utilize multi-market facilities located at key transportation hubs on the
edge of these major infill and urban areas and gateway distribution facilities that incorporate access to major sea and intermodal
ports. Below are the primary categories of goods in our buildings for our consolidated real estate properties at December 31, 2020.
 
 
 
(1) NER is calculated using the estimated total cash to be received over the term of the lease divided by the lease term to
determine the average amount of cash rent payments received per year . Amounts derived in a currency other than the U.S.
dollar have been translated using the average rate from the previous year . 
 
The following table details our top 25 customers for our consolidated real estate properties at December 31, 2020 (square feet in
millions):
 
Top Customers % of NER   Total Occupied Square
Feet  
1.   Amazon  6.1   22 
2.   Home Depot  1.9   9 
3.   FedEx  1.9   6 
4.   UPS  1.2   5 
5.   XPO Logistics  1.1   5 
6.   Geodis  1.0   5 
7.   W al-Mart  0.9   4 
8.   U.S. Government  0.9   1 
9.   DHL  0.7   3 
10. PepsiCo  0.6   3 
Top 10 Customers  16.3   63 
11. DSV Panalpina A/S  0.6   3 
12. Of fice Depot  0.5   3 
13. Kellogg Company  0.5   2 
14. Staples  0.4   3 
15. Ryder System Inc.  0.4   2 
16. VF Corporation  0.4   1 
17. Berkshire Hathaway Inc.  0.4   1 
18. ZOZO, Inc.  0.4   1 
19. W estrock Company  0.4   1 
20. Kuehne + Nagel  0.3   1 
21. Express Messenger  0.3   1 
22. Mondelez International  0.3   2 
23. Bed Bath & Beyond, Inc.  0.3   2 
24. Sysco Guest Supply , LLC  0.3   2 
25. NFI  0.3   1 
Top 25 Customers  22.1   89
 
8
 
 
In our Strategic Capital segment, we view our partners and investors as our customers. At December 31, 2020, we had approximately
128 investors in our private equity ventures, several of which invest in multiple ventures.
 
Employees
 
We believe our employees are the most important part of our business. When attracting, developing and retaining talent, we seek
individuals who hold varied experiences and viewpoints to create an inclusive and diverse culture and workplace that allows each
employee to do their best work and drive our collective success. W e focus on leadership development at every level of the
organization. W e align employees’ goals with our overall strategic direction to create a clear link between individual ef forts and the
long-term success of the company and then provide ef fective feedback on their performance towards goals to ensure their growth. W e
believe a commitment to our employees’ learning and development through training, educational opportunities and mentorship is
critical to our ability to continue to innovate. Through performance plans, talent recognition and individual development planning, along
with reward packages, we advance our talent pool and create a sustainable and long-term enterprise. For additional discussion on the
impact of COVID-19 on our employees, see the Summary of 2020 section in Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
 
The following table summarizes our total number of employees at December 31, 2020:
 
Geographies     
U.S. (1)   1,091  
Other Americas   146 
Europe   458 
Asia   250 
Total   1,945
 
 
(1) This includes employees who were based in the U.S. but also support other geographies.
 
We allocate the personnel costs related to providing property management and leasing functions to our Real Estate Operations and
Strategic Capital segments based on the square footage of the respective portfolios. The personnel costs to perform only Strategic
Capital functions are allocated directly to that segment.
 
We believe we have good relationships with our employees. Prologis employees are not organized under collective bargaining
agreements, other than in Brazil, although some employees in Europe are represented by statutory W orks Councils and as such,
benefit from applicable labor agreements.
 
CODE OF ETHICS AND BUSINESS CONDUCT
 
We maintain a Code of Ethics and Business Conduct applicable to our board of directors (the “Board”) and all of our of ficers and
employees, including the principal executive of ficer, the principal financial of ficer and the principal accounting of ficer, and other people
performing similar functions. A copy of our Code of Ethics and Business Conduct is available on our website, www .prologis.com . In
addition to being accessible through our website, copies of our Code of Ethics and Business Conduct can be obtained, free of charge,
upon written request to Investor Relations, Pier 1, Bay 1, San Francisco, California 94111. Any amendments to or waivers of our Code
of Ethics and Business Conduct that apply to the principal executive of ficer, the principal financial of ficer, the principal accounting
officer, or other people performing similar functions, and that relate to any matter enumerated in Item 406(b) of Regulation S-K, will be
disclosed on our website.
 
ENVIRONMENTAL STEWARDSHIP, SOCIAL RESPONSIBILITY AND GOVERNANCE (“ESG”)
 
Our long-standing dedication to ESG creates value for our company by strengthening our relationships with our customers, investors,
employees and the communities in which we do business. The principles of ESG are an important aspect of our business strategy ,
delivering a strategic business advantage while positively impacting the environment. W e develop modern and ef ficient building
designs with state-of-the-art technology to stay ahead of our customers’ needs while advancing structural, transportation, and energy
requirements. W e invest in sustainable design features and practices, such as the addition of solar panels, cool roofs, light emitting
diode (“LED”) lighting, electric vehicle charging stations, waste diversion, recycling and xeriscaping, that result in cost-savings and
operational ef ficiency for our customers and reduce energy and water consumption, as well as decrease greenhouse gas emissions
across our portfolio and corporate operations.  We have a comprehensive carbon strategy that includes science-based targets to
address our global carbon footprint.
 
We are committed to social responsibility and strengthening relationships important to our business through customer partnerships,
investor outreach, community involvement, labor solutions, and inclusion and diversity initiatives, as well as a focus on our employees
and our customers’ employees through health and wellness programs and building design. Through our community workforce
initiative, for example, we are helping build a talent pipeline for our customers with an emphasis on revitalizing career pathways and
creating economic opportunities in the communities where we operate.  We set an ambitious goal to train 25,000 individuals by 2025
by partnering with leading public sector organizations and leveraging learning technologies to develop innovative training solutions.
 
Our strong governance and oversight creates a culture of uncompromising integrity . Our Board independence and diversity , open
communication with our stockholders and a risk management framework that supports our investment and process decisions all serve
9
to mitigate risk and preserve value for our company . The strength of our balance sheet and credit ratings, ability to stay ahead of
customer needs,  and engagement with our employees through ethics and anti-corruption training, along with stockholder outreach
ensures the financial, operational and reputation al resilience of our organization for the long-term. Our approach is reinforced by our
Code of Ethics and Business Conduct, as described above.
 
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
 
We are exposed to various environmental risks that may result in unanticipated losses and af fect our operating results and financial
condition. Either the previous owners or we have conducted environmental reviews on a majority of the properties we have acquired,
including land. While some of these assessments have led to further investigation and sampling, none of the environmental
assessments have revealed an environmental liability that we think would have a material adverse ef fect beyond amounts recorded as
of December 31, 2020. See further discussion in Item 1A. Risk Factors and Note 16 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
 
GOVERNMENTAL MATTERS
 
We are exposed to various regulatory requirements, taxes, tarif fs, trade wars and laws within the countries in which we operate and
unexpected changes in these items may result in unanticipated losses, adverse tax consequences and af fect our operating results
and financial condition. In addition, we may be impacted by the ability of our non-U.S. subsidiaries to distribute or otherwise transfer
cash among our subsidiaries due to currency exchange control regulations and transfer pricing regulations. The impact of regional or
country-specific economic instability , including government shutdowns or other internal trade alliances or agreements could also have
a material adverse ef fect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. See further discussion in Item 1A. Risk Factors.
 
INSURANCE COVERAGE
 
We carry insurance coverage on our properties. W e determine the type of coverage and the policy specifications and limits based on
what we deem to be the risks associated with our ownership of properties and our business operations in specific markets. Such
coverage typically includes property damage and rental loss insurance resulting from such perils as fire, windstorm, flood, earthquake
and terrorism; commercial general liability insurance; and environmental insurance. Insurance is maintained through a combination of
commercial insurance, self-insurance and a wholly-owned captive insurance entity . The costs to insure our properties are primarily
covered through expense reimbursements from our customers. W e believe our insurance coverage contains policy specifications and
insured limits that are customary for similar properties, business activities and markets and we believe our properties are adequately
insured. See further discussion in Item 1A. Risk Factors.
 
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
 
Our operations and structure involve various risks that could adversely af fect our business and financial condition, including but not
limited to, our financial position, results of operations, cash flow , ability to make distributions and payments to security holders and the
market value of our securities. These risks relate to Prologis as well as our investments in consolidated and unconsolidated entities
and include among others, (i) risks related to our global operations (ii) risks related to our business; (iii) risks related to financing and
capital; (iv) risks related to income taxes; and (v) general risks.
 
Risks Related to our Global Operations
 
As a global company , we are subject to social, political and economic risks of doing business in many countries.
 
We conduct a significant portion of our business and employ a substantial number of people outside of the U.S. During 2020, we
generated approximately $484 million or 10.9% of our consolidated revenues from operations outside the U.S. Circumstances and
developments related to international operations that could negatively af fect us include, but are not limited to, the following factors:
 
• difficulties and costs of staf fing and managing international operations in certain geographies, including dif fering employment
practices and labor issues;
 
• local businesses and cultural factors that dif fer from our usual standards and practices;
 
• volatility in currencies and currency restrictions, which may prevent the transfer of capital and profits to the U.S.;
 
• challenges in establishing ef fective controls and procedures to regulate operations in dif ferent geographies and to monitor
compliance with applicable regulations, such as the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the United Kingdom (“U.K.”) Bribery Act and
other similar laws;  
 
• unexpected changes in regulatory requirements, taxes, tarif fs, trade wars and laws within the countries in which we operate;
 
• potentially adverse tax consequences;
 
• the responsibility of complying with multiple and potentially conflicting laws, e.g., with respect to corrupt practices, employment
and licensing;
10
 
• the impact of regional or country-specific business cycles and economic instability , including government shutdowns, uncertainty
in the U.K., or further withdrawals from the European Union or other international trade alliances or agreements;
 
• political instability , uncertainty over property rights, civil unrest, drug traf ficking, political activism or the continuation or escalation
of terrorist or gang activities;
 
• foreign ownership restrictions in operations with the respective countries; and
 
• access to capital may be more restricted, or unavailable on favorable terms or at all in certain locations.
 
In addition, we may be impacted by the ability of our non-U.S. subsidiaries to dividend or otherwise transfer cash among our
subsidiaries due to currency exchange control regulations, transfer pricing regulations and potentially adverse tax consequences,
among other factors.
 
Compliance or failure to comply with regulatory requirements could result in substantial costs.
 
We are required to comply with many regulations in dif ferent countries, including (but not limited to) the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act,
the U.K. Bribery Act and similar laws and regulations. Our properties are also subject to various federal, state and local regulatory
requirements, such as the Americans with Disabilities Act and state and local fire and life-safety requirements. Noncompliance could
result in the imposition of governmental fines or the award of damages to private litigants. While we believe that we are currently in
material compliance with these regulatory requirements, the requirements may change or new requirements may be imposed that
could require significant unanticipated expenditures by us.
 
Disruptions in the global capital and credit markets may adversely af fect our operating results and financial condition.
 
To the extent there is turmoil in the global financial markets, this turmoil has the potential to adversely af fect (i) the value of our
properties; (ii) the availability or the terms of financing that we have or may anticipate utilizing; (iii) our ability to make principal and
interest payments on, or refinance any outstanding debt when due; and (iv) the ability of our customers to enter into new leasing
transactions or satisfy rental payments under existing leases. Disruptions in the capital and credit markets may also adversely af fect
the market price of our securities and our ability to make distributions and payments to our security holders.
 
The depreciation in the value of the foreign currency in countries where we have a significant investment may adversely
affect our results of operations and financial position.
 
We hold significant real estate investments in international markets where the U.S. dollar is not the functional currency . At December
31, 2020, approximately $8.6 billion or 15.3% of our total consolidated assets were invested in a currency other than the U.S. dollar ,
principally the British pound sterling, euro and Japanese yen. For the year ended December 31, 2020, $289 million or 8.9% of our
total consolidated segment NOI, as disclosed in Note 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and
Supplementary Data, was denominated in a currency other than the U.S. dollar . As a result, we are subject to foreign currency risk
due to potential fluctuations in exchange rates between foreign currencies and the U.S. dollar . A significant change in the value of the
foreign currency of one or more countries where we have a significant investment may have a material adverse ef fect on our business
and, specifically , our U.S. dollar reported financial position and results of operations.
 
Our hedging of foreign currency and interest rate risk may not ef fectively limit our exposure to other risks.
 
We attempt to mitigate our risk by borrowing in the currencies in which we have significant investments thereby providing a natural
hedge. W e may also enter into derivative financial instruments that we designate as net investment hedges, as these amounts of fset
the translation adjustments on the underlying net assets of our foreign investments. W e enter into other foreign currency contracts,
such as forwards, to reduce fluctuations in foreign currency cash flow associated with the translation of future earnings  of our
international subsidiaries. Although we attempt to mitigate the potential adverse ef fects of changes in foreign currency rates there can
be no assurance that those attempts will be successful.  Hedging arrangements involve risks, such as the risk of fluctuation in the
relative value of the foreign currency or interest rates and the risk that counterparties may fail to honor their obligations under these
arrangements. The funds required to settle such arrangements could be significant depending on the stability and movement of the
hedged foreign currency or the size of the underlying financing and the applicable interest rates at the time of the breakage. The
failure to hedge ef fectively against foreign exchange changes or interest rate changes may adversely af fect our business.
 
Risks Related to our Business
 
General economic conditions and other events or occurrences that af fect areas in which our properties are geographically
concentrated, may impact financial results.
 
We are exposed to the economic conditions and other events and occurrences in the local, regional, national and international
geographies in which we own properties. Our operating performance is further impacted by the economic conditions of the specific
markets in which we have concentrations of properties.
 
At December 31, 2020, 30.9% of our consolidated operating properties or $13.6 billion (based on consolidated gross book value, or
investment before depreciation) were located in California (Central V alley, San Francisco Bay Area and Southern California markets),
11
which represented 26.2% of the aggregate square footage of our operating properties and 27.1% of our NOI. Our revenues from, and
the value of, our properties located in California may be af fected by local real estate conditions (such as an oversupply of or reduced
demand for logistics properties) and the local economic climate. Business layof fs, downsizing, industry slowdowns, changing
demographics and other factors may adversely impact California’ s economic climate. Because of the investment we have located in
California, a downturn in California’ s economy or real estate conditions , including state income tax and property tax laws,  could
adversely af fect our business.
 
In addition to California, we also have significant holdings (defined as more than 3% of total consolidated investment before
depreciation) in operating properties in certain markets located in Atlanta, Chicago, Dallas/Fort W orth, Houston, Lehigh V alley, New
Jersey/New Y ork City , Seattle and South Florida. Of these markets, no single market contributed more than 10% of our total
consolidated investment before depreciation. Our operating performance could be adversely af fected if conditions become less
favorable in any of the markets in which we have a concentration of properties. Conditions such as an oversupply of logistics space or
a reduction in demand for logistics space, among other factors, may impact operating conditions. Any material oversupply of logistics
space or material reduction in demand for logistics space could adversely af fect our overall business.  
 
Our O&M portfolio, which includes our wholly-owned properties and properties included in our co-investment ventures, has
concentrations of properties in the same markets mentioned above, as well as in markets in France, Japan, Mexico and the U.K., and
are subject to the economic conditions in those markets.
 
Real estate investments are not as liquid as certain other types of assets, which may reduce economic returns to investors.
 
Real estate investments are not as liquid as certain other types of investments and this lack of liquidity may limit our ability to react
promptly to changes in economic or other conditions. Significant expenditures associated with real estate investments, such as
secured mortgage debt payments, real estate taxes and maintenance costs, are generally not reduced when circumstances cause a
reduction in income from the investments. As a REIT , under the IRC, we are only able to hold property for sale in the ordinary course
of business through taxable REIT subsidiaries in order to not incur punitive taxation on any tax gain from the sale of such property . We
may dispose of certain properties that have been held for investment to generate liquidity . If we do not satisfy certain safe harbors or
we believe there is too much risk of incurring the punitive tax on any tax gain from the sale, we may not pursue such sales.
 
We may decide to sell or contribute properties to certain of our unconsolidated co-investment ventures or sell properties to third
parties to generate proceeds to fund our capital deployment activities. Our ability to sell or contribute properties on advantageous
terms is af fected by: (i) competition from other owners of properties that are trying to dispose of their properties; (ii) economic and
market conditions, including the capitalization rates applicable to our properties; and (iii) other factors beyond our control. If our
competitors sell assets similar to assets we intend to divest in the same markets or at valuations below our valuations for comparable
assets, we may be unable to divest our assets at favorable pricing or at all. The unconsolidated co-investment ventures or third parties
who might acquire our properties may need to have access to debt and equity capital, in the private and public markets, in order to
acquire properties from us. Should they have limited or no access to capital on favorable terms, then dispositions and contributions
could be delayed.
 
If we do not have suf ficient cash available to us through our operations, sales or contributions of properties or available credit facilities
to continue operating our business as usual, we may need to find alternative ways to increase our liquidity . Such alternatives may
include, without limitation, divesting properties at less than optimal terms, incurring debt, entering into leases with new customers at
lower rental rates or less than optimal terms or entering into lease renewals with our existing customers without an increase in rental
rates. There can be no assurance, however , that such alternative ways to increase our liquidity will be available to us. Additionally ,
taking such measures to increase our liquidity may adversely af fect our business, and in particular , our distributable cash flow and
debt covenants.
 
Our investments are concentrated in the logistics sector and our business would be adversely af fected by an economic
downturn in that sector .
 
Our investments in real estate assets are concentrated in the logistics sector . This concentration may expose us to the risk of
economic downturns in this sector to a greater extent than if our business activities were more diversified.
 
Investments in real estate properties are subject to risks that could adversely af fect our business.
 
Investments in real estate properties are subject to varying degrees of risk. While we seek to minimize these risks through geographic
diversification of our portfolio, market research and our asset management capabilities, these risks cannot be eliminated. Factors that
may af fect real estate values and cash flows include:
 
• local conditions, such as oversupply or a reduction in demand;
 
• technological changes, such as reconfiguration of supply chains, autonomous vehicles, robotics, 3D printing or other
technologies;
 
• the attractiveness of our properties to potential customers and competition from other available properties;
 
• increasing costs of maintaining, insuring, renovating and making improvements to our properties;
 
12
 
• our ability to reposition our properties due to changes in the business and logistics needs of our customers;
 
• our ability to lease the properties at favorable rates and control variable operating costs; and
 
• governmental regulations and the associated potential liability under , and changes in, environmental, zoning, usage, tax, tarif fs
and other laws.
 
These factors may af fect our ability to recover our investment in the properties and result in impairment charges.
 
Our customers may be unable to meet their lease obligations or we may be unable to lease vacant space or renew leases or
re-lease space on favorable terms as leases expire.
 
Our operating results and distributable cash flow would be adversely af fected if a significant number of our customers were unable to
meet their lease obligations. At December 31, 2020, our top 10 customers accounted for 16.3% of our consolidated NER. In the event
of default by a significant number of customers, we may experience delays and incur substantial costs in enforcing our rights as
landlord, and we may be unable to re-lease spaces. A customer may experience a downturn in its business, which may cause the loss
of the customer or may weaken its financial condition, resulting in the customer ’s failure to make rental payments when due or
requiring a restructuring that might reduce cash flow from the lease. In addition, a customer may seek the protection of bankruptcy ,
insolvency or similar laws, which could result in the rejection and termination of such customer ’s lease and thereby cause a reduction
in our available cash flow .
 
We are also subject to the risk that, upon the expiration of leases they may not be renewed by existing customers, the space may not
be re-leased to new customers or the terms of renewal or re-leasing (including the cost of required renovations or concessions to
customers) may be less favorable to us than current lease terms. Our competitors may of fer space at rental rates below current
market rates or below the rental rates we currently charge our customers and we may be pressured to reduce our rental rates below
those we currently charge to retain customers when leases expire or we may lose potential customers.
 
We may acquire properties and companies that involves risks which could adversely af fect our business and financial
condition.  
 
We have acquired properties and will continue to acquire properties through the direct acquisition of real estate, the acquisition of
entities that own real estate or through additional investments in co-investment ventures that acquire properties. The acquisition of
properties involves risks, including the risk that the acquired property will not perform as anticipated and that any actual costs for
rehabilitation, repositioning, renovation and improvements identified in the pre-acquisition due diligence process will exceed
estimates. When we acquire properties, we may face risks associated with a lack of market knowledge or understanding of the local
economy , forging new business relationships in the area and unfamiliarity with local government and permitting procedures.
Additionally , there is, and it is expected there will continue to be, significant competition for properties that meet our investment criteria
as well as risks associated with obtaining financing for acquisition activities. The acquired properties or entities may be subject to
liabilities, including tax liabilities, which may be without any recourse, or with only limited recourse, with respect to unknown liabilities.
As a result, if a liability were asserted against us based on our new ownership of any of these entities or properties, then we may have
to pay substantial sums to settle it.
 
We may be unable to integrate the operations of newly acquired companies and realize the anticipated synergies and other benefits
or do so within the anticipated timeframe. Potential dif ficulties we may encounter in the integration process include: (i) the inability to
dispose of non-industrial assets or operations that are outside of our area of expertise; (ii) potential unknown liabilities and unforeseen
increased expenses, delays or regulatory conditions associated with these transactions; and (iii) performance shortfalls as a result of
the diversion of management’ s attention caused by completing these transactions and integrating the companies’ operations.  
 
Our real estate development and redevelopment strategies may not be successful.
 
Our real estate development and redevelopment strategy is focused on monetizing land in the future through development of logistics
facilities to hold for long-term investment, contribution or sale to a co-investment venture or third party , depending on market
conditions, our liquidity needs and other factors. W e may increase our investment in the development, renovation and redevelopment
business and we expect to complete the build-out and leasing of our current development portfolio. W e may also develop, renovate
and redevelop properties within existing or newly formed co-investment ventures. The real estate development, renovation and
redevelopment business includes the following significant risks:
 
• we may not be able to obtain financing for development projects on favorable terms or at all;
 
• we may explore development opportunities that may be abandoned and the related investment impaired;
 
• we may not be able to obtain, or may experience delays in obtaining, all necessary zoning, land-use, building, occupancy and
other governmental permits and authorizations;
 
• we may have construction costs that exceed our estimates and projects may not be completed, delivered or stabilized as
planned due to defects or other issues;
 
• we may not be able to attract third-party investment in new development co-investment ventures or suf ficient customer demand
for our product;
13
 
 
• we may have properties that perform below anticipated levels, producing cash flows below budgeted amounts;
 
• we may seek to sell certain land parcels and not be able to find a third party to acquire such land or the sales price will not allow
us to recover our investment, resulting in impairment charges;
 
• we may not be able to lease properties we develop on favorable terms or at all;
 
• we may not be able to capture the anticipated enhanced value created by our value-added properties on expected timetables or
at all;
 
• we may experience delays (temporary or permanent) if there is public or government opposition to our activities; and
 
• we may have substantial renovation, new development and redevelopment activities, regardless of their ultimate success, that
require a significant amount of management’ s time and attention, diverting their attention from our day-to-day operations.
 
We are subject to risks and liabilities in connection with forming co-investment ventures, investing in new or existing co-
investment ventures, attracting third-party investment and managing properties through co-investment ventures.
 
At December 31, 2020, we had investments in co-investment ventures, both public and private, that owned operating properties with a
gross book value of approximately $49 billion. Our organizational documents do not limit the amount of available funds that we may
invest in these ventures, and we may and currently intend to develop and acquire properties through co-investment ventures and
investments in other entities when warranted by the circumstances. However , there can be no assurance that we will be able to form
new co-investment ventures, or attract third-party investment or that additional investments in new or existing ventures to develop or
acquire properties will be successful. Further , there can be no assurance that we are able to realize value from our existing or future
investments. The same factors that impact the valuation of our consolidated portfolio, as discussed above, also impact the portfolios
held by the co-investment ventures and could result in other than temporary impairment of our investment and a reduction in fee
revenues.  
 
Our co-investment ventures involve certain additional risks that we do not otherwise face, including:
 
• our partners may share certain approval rights over major decisions made on behalf of the ventures;
 
• if our partners fail to fund their share of any required capital contributions, then we may choose to contribute such capital;
 
• our partners might have economic or other business interests or goals that are inconsistent with our business interests or goals
that would af fect our ability to operate the property;
 
• the venture or other governing agreements often restrict the transfer of an interest in the co-investment venture or may
otherwise restrict our ability to sell the interest when we desire or on advantageous terms;
 
• our relationships with our partners are generally contractual in nature and may be terminated or dissolved under the terms of the
agreements, and in such event, we may not continue to manage or invest in the assets underlying such relationships resulting in
reduced fee revenues or we may elect to acquire the properties in order to maintain an investment in the portfolio; and
 
• disputes between us and our partners may result in litigation or arbitration that would increase our expenses and prevent our
officers and directors from focusing their time and ef fort on our business and result in subjecting the properties owned by the
applicable co-investment venture to additional risk.
 
We generally seek to maintain suf ficient influence over our co-investment ventures to permit us to achieve our business objectives;
however , we may not be able to continue to do so indefinitely . We have formed publicly traded investment vehicles, such as NPR and
FIBRA Prologis, for which we serve as sponsor or manager . These entities bear their own risks related to trading markets, foreign
currency exchange rates and market demand. W e have contributed, and may continue to contribute, assets into such vehicles. There
is a risk that our managerial relationship may be terminated. 
 
We are exposed to various environmental risks, which may result in unanticipated losses that could af fect our business and
financial condition.
 
Under various federal, state and local laws, ordinances and regulations, a current or previous owner , developer or operator of real
estate may be liable for the costs of removal or remediation of certain hazardous or toxic substances. The costs of removal or
remediation of such substances could be substantial. Such laws often impose liability without regard to whether the owner or operator
knew of, or was responsible for , the release or presence of such hazardous substances. In addition, third parties may sue the owner
or operator of a site for damages based on personal injury , property damage or other costs, including investigation and clean-up
costs, resulting from the environmental contamination.
 
14
 
Environmental laws in some countries, including the U.S., also require that owners or operators of buildings containing asbestos
properly manage and maintain the asbestos, adequately inform or train those who may come into contact with asbestos and
undertake special precautions, including removal or other abatement, in the event that asbestos is disturbed during building
renovation or demolition. These laws may impose fines and penalties on building owners or operators who fail to comply with these
requirements and may allow third parties to seek recovery from owners or operators for personal injury associated with exposure to
asbestos. Some of our properties are known to contain asbestos-containing building materials.
 
In addition, some of our properties are leased or have been leased, in part, to owners and operators of businesses that use, store or
otherwise handle petroleum products or other hazardous or toxic substances, creating a potential for the release of such hazardous or
toxic substances. Furthermore, certain of our properties are on, adjacent to or near other properties that have contained or currently
contain petroleum products or other hazardous or toxic substances, or upon which others have engaged, are engaged or may engage
in activities that may release such hazardous or toxic substances. From time to time, we may acquire properties, or interests in
properties, with known adverse environmental conditions for which we believe that the environmental liabilities associated with these
conditions are quantifiable and that the acquisition will yield a superior risk-adjusted return. In connection with certain divested
properties, we have agreed to remain responsible for , and to bear the cost of, remediating or monitoring certain environmental
conditions on the properties.
 
Our insurance coverage does not cover all potential losses.
 
We and our unconsolidated co-investment ventures carry insurance coverage including property damage and rental loss insurance
resulting from certain perils such as fire and additional perils as covered under an extended coverage policy , namely windstorm, flood,
earthquake and terrorism; commercial general liability insurance; and environmental insurance, as appropriate for the markets where
each of our properties and business operations are located. The insurance coverage contains policy specifications and insured limits
customarily carried for similar properties, business activities and markets. W e believe our properties and the properties of our co-
investment ventures are adequately insured. Certain losses, however , including losses from floods, earthquakes, acts of war , acts of
terrorism or riots and pandemics, generally are not insured against or not fully insured against because it is not deemed economically
feasible or prudent to do so. If an uninsured loss or a loss in excess of insured limits occurs with respect to one or more of our
properties, we could experience a significant loss of capital invested and future revenues in these properties and could potentially
remain obligated under any recourse debt associated with the property .
 
Furthermore, we cannot be sure that the insurance companies will be able to continue to of fer products with suf ficient coverage at
commercially reasonable rates. If we experience a loss that is uninsured or that exceeds insured limits with respect to one or more of
our properties or if the insurance companies fail to meet their coverage commitments to us in the event of an insured loss, then we
could lose the capital invested in the damaged properties, as well as the anticipated future revenues from those properties and, if
there is recourse debt, then we would remain obligated for any mortgage debt or other financial obligations related to the properties.
Any such losses or higher insurance costs could adversely af fect our business.  
 
A number of our investments, both wholly-owned and owned through co-investment ventures, are located in areas that are known to
be subject to earthquake activity . U.S. properties located in active seismic areas include properties in our markets in California and
Seattle. International properties located in active seismic areas include Japan and Mexico. W e generally carry earthquake insurance
on our properties located in areas historically subject to seismic activity , subject to coverage limitations and deductibles, if we believe
it is commercially reasonable. W e evaluate our earthquake insurance coverage annually in light of current industry practice through an
analysis prepared by outside consultants and in some specific instances have elected to self-insure our earthquake exposure based
on this analysis. W e have elected not to carry earthquake insurance for our assets in Japan based on this analysis.
 
Furthermore, a number of our properties are located in areas that are known to be subject to hurricane or flood risk. W e carry
hurricane and flood hazard insurance on all of our properties located in areas historically subject to such activity , subject to coverage
limitations and deductibles, if we believe it is commercially reasonable. W e evaluate our insurance coverage annually in light of
current industry practice through an analysis prepared by outside consultants.
 
Risks Related to Financing and Capital
 
We may be unable to refinance our debt or our cash flow may be insuf ficient to make required debt payments.
 
We are subject to risks normally associated with debt financing, including the risk that our cash flow will be insuf ficient to meet
required payments of principal and interest. There can be no assurance that we will be able to refinance any maturing indebtedness,
that such refinancing would be on terms as favorable as the terms of the maturing indebtedness, or that we will be able to otherwise
obtain funds by selling assets or raising equity to make required payments on maturing indebtedness. If we are unable to refinance
our indebtedness at maturity or meet our payment obligations, our business and financial condition will be negatively impacted and, if
the maturing debt is secured, the lender may foreclose on the property securing such indebtedness. Our credit facilities and certain
other debt bears interest at variable rates. Increases in market interest rates would increase our interest expense under these
agreements.
 
Covenants in our credit agreements could limit our flexibility and breaches of these covenants could adversely af fect our
financial condition.
 
The terms of our various credit agreements, including our credit facilities, the indentures under which our senior notes and term loans
are issued and other note agreements, require us to comply with a number of customary financial covenants, such as maintaining
debt service coverage ratios, leverage ratios, fixed charge coverage ratios and other operating covenants including maintaining
insurance
15
coverage. These covenants may limit our flexibility to run our business, and breaches of these covenants could result in defaults
under the instruments governing the applicable indebtedness. If we default under the covenant provisions and are unable to cure the
default, refinance the indebtedness or meet payment obligations, our business and financial condition generally and, in particular , the
amount of our distributable cash flow could be adversely af fected.  
 
Adverse changes in our credit ratings could negatively af fect our financing activity .
 
At December 31, 2020, our credit ratings from Moody’ s and S&P were A3 and A-, respectively , both with stable outlook. A securities
rating is not a recommendation to buy , sell or hold securities and is subject to revision or withdrawal at any time by the rating
organization.
 
The credit ratings of our senior notes and preferred stock are based on our operating performance, liquidity and leverage ratios,
overall financial position and other factors employed by the credit rating agencies in their rating analyses of us. Our credit ratings can
affect the amount of capital we can access, as well as the terms and pricing of any debt we may incur . There can be no assurance
that we will be able to maintain our current credit ratings, and in the event our credit ratings are downgraded, we would likely incur
higher borrowing costs and may encounter dif ficulty in obtaining additional financing. Also, a downgrade in our credit ratings may
trigger additional payments or other negative consequences under our credit facilities and other debt instruments. Adverse changes in
our credit ratings could negatively impact our business and, in particular , our refinancing and other capital market activities, our ability
to manage debt maturities, our future growth and our development and acquisition activity .
 
In order to meet REIT distribution requirements we may need access to external sources of capital.
 
To qualify as a REIT , we are required each year to distribute at least 90% of our REIT taxable income (determined without regard to
the dividends-paid deduction and by excluding any net capital gain) to our stockholders and we may be subject to tax to the extent our
taxable income is not fully distributed. Historically , we have satisfied these distribution requirements by making cash distributions to
our stockholders, however , we may elect to pay a portion of the distribution in shares of our stock. Assuming we continue to satisfy
these distribution requirements with cash, we may not be able to fund all future capital needs, including acquisition and development
activities, from cash retained from operations and may have to rely on third-party sources of capital. Furthermore, to maintain our
REIT status and not have to pay federal income and excise taxes, we may need to borrow funds on a short-term basis to meet the
REIT distribution requirements even if the then-prevailing market conditions are not favorable for these borrowings. These short-term
borrowing needs could result from dif ferences in timing between the actual receipt of cash and inclusion of income for federal income
tax purposes, or the ef fect of nondeductible capital expenditures, the creation of reserves or required debt or amortization payments.
Our ability to access debt and equity capital on favorable terms or at all depends on a number of factors, including general market
conditions, the market’ s perception of our growth potential, our current and potential future earnings and cash distributions and the
market price of our securities.
 
The Financial Conduct Authority (“FCA”), the authority that regulates the London Inter-bank Of fered Rate (“LIBOR”),
announced that it intends to stop compelling banks to submit rates for the calculation of LIBOR after 2021 which will require
transition to an alternative reference rate that could have a negative impact on our required debt payments and the value of
our related debt and derivative financial instruments.
 
In July 2017, the FCA announced it intended to stop compelling banks to submit rates for the calculation of LIBOR after 2021. As a
result, in the U.S., the Federal Reserve Board and the Federal Reserve Bank of New Y ork identified the Secured Overnight Financing
Rate (“SOFR”) as its preferred alternative rate for USD LIBOR for debt and derivative financial instruments. In November 2020, the
Federal Reserve Board along with various independent groups announced the potential for certain USD LIBOR tenors to continue to
be published until June 2023. This change would allow most legacy USD LIBOR contracts to mature before disruptions occur in the
USD LIBOR market, without the need to transition those contracts to SOFR. The expected transition of GBP LIBOR and Y en LIBOR at
the end of 2021 was not impacted by this announcement. Additionally , other global regulators have undertaken reference rate reform
initiatives to identify a preferred alternative rate for other interbank of fered rates (“IBORs”). W e refer to these rates collectively as
“IBOR-indexed”. At December 31, 2020 we had variable rate debt of $2.0 billion, excluding borrowings that are hedged through
interest rate swap agreements. See Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk for additional discussion
regarding our variable rate debt.
 
Our loan documents contain provisions that contemplate alternative methods to determine the base rate applicable to our IBOR-
indexed debt to the extent IBOR-indexed rates are not available. Additionally , no mandatory prepayment or redemption provisions
would be triggered under our loan documents in the event that the IBOR-indexed rates are not available. If a contract is not
transitioned to a preferred alternative rate and IBOR-indexed rates are discontinued, the impact on our debt and derivative financial
instruments is likely to vary by contract. If IBOR-indexed rates are discontinued or if the methods of calculating the rates change,
interest rates on our current or future indebtedness may be adversely af fected. While we currently expect IBOR-indexed rates to be
available until the end of 2021, it is possible that they will become unavailable prior to that time.
 
We anticipate managing the transition to a preferred alternative rate using the language set out in our agreements and through
potentially modifying our debt and derivative instruments, however future market conditions may not allow immediate implementation
of desired modifications and we may incur significant associated costs in doing so. W e will continue to monitor and evaluate the
potential impact on our debt payments and value of our related debt and derivative financial instruments, however , we are not able to
predict when IBOR-indexed rates will cease to be available.
16
 
Our stockholders may experience dilution if we issue additional common stock or units in the OP .
 
Any additional future issuance of common stock or OP units will reduce the percentage of our common stock and units owned by
investors. In most circumstances, stockholders and unitholders will not be entitled to vote on whether or not we issue additional
common stock or units. In addition, depending on the terms and pricing of any additional of fering of our common stock or OP units
and the utilization of the proceeds, our stockholders and unitholders may experience dilution in both book value and fair value of their
common stock or units.
 
Risks Related to Income Tax
 
The failure of Prologis, Inc. to qualify as a REIT would have serious adverse consequences.
 
Prologis, Inc. elected to be taxed as a REIT under Sections 856 through 860 of the IRC commencing with the taxable year ended
December 31, 1997. W e believe Prologis, Inc. has been organized and operated to qualify as a REIT under the IRC and believe that
the current organization and method of operation comply with the rules and regulations promulgated under the IRC to enable Prologis,
Inc. to continue to qualify as a REIT . However , it is possible that we are organized or have operated in a manner that would not allow
Prologis, Inc. to qualify as a REIT , or that our future operations could cause Prologis, Inc. to fail to qualify . Qualification as a REIT
requires us to satisfy numerous requirements (some annually and others on a quarterly basis) established under highly technical and
complex sections of the IRC for which there are only limited judicial and administrative interpretations and involves the determination
of various factual matters and circumstances not entirely within our control. For example, to qualify as a REIT , Prologis, Inc. must
derive at least 95% of its gross income in any year from qualifying sources. In addition, Prologis, Inc. must pay dividends to its
stockholders aggregating annually at least 90% of its taxable income (determined without regard to the dividends paid deduction and
by excluding capital gains) and must satisfy specified asset tests on a quarterly basis. Historically , we have satisfied these distribution
requirements by making cash distributions to our stockholders, but we may choose to satisfy these requirements by making
distributions of cash or other property , including, in limited circumstances, our own stock. The provisions of the IRC and applicable
Treasury regulations regarding qualification as a REIT are more complicated for Prologis, Inc. because we hold substantially all of our
assets through the OP .
 
If Prologis, Inc. fails to qualify as a REIT in any taxable year , we will be required to pay federal income tax (including, for taxable years
prior to 2018, any applicable alternative minimum tax) on taxable income at regular corporate rates. Unless we are entitled to relief
under certain statutory provisions, Prologis, Inc. would be disqualified from treatment as a REIT for the four taxable years following the
year in which it lost the qualification and would be subject to corporate tax on built-in gains that exist at the time of REIT re-election if
recognized within the five-year period after re-election, and potentially 10 years for certain states. If Prologis, Inc. lost its REIT status,
our net earnings would be significantly reduced for each of the years involved. In addition, we may need to borrow additional funds or
liquidate some investments to pay any additional tax liability . Accordingly , funds available for investment, operations and distributions
would be reduced.
 
Furthermore, we own a direct or indirect interest in certain subsidiary REIT s that elected to be taxed as REIT s under Sections 856
through 860 of the IRC. Provided that each subsidiary REIT qualifies as a REIT , our interest in such subsidiary REIT will be treated as
a qualifying real estate asset for purposes of the REIT asset tests, and any dividend income or gains derived by us from such
subsidiary REIT will generally be treated as income that qualifies for purposes of the REIT 95% and 75% gross income tests. T o
qualify as a REIT , the subsidiary REIT must independently satisfy all of the REIT qualification requirements. If such subsidiary REIT
were to fail to qualify as a REIT , and certain relief provisions did not apply , it would be treated as a regular taxable corporation and its
income would be subject to U.S. federal income tax. In addition, a failure of the subsidiary REIT to qualify as a REIT would have an
adverse ef fect on the ability of Prologis, Inc. to comply with the REIT income and asset tests, and thus its ability to qualify as a REIT .
 
In addition, we may acquire properties through the acquisition of REIT entities that own the real estate. If a gain in such assets is not
otherwise recognized by the seller or target in such acquisitions, and such entities were to fail to satisfy the REIT requirements for any
year, they would be disqualified from treatment as a REIT for the four taxable years following the year in which the REIT qualification
was lost and the acquired assets would be subject to corporate tax on built-in gains that exist at the time of REIT re-election or , if
earlier , at the time of Prologis’ acquisition of the assets. A sale of such assets within the 5-year recognition period, and potentially 10
years for certain states, could result in corporate tax liabilities that could be significant.  
 
Certain property transfers may generate prohibited transaction income, resulting in a penalty tax on gain attributable to the
transaction.
 
From time to time, we may transfer or otherwise dispose of some of our properties, including by contributing properties to our co-
investment ventures. Under the IRC, any gain resulting from transfers of properties we hold as inventory or primarily for sale to
customers in the ordinary course of business is treated as income from a prohibited transaction subject to a 100% penalty tax. W e do
not believe that our transfers or disposals of property or our contributions of properties into our co-investment ventures are prohibited
transactions. However , whether property is held for investment purposes is a question of fact that depends on all the facts and
circumstances surrounding the particular transaction. The Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”) may contend that certain transfers or
dispositions of properties by us or contributions of properties into our co-investment ventures are prohibited transactions. While we
believe that the IRS would not prevail in any such dispute, if the IRS were to argue successfully that a transfer , disposition or
contribution of property constituted a prohibited transaction, we would be required to pay a 100% penalty tax on any gain allocable to
us from the prohibited transaction. In addition, income from a prohibited transaction might adversely af fect our ability to satisfy the
income tests for qualification as a REIT .
17
 
Legislative or regulatory action could adversely af fect us.
 
In recent years, numerous legislative, judicial and administrative changes have been made to the U.S., state, local and foreign income
tax laws applicable to investments in real estate, REIT s, similar entities and investments. Additional changes are likely to continue to
occur in the future, both in and outside of the U.S. and may impact our taxation or that of our stockholders.  Any increases in tax
liability could be substantial and would reduce the amount of cash available for other purposes.
 
Complying with REIT requirements may limit our flexibility or cause us to forego otherwise attractive opportunities.
 
Our use of taxable REIT subsidiaries (“TRSs”) enables us to engage in non-REIT qualifying business activities. Under the IRC, no
more than 20% of the value of the assets of a REIT may be represented by securities of one or more TRSs and other non-qualifying
assets. This limitation may hinder our ability to make certain attractive investments, including the purchase of non-qualifying assets,
the expansion of non-real estate activities and investments in the businesses to be conducted by our TRSs, and to that extent limit our
opportunities.
 
General Risks
 
Our business may be materially and adversely af fected by the impact of the global pandemic of COVID-19.
The W orld Health Organization and certain national and local governments characterized COVID-19 as a pandemic in March 2020.
The COVID-19 outbreak has disrupted financial markets and global, national and local economies. There are government restrictions
on activities across the globe. The impact of the COVID-19 outbreak on our business, that of our unconsolidated co-investment
ventures, and our customers for the long-term continues to be uncertain.
 
Given the ongoing and dynamic nature of these circumstances, we cannot predict the extent to which the continuation of the COVID-
19 pandemic may impact our business, but its impact may include the following:
 
• Existing customers and potential customers of our logistics facilities may be adversely af fected by the decrease in economic
activity , which in turn could disrupt their business and their ability to enter into new leasing transactions or satisfy rental
payments;
 
• Government, labor or other restrictions may prevent us from completing the development or leasing of properties currently under
development or making our properties ready for our customers to move in;
 
• Our ability to recover our investments in real estate assets may be impacted by current market conditions; and
 
• Our workforce, including our executives, may become ill or have dif ficulty working remotely , caring for our properties and/or
customers.
 
Any prolonged economic downturn, escalation of the outbreak or disruption in the financial markets may also impact our ability to
access capital markets to issue debt or equity securities and to complete real estate transactions at attractive pricing or at all.
 
These items may materially and adversely af fect our financial condition, results of operations, cash flows and real estate values.
 
Our business and operations could suf fer in the event of system failures or cyber security attacks.
 
Despite system redundancy , the implementation of security measures and the existence of a disaster recovery plan for our internal
and hosted information technology systems, our systems are vulnerable to damages from any number of sources, including energy
blackouts, natural disasters, terrorism, war , telecommunication failures and cyber security attacks, such as computer viruses or
unauthorized access. Any system failure or accident that causes interruptions in our operations could result in a material disruption to
our business. W e may also incur additional costs to remedy damages caused by such disruptions. Any compromise of our security
could result in a violation of applicable privacy and other laws, unauthorized access to information of ours and others, significant legal
and financial exposure, damage to our reputation, loss or misuse of the information and a loss of confidence in our security measures,
which could harm our business.
 
Risks associated with our dependence on key personnel.
 
We depend on the deep industry knowledge and the ef forts of our executive of ficers and other key employees. From time to time, our
personnel and their roles may change. While we believe that we are able to retain our key talent and find suitable employees to meet
our needs, the loss of key personnel, any change in their roles or the limitation of their availability could adversely af fect our business.
If we are unable to continue to attract and retain our executive of ficers, or if compensation costs required to attract and retain key
employees become more expensive, our performance and competitive position could be materially adversely af fected.
 
Our business could be adversely impacted if we have deficiencies in our disclosure controls and procedures or internal
control over financial reporting.
 
The design and ef fectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting may not prevent
all errors, misstatements or misrepresentations. While management continually reviews the ef fectiveness of our disclosure controls
and
18
procedures and internal control over financial reporting, there can be no guarantee that our internal control over financial reporting will
be ef fective in accomplishing all control objectives all of the time. Deficiencies, including any material weakness, in our internal control
over financial reporting that may occur in the future could result in misstatements or restatements of our financial statements or a
decline in the price of our securities.
 
We are exposed to the potential impacts of future climate change, which may result in unanticipated losses that could af fect
our business and financial condition.
 
We are also exposed to potential physical risks from possible future changes in climate. Our logistics facilities may be exposed to
catastrophic weather events, such as severe storms, fires or floods. If the frequency of extreme weather events increases, our
exposure to these events could increase. W e do not currently consider ourselves to be exposed to regulatory risks related to climate
change, as the operation of our buildings typically does not generate a significant amount of greenhouse gas emissions. However , we
may be adversely impacted as a real estate developer in the future by potential impacts to the supply chain or stricter energy
efficiency standards or greenhouse gas regulations for the commercial building sectors. W e cannot give any assurance that other
such conditions do not exist or may not arise in the future. The potential impacts of future climate change on our real estate properties
could adversely af fect our ability to lease, develop or sell such properties or to borrow using such properties as collateral.
 
ITEM 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments
 
None.
 
ITEM 2. Properties
 
GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION
 
We predominately invest in logistics facilities. Our properties are typically used for distribution, storage, packaging, assembly and light
manufacturing of consumer products. The vast majority of our operating properties are used by our customers for retail and online
fulfillment and business-to-business transactions.
 
The following tables provide details of our consolidated operating properties, investment in land and development portfolio and our
O&M portfolio. The O&M portfolio includes the properties we consolidate and the properties owned by our unconsolidated co-
investment ventures reflected at 100% of the amount included in the ventures’ financial statements as calculated on a GAAP basis,
not our proportionate share.
19
 
Included in the operating property information below for our consolidated operating properties are 482 buildings owned primarily by
one co-investment venture that we consolidate but of which we own less than 100% of the equity . No individual property or market
amounted to 10% or more of our consolidated total assets at December 31, 2020, or generated revenue equal to 10% or more of our
consolidated total revenues for the year ended December 31, 2020, with the exception of the Southern California market. Dollars and
square feet in the following tables are in millions:
 
  Consolidated Operating Properties   O&M  
Geographies  Rentable Square
Footage   Gross Book
Value   Encumbrances
(1)   Rentable Square
Footage   Gross Book
Value  
U.S.:                     
Atlanta   24  $ 1,549  $ 14   30  $ 1,996 
Baltimore/Washington D.C.   10   1,210   12   14   1,603 
Central PA   16   1,309   -   17   1,403 
Central Valley   17   1,306   10   19   1,440 
Chicago   39   3,201   9   52   4,359 
Dallas/Ft. Worth   31   2,205   8   38   2,732 
Houston   24   2,454   5   30   2,963 
Lehigh Valley   24   2,951   -   27   3,228 
New Jersey/New York City   32   3,798   45   41   5,059 
San Francisco Bay Area   21   2,909   9   26   3,562 
Seattle   13   2,016   -   22   2,873 
South Florida   13   1,677   29   18   2,220 
Southern California   78   9,151   16   97   11,227 
Remaining Markets – U.S. (15 markets) (2)  80   5,728   39   107   7,630 
Subtotal U.S.   422   41,464   196   538   52,295 
Other Americas:                     
Brazil   -   -   -   10   506 
Canada   10   882   153   10   882 
Mexico   1   53   -   41   2,597 
Subtotal Other Americas   11   935   153   61   3,985 
Europe:                     
France   1   92   -   32   2,861 
Germany  *   18   -   25   2,397 
Netherlands  *   19   -   23   2,314 
U.K.   1   103   -   26   4,031 
Remaining Countries – Europe (8 countries)
(3)   3   178   -   82   6,675 
Subtotal Europe   5   410   -   188   18,278 
Asia:                     
China   -   -   -   32   2,504 
Japan   2   348   199   37   7,179 
Singapore   1   144   -   1   144 
Subtotal Asia   3   492   199   70   9,827 
Total operating portfolio (4)   441   43,301   548   857   84,385 
Value-added properties (5)   5   594   -   9   983 
Total operating properties   446  $ 43,895  $ 548   866  $ 85,368 
                     
Items notated by ‘*’ indicate an amount less than one million that rounds to zero.  
20
 
 
  Consolidated – Investment in Land   Consolidated – Development Portfolio 
Geographies  Acres  Estimated Build
Out Potential
(square feet) (6)  Current
Investment  Rentable Square
Footage Upon
Completion   TEI (7)  
U.S.:                     
Atlanta   344   3  $ 34  *  $ 17 
Baltimore/Washington D.C.   41   1   16   1   120 
Central PA   29   1   8   -   - 
Central Valley   934   16   185   1   80 
Chicago   182   3   64   1   36 
Dallas/Ft. Worth   108   2   25   1   98 
Houston   197   3   44  *   13 
Lehigh Valley   208   2   82   2   197 
New Jersey/New York City   26   1   34   1   16 
San Francisco Bay Area   -   -   -  *   96 
Seattle   41   1   67  *   62 
South Florida   183   3   148  *   24 
Southern California   116   2   108  *   62 
Remaining Markets – U.S. (15 markets)   620   9   106   6   633 
Subtotal U.S.   3,029   47   921   13   1,454 
Other Americas:                     
Brazil   196   4   16   -   - 
Canada   162   3   89  *   72 
Mexico   414   7   76   1   44 
Subtotal Other Americas   772   14   181   1   116 
Europe:                     
France   263   5   28   1   126 
Germany   66   2   39  *   76 
Netherlands   31   1   15   1   98 
U.K.   198   4   120   2   328 
Remaining Countries – Europe (8 countries)  869   17   183   3   251 
Subtotal Europe   1,427   29   385   7   879 
Asia:                     
Japan   76   4   119   7   1,320 
Subtotal Asia   76   4   119   7   1,320 
Total land and development portfolio   5,304   94  $ 1,606   28  $ 3,769 
                     
Items notated by ‘*’ indicate an amount less than one million that rounds to zero.  
 
(1) Certain of our consolidated properties are pledged as security under secured mortgage debt and assessment bonds. For
purposes of this table, the total principal balance of a debt issuance that is secured by a pool of properties is allocated among
the properties in the pool based on each property’ s investment balance. In addition to the amounts reflected here, we also have
$101 million of encumbrances related to one prestabilized property included in the consolidated development portfolio.
 
(2) No remaining market within the U.S. represented more than 2% of the total gross book value of the consolidated operating
properties.
 
(3) No remaining country within Europe represented more than 2% of the total gross book value of the O&M operating properties.
 
(4)Included in our consolidated operating properties are properties that we consider to be held for contribution and are presented
within Assets Held for Sale or Contribution  in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. W e include these properties in our operating
portfolio as they are expected to be contributed to our co-investment ventures and remain in our O&M operating portfolio. At
December 31, 2020, we had investments in real estate properties that were expected to be contributed to our unconsolidated
co-investment ventures totaling $454 million and aggregating 5 million square feet. See Note 6 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data for further information on our Assets Held for Sale or
Contribution.
 
(5)Value-added properties are properties we have either acquired at a discount and believe we could provide greater returns post-
stabilization or properties we expect to repurpose to a higher and better use.
 
(6)Represents the estimated finished square feet available for lease upon completion of a building on existing parcels of land.
 
(7)TEI is based on current projections and is subject to change. In the first quarter of 2020, we suspended several recently started
speculative development projects for the short-term. Most of the suspended projects were restarted by the fourth quarter of
2020. At December 31, 2020, the outstanding suspended development projects had a TEI of $82 million and remain within our
consolidated development portfolio. As noted in the table below , our current investment in our active development portfolio,
excluding suspended development projects, was $1.9 billion, leaving approximately $1.8 billion of additional required
investment. At December 31, 2020, based on TEI, approximately 17% of the properties in the development portfolio were
completed but not
21
yet stabilized , 69% of the properties were expected to be completed before  December 31, 2021 and the remaining properties
were expected to be completed before August 2022 . We expect our development activities to accelerate in 2021.
 
The following table summarizes our investment in consolidated real estate properties at December 31, 2020 (in millions):
 
  Investment Before
Depreciation  
Operating properties, excluding assets held for sale or contribution  $ 43,508  
Development portfolio, including cost of land   1,882  
Land   1,606  
Other real estate investments (1)   3,388  
Total consolidated real estate properties  $ 50,384
 
 
(1) Included in other real estate investments were: (i) non-strategic real estate assets acquired in the Liberty T ransaction that we do
not intend to operate long-term; (ii) land parcels we own and lease to third parties; (iii) real estate assets that we intend to
redevelop into industrial properties; and (iv) costs associated with potential acquisitions and future development projects,
including purchase options on land.
 
LEASE EXPIRATIONS
 
We generally lease our properties on a long-term basis (the average term for leases commenced, including new leases and renewals,
in 2020 was 64 months). The following table summarizes the lease expirations of our consolidated operating portfolio for leases in
place at December 31, 2020 (dollars and square feet in millions):
                     
          NER  
  Number of
Leases   Occupied
Square Feet   Dollars   % of T otal  Dollars Per
Square Foot (1) 
2021   857   51  $ 298   11.2% $ 5.84 
2022   899   68   391   14.7%  5.75 
2023   876   61   368   13.8%  6.03 
2024   759   57   361   13.5%  6.33 
2025   558   50   328   12.3%  6.56 
2026   351   38   242   9.1%  6.37 
2027   171   22   144   5.4%  6.55 
2028   104   15   108   4.1%  7.20 
2029   95   18   119   4.5%  6.61 
2030   73   17   117   4.4%  6.88 
Thereafter   76   25   186   7.0%  7.44 
   4,819    422  $ 2,662    100.0 % $ 6.31 
Month to month   121   4             
Total consolidated   4,940    426            
 
 
(1) Dollars per square foot was calculated by dividing NER by the occupied square feet of the lease.    
 
22
CO-INVESTMENT VENTURES
 
Included in our O&M portfolio are consolidated and unconsolidated co-investment ventures that hold investments in real estate
properties, primarily logistics facilities that we also manage. Our unconsolidated co-investment ventures are accounted for under the
equity method. The amounts included for the unconsolidated ventures are reflected at 100% of the amount included in the ventures’
financial statements as calculated on a GAAP basis, not our proportionate share. The following table summarizes our consolidated
and unconsolidated co-investment ventures at December 31, 2020 (in millions):  
 
  Operating Properties          
  Square Feet   Gross
Book V alue   Investment
in Land   Development
Portfolio – TEI  
Consolidated Co-Investment V enture                 
U.S.:                 
Prologis U.S. Logistics V enture (“USL V”)   78  $ 7,772   $ 12  $ 21 
Total   78  $ 7,772   $ 12  $ 21 
                 
Unconsolidated Co-Investment V entures                 
U.S.:                 
Prologis T argeted U.S. Logistics Fund (“USLF”)   117  $ 10,987   $ 43  $ 37 
Other Americas:                 
FIBRA Prologis   40   2,549    6   6 
Prologis Brazil Logistics V enture ("PBL V") and other joint
      ventures   11   507   47   188 
Subtotal Other Americas   51   3,056    53   194 
Europe:                 
Prologis European Logistics Fund (“PELF”)   127   12,916    10   87 
Prologis European Logistics Partners Sàrl (“PELP”)   53   4,400    25   - 
Prologis UK Logistics V enture (“UKL V”)   5   779   68   246 
Subtotal Europe   185   18,095    103   333 
Asia:                 
Nippon Prologis REIT (“NPR”)   35   6,831    -   - 
Prologis China Core Logistics Fund (“PCCLF”)   25   2,128    -   - 
Prologis China Logistics V enture   7   376   13   1,276  
Subtotal Asia   67   9,335    13   1,276  
Total   420  $ 41,473   $ 212  $ 1,840  
                
 
For more information regarding our unconsolidated and consolidated co-investment ventures, see Notes 5 and 11 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
 
ITEM 3. Legal Proceedings
 
From time to time, we and our co-investment ventures are parties to a variety of legal proceedings arising in the ordinary course of
business. We believe that, with respect to any such matters to which we are currently a party , the ultimate disposition of any such
matter will not result in a material adverse ef fect on our business, financial position or results of operations.
 
ITEM 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
 
Not Applicable.
 
PART II
 
ITEM 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases
of Equity Securities
 
MARKET INFORMATION AND HOLDERS
 
Our common stock is listed on the NYSE under the symbol “PLD.”
 
Stock Performance Graph
 
The following line graph compares the change in Prologis, Inc. cumulative total stockholder ’s return on shares of its common stock
from December 31, 2015, to the cumulative total return of the S&P 500 Stock Index and the Financial T imes and Stock Exchange
NAREIT Equity REIT s Index from December 31, 2015, to December 31, 2020. The graph assumes an initial investment of $100 in our
common
23
stock and each of the indices on December 31, 201 5, and, as required by the SEC, the reinvestment of all dividends. The return
shown on the graph is not necessarily ind icative of future performance.
 
 
This graph and the accompanying text are not “soliciting material,” are not deemed filed with the SEC and are not to be incorporated
by reference in any filing by the Company under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, whether made before or after the date hereof and irrespective of any general incorporation language in any such filing.
 
PREFERRED STOCK DIVIDENDS
 
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had 1.3 million and 1.4 million shares of the Series Q preferred stock, respectively , with a
liquidation preference of $50 per share that will be redeemable at our option on or after November 13, 2026. Dividends payable per
share were $4.27 for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
  
For more information regarding dividends, see Note 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and
Supplementary Data.
 
SALES OF UNREGISTERED SECURITIES
 
During 2020, we issued 0.7 million shares of common stock of Prologis, Inc. in connection with the redemption of common units of
Prologis, L.P . and 0.5 million common units of Prologis, L.P . in connection with the acquisition of properties (see Note 11 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data) in reliance on the exemption from
registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, af forded by Section 4(a)(2) thereof.
 
24
 
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
 
The table below sets forth the information with respect to purchases by Prologis, Inc. of its common stock during the year ended
December 31, 2020:
 
PeriodTotal Number of
Shares Purchased
(1)   Average Price
Paid per Share (2)  Total Number of
Shares Purchased
as Part of Publicly
Announced Plan
(3)   Approximate Dollar V alue
of Shares that May Y et Be
Purchased Under the Plan
(in millions) (4)  
January 1 – January 31  -  $ -   -  $ - 
February 1 – February 29  -   -   -   - 
March 1 – March 31  539,000    64.66    539,000    965 
April 1 – April 30  -   -   -   - 
May 1 – May 31  -   -   -   - 
June 1 – June 30  -   -   -   - 
July 1 – July 31  -   -   -   - 
August 1 – August 31  -   -   -   - 
September 1 – September 30  -   -   -   - 
October 1 – October 31  -   -   -   - 
November 1 – November 30  -   -   -   - 
December 1 – December 31  -   -   -   - 
Total  539,000   $ 64.66    539,000   $ 965 
 
(1) In March 2020, the Board of Directors authorized a new share purchase program to repurchase up to $1.0 billion of common
stock on the open market or in privately negotiated transactions. This column primarily represents open market share
repurchases.
 
(2) Average price paid per share is a weighted average calculation using the aggregate price, excluding commissions and fees.
 
(3) The aggregate value of shares purchased in the year ended December 31, 2020 as part of the publicly announced plan was $35
million.
 
(4) As of February 5, 2021, $965 million in share repurchase authorization remained. There is no scheduled expiration date for the
program, but the program may be discontinued at any time. 
 
SECURITIES AUTHORIZED FOR ISSUANCE UNDER EQUITY COMPENSATION PLANS
 
For information regarding securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans, see Notes 9 and 12 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
 
OTHER STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
 
Common Stock Plans
 
Further information relative to our equity compensation plans will be provided in our 2021 Proxy Statement or in an amendment filed
on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 6. Selected Financial Data
 
None.
 
ITEM 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
 
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements included in Item 8. Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data of this report and the matters described under Item 1A. Risk Factors.
 
A discussion regarding our financial condition and results of operations for 2020 compared to 2019 is presented below . Information on
2018 is included in graphs only to show year over year trends in our results of operations and operating metrics. Our financial
condition for 2018 and results of operations for 2018 and 2019 compared to 2018 can be found under Item 7. Management’ s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations, which is incorporated by reference herein to our Annual
Report on Form 10-K  for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2019, filed with the SEC on February 11, 2020, and is available on the
SEC’ s website at www .sec.gov and our Investor Relations website at www .ir.prologis.com.
 
25
 
MANAGEMENT’S OVERVIEW
 
Summary of 2020
 
Our financial condition and operating results remain strong in the COVID-19 environment and, in combination with the demand we see
in our proprietary data, the pace of rent collections and dialogue with our customers, our outlook continues to improve in the first
quarter of 2021. However , with the continued uncertainty across the globe until we put COVID-19 behind us, we cannot predict the
impact on our business, future financial condition, and operating results.  
 
We experienced minimal impacts from the current environment on our O&M portfolio operating fundamentals in 2020. This is the
result of the high quality and location of our real estate portfolio, our customer base, favorable market fundamentals in the logistics
real estate sector and significant in-place-to-market rent spreads. E-commerce continues to grow well above its historical average and
customers that serve essential daily needs are thriving. Customers that have been negatively impacted by the current economy
represent a minimal percentage of our annual rent. Leasing activity remained strong for the O&M portfolio throughout 2020 with the
commencement of 150 million square feet of leases with an average term of 66 months, including 37 million square feet in the fourth
quarter . Rent change in our O&M portfolio was 21.3% during 2020 and 23.8% in the fourth quarter . We expect market rents to
continue to increase in 2021. The average number of days from lease proposal to commencement decreased since 2019 as some
customers have increased the pace of activity .
 
We received requests from certain customers for rent concessions during 2020 and for those granted, we deferred the rental
payments to a later period in 2020 or 2021. The deferral of rental payments did not impact revenue recognized from those leases.
During 2020, on an O&M basis we deferred $45 million of rental payments which represented less than 1% of our total O&M
annualized rental revenue. At January 25, 2021, we had collected $33 million, or 98%, of the deferred payments due at December
31st, with the remainder due in 2021. Although COVID-19 continues to have a minimal impact on our rent collections and bad debt is
trending lower than we initially anticipated, we may experience an increase in bad debt.
 
Our capital deployment and disposition activities have continued throughout this time and we expect the volume of these activities to
accelerate in 2021. By the fourth quarter of 2020, we restarted the majority of the speculative development projects that we
suspended in the first quarter .
 
Our business continuity , communication plans and technology are allowing all functions of our business to work smoothly during this
time. Generally , our employees have continued working remotely or in certain locations in our of fices under protocols to keep a safe
working environment. W e have not had any lay-of fs and we have extended financial assistance to employees in need. Our local
property and leasing teams have continued to maintain our properties and work with our customers to help them navigate the new
environment while following established measures to help keep them and our customers safe. In addition, we are providing assistance
across the globe in the form of direct cash grants, supplies and donation of over one million square feet through our Space for Good
program. In 2020, through the Prologis Foundation, we pledged $5 million to COVID-19 relief organizations and $1 million in support
of racial equality causes.
 
We completed the following significant activities in 2020 as described in the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements:
 
• In January , our U.S. co-investment ventures, USL V and USLF , acquired the wholly owned real estate assets of IPT for $2.0
billion each, including the assumption and repayment of debt. As USL V is a consolidated co-investment venture, our Results of
Operations section includes a discussion of the acquired properties. USLF is an unconsolidated co-investment venture and
therefore the acquisition is included in the discussion of our O&M Operating Portfolio.
 
• In February , we completed the Liberty T ransaction for $13.0 billion through the issuance of equity and the assumption of debt.
We assumed $2.8 billion of debt with a weighted average stated interest rate of 3.8%. W e paid down $1.8 billion of the assumed
debt with senior notes we issued at lower rates in February 2020, as detailed below .
 
• We earned promotes aggregating $241 million ($164 million net of related expenses), primarily in June from our unconsolidated
co-investment venture in the U.S.
 
• We generated net proceeds of $3.0 billion and realized net gains of $717 million, principally from the contribution of properties to
our unconsolidated co-investment ventures in the U.S., Europe, Mexico and Japan and dispositions to third parties in the U.S.
and Europe, including a majority of the U.K. portfolio acquired in the Liberty T ransaction.
 
26
 
• Additionally , we completed the following consolidated financing activities that included the issuance of $6.2 billion and
redemption of $3.0 billion of senior notes, with aggregate principal in U.S. dollars. This resulted in extending our weighted
average remaining maturity to 10 years and lowering our weighted average ef fective interest rate to approximately 1.9%
(principal in millions):
 
   Aggregate Principal   Issuance Date W eighted A verage    
 Initial Borrowing
Date  Borrowing
Currency   USD (1)  Interest Rate (2)  Term (3)   Maturity Dates
 February (4)  € 1,350   $1,485   0.6%   10.7   February 2022 – 2035
 February  $ 2,200   $2,200   2.4%    15.0   April 2027 – 2050
 February  £ 250  $ 322  1.9%    15.8   February 2035
 June (4)  ¥ 41,200   $ 386  1.0%    12.4   June 2027 – 2050
 August (4)  $ 1,250   $1,250   1.6%    18.2   October 2030 – 2050
 September  ¥ 19,700   $ 187  1.0%    14.1   September 2032 – 2040
 December  € 300  $ 365  0.0%    2.0   December 2022
                    
   Aggregate Principal   Redemption Date W eighted A verage    
 Redemption Date  Borrowing
Currency   USD (1)  Interest Rate  (2)  Term  (3)   Maturity Date
 January  € 400  $ 446  0.0%   0.1   January 2020
 March  € 700  $ 783  1.4%   1.2   May 2021
 June  € 213  $ 238  3.0%   1.6   January 2022
 June  € 100  $ 113  3.4%   3.6   February 2024
 September  $ 850  $ 850  4.3%   2.9   August 2023
 December  € 485  $ 596  3.0%   1.1   January 2022
 
 (1) The exchange rate used to calculate into U.S. dollars was the spot rate at the settlement date.
 
 (2) The interest rate represents the fixed or variable interest rate at the issuance or redemption date of the related debt.
 
 (3) The issuance date and redemption date weighted average term represent the remaining maturity in years on the related
debt at the issuance or redemption date, respectively .
 
 (4) Approximately $1.5 billion of the proceeds from the issuance of these notes were to fund sustainable and environmentally
beneficial projects and buildings in accordance with our green bond framework.
 
In February 2020, we completed an exchange of fer for two series of Liberty’ s senior notes for an aggregate amount of $750
million, with $690 million, or 92.0%, of the aggregate principal amount being validly tendered for exchange. These senior notes
are included in the aggregate principal amounts of $400 million due in October 2026 with an interest rate of 3.3% and $350
million due in February 2029 with an interest rate of 4.4%. The senior notes were exchanged for notes issued by a wholly owned
subsidiary and guaranteed by the OP . All other terms of the exchanged Liberty senior notes remained substantially the same.
 
At December 31, 2020, we had total available liquidity of $4.8 billion, principally due to current aggregate availability under our
credit facilities of $3.9 billion and unrestricted cash balances of $598 million.
 
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
 
We evaluate our business operations based on the NOI of our two operating segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital.
NOI by segment is a non-GAAP performance measure that is calculated using revenues and expenses directly from our financial
statements. W e consider NOI by segment to be an appropriate supplemental measure of our performance because it helps
management and investors understand our operating results.
 
27
 
Below is a reconciliation of our NOI by segment to Operating Income  per the Consolidated Financial Statements (in millions). Each
segment’ s NOI is reconciled to a line item in the Consolidated Financial Statements in their respective segment discussions below .
 
  2020   2019  
Real Estate Operations – NOI  $ 2,820   $ 2,091  
Strategic Capital – NOI   419   307 
General and administrative expenses   (275 )  (266 )
Depreciation and amortization expenses   (1,562 )  (1,140 )
Operating income before gains on real estate transactions, net   1,402    992 
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   465   468 
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   252   390 
Operating income  $ 2,119   $ 1,850  
        
 
See Note 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information on our segments and a reconciliation of each business
segment’ s NOI to Operating Income  and Earnings Before Income T axes.
 
Real Estate Operations
 
This operating segment principally includes rental revenue and rental expenses recognized from our consolidated properties. W e
allocate the costs of our property management and leasing functions to the Real Estate Operations segment through Rental Expenses
and the Strategic Capital segment through Strategic Capital Expenses based on the square footage of the relative portfolios. In
addition, this segment is impacted by our development, acquisition and disposition activities.
 
Below are the components of Real Estate Operations revenues, expenses and NOI (in millions), derived directly from the
Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
  2020   2019  
Rental revenues  $ 3,791   $ 2,832  
Development management and other revenues   11   6 
Rental expenses   (952 )  (734 )
Other expenses   (30)  (13)
Real Estate Operations – NOI  $ 2,820   $ 2,091
 
 
The change in Real Estate Operations NOI in 2020 compared to 2019 was impacted by the following items (dollars in millions):
 
 
(1) Acquisition activity increased NOI in 2020, compared to 2019, principally due to the IPT T ransaction and the Liberty T ransaction.
 
(2) During both years, we experienced positive rental rate growth. Rental rate growth is a combination of higher rental rates on
rollover of leases (or rent change) and contractual rent increases on existing leases. If a lease has a contractual rent increase
driven by a metric that is not known at the time the lease commences, such as the consumer price index or a similar metric, the
rent increase is not included in rent leveling and therefore, impacts the rental revenue we recognize. See below for key metrics
on rent change on rollover and occupancy for the consolidated operating portfolio.
 
(3) We calculate changes in NOI from development completions period over period by comparing the change in NOI generated on
the pool of developments that completed on or after January 1, 2019 through December 31, 2020.
 
28
 
Below are key operating metrics of our consolidated operating portfolio, which excludes non-strategic industrial properties.
 
 
(1) In August 2018, we completed the acquisition of DCT Industrial T rust Inc. and DCT Industrial Operating Partnership LP
(collectively “DCT” or the “ DCT T ransaction”) and acquired a portfolio of logistics real estate assets aggregating 68 million
square feet. In January and February 2020, we completed the IPT T ransaction and the Liberty T ransaction, respectively .
 
(2)Consolidated square feet of leases commenced and weighted average net ef fective rent change were calculated for leases with
initial terms of one year or greater .
 
Development Activity
 
The following table summarizes consolidated development activity (dollars and square feet in millions):
 
  2020   2019  
Starts:         
Number of new development projects during the period   42   74 
Square feet   14   25 
TEI  $ 1,997   $ 2,741  
Percentage of build-to-suits based on TEI   40.0%  44.0%
         
Stabilizations:         
Number of development projects stabilized during the period   66   72 
Square feet   23   26 
TEI  $ 2,451   $ 2,422  
Percentage of build-to-suits based on TEI   48.9%  36.9%
Weighted average stabilized yield (1)   6.3%  6.3%
Estimated value at completion  $ 3,383   $ 3,313  
Estimated weighted average margin   38.0%  36.8%
 
(1) We calculate the weighted average stabilized yield as estimated NOI assuming stabilized occupancy divided by TEI.
 
In the first quarter of 2020, we suspended several recently started speculative development projects for the short-term. Most of the
suspended projects were restarted by the fourth quarter of 2020. At December 31, 2020, the outstanding suspended development
projects had a TEI of $82 million and remain within our consolidated development portfolio. The remaining active consolidated
development portfolio, including properties under development and prestabilized properties, is expected to be completed before
August 2022 with a TEI of $3.7 billion, leaving $1.8 billion remaining to be spent, and was 61.6% leased. We expect our development
activities to accelerate in 2021. For additional information on our development portfolio at December 31, 2020, see Item 2. Properties.
 
29
 
Capital Expenditures
 
We capitalize costs incurred in renovating, improving and leasing our operating properties as part of the investment basis or within
other assets. The following graph summarizes our total capital expenditures, excluding development costs, and property
improvements per average square foot of our consolidated operating properties during each year:
 
 
(1) Our capital expenditures have increased due to our larger portfolio as a result of acquisition activity discussed above.
 
Strategic Capital
 
This operating segment includes revenues from asset and property management, other fees for services performed and promote
revenue earned from the unconsolidated entities. Revenues associated with the Strategic Capital segment fluctuate because of
changes in the size of the portfolios through acquisitions and dispositions, the fair value of the properties and other transactional
activity including foreign currency exchange rates and timing of promotes. These revenues are reduced by the direct costs associated
with the asset and property-level management expenses for the properties owned by these ventures. W e allocate the costs of our
property management and leasing functions to the Strategic Capital segment through Strategic Capital Expenses and to the Real
Estate Operations segment through Rental Expenses based on the square footage of the relative portfolios.
 
Below are the components of Strategic Capital revenues, expenses and NOI, derived directly from the Consolidated Financial
Statements (in millions):  
 
  2020   2019  
Strategic capital revenues  $ 637  $ 492 
Strategic capital expenses   (218 )   (185 )
Strategic Capital – NOI  $ 419  $ 307 
         
Below is additional detail of our Strategic Capital revenues, expenses and NOI (in millions):
 
  U.S. (1) Other Americas Europe Asia Total
  2020  2019  2020  2019  2020  2019  2020  2019  2020  2019  
Strategic capital revenues ($)                                          
Recurring fees (2)   111   75   32   31   120   106   68   56   331   268  
Transactional fees (3)   16   11   5   5   20   17   26   25   67   58  
Promote revenue (4)   228   -   1   5   5   161   5   -   239   166  
Total strategic capital revenues ($)   355   86   38   41   145   284   99   81   637   492  
Strategic capital expenses ($) (4)   (118)  (97)  (13)  (14)  (45)  (38)  (42)  (36)  (218)  (185) 
Strategic Capital - NOI ($)   237   (11)  25   27   100   246   57   45   419   307  
                                          
(1) The U.S. expenses include compensation, personnel costs and PPP awards for employees who were based in the U.S. but also
support other geographies.
 
(2) Recurring fees include asset and property management fees. The increase in the U.S. is primarily due to the IPT T ransaction.
 
(3) Transactional fees include leasing commissions and acquisition, disposition, development and other fees.
 
(4) We generally earn promote revenue directly from third-party investors in the co-investment ventures based on cumulative
returns over a three-year period. Approximately 40% of the promote earned by us is paid to our employees as a combination of
cash and stock awards pursuant to the terms of the PPP and expensed through Strategic Capital Expenses, as vested. For
discussion on PPP awards, see Note 12 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
30
 
The following real estate investments were held through our unconsolidated co-investment ventures based on the historical cost at
December 31 (dollars and square feet in millions):
 
  U.S. Other Americas (1) Europe Asia Total  
  2020  2019  2020  2019  2020  2019  2020  2019  2020  2019 
Ventures   1   1   2   2   3   3   3   3   9   9 
Operating properties   706   605   229   214   768   731   167   144   1,870   1,694 
Square feet   117   99   51   44   185   176   67   59   420   378 
Total assets ($) (2)   10,840   8,408   3,023   2,707   16,918   14,677   10,209   8,758   40,990   34,550 
                                        
 
(1) PBLV and our other Brazilian joint ventures are combined as one venture for the purpose of this table.
 
(2) The increase in total assets across all geographies was principally due to acquisitions, including IPT in the U.S., and movement
in foreign currency exchange rates.
 
See Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information on our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
G&A Expenses
 
G&A expenses were $275 million and $266 million for 2020 and 2019, respectively . Included in 2020 was a contribution of $5 million
to the Prologis Foundation for donations to COVID-19 relief organizations. W e capitalize certain internal costs, including salaries and
related expenses, directly related to our development activities.
 
The following table summarizes capitalized G&A amounts (in millions):  
 
  2020   2019  
Building and land development activities  $ 73  $ 68 
Operating building improvements and other   23   20 
Total capitalized G&A expenses  $ 96  $ 88 
Capitalized salaries and related costs as a percent of total salaries and related costs   20.2%  19.5%
 
Depreciation and Amortization Expenses
 
Depreciation and amortization expenses were $1.6 billion and $1.1 billion for 2020 and 2019, respectively .
 
The following table highlights the key changes in depreciation and amortization expenses in 2020 as compared to 2019 (dollars in
millions):
 
 
(1) Included in acquisitions are the operating properties, other real estate properties and related lease intangible assets acquired
in the Liberty T ransaction and the IPT T ransaction.
31
 
Gains on Real Estate Transactions, Net
 
The following table summarizes our Gains on Dispositions of Development Properties and Land, Net , which primarily includes
contributions to our unconsolidated entities, and Gains on Other Dispositions of Investments in Real Estate, Net , which includes sales
of operating properties and other real estate transactions, for the years ended December 31 (in millions):
 
  2020   2019  
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net         
Contributions to unconsolidated entities and dispositions to third parties  $ 465  $ 468 
Total gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net  $ 465  $ 468 
         
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net         
Contributions to unconsolidated entities and dispositions to third parties  $ 252  $ 255 
Gains on partial redemption of investment in an unconsolidated co-investment venture   -   135 
Total gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  $ 252  $ 390
 
 
We utilized the proceeds from these transactions primarily to fund our capital investments during both periods. See Note 4 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on these transactions.
 
Our Owned and Managed (“O&M”) Operating Portfolio
 
We manage our business and review our operating fundamentals on an O&M basis, which includes properties wholly owned by us or
owned by one of our co-investment ventures. W e believe reviewing the fundamentals this way allows management to understand the
entire impact to the financial statements, as it will af fect both the Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital segments, as well as
the net earnings we recognize from our unconsolidated co-investment ventures based on our ownership. W e do not control the
unconsolidated co-investment ventures for purposes of GAAP and the presentation of the ventures’ operating information does not
represent a legal claim.
 
Our O&M operating portfolio does not include our development portfolio, value-added properties, non-industrial properties or
properties we do not have the intent to hold long-term that are classified as either held for sale or within other real estate investments.
Value-added properties are properties that are expected to be repurposed or redeveloped to a higher and better use and recently
acquired properties that present opportunities to create greater value. See below for information on our O&M operating portfolio at
December 31 (square feet in millions):
 
 2020   2019  
 Number of
Properties   Square
Feet   Percentage
Occupied   Number of
Properties   Square
Feet   Percentage
Occupied  
Consolidated  2,252    441   96.6%  1,882    359   96.1%
Unconsolidated  1,849    416   95.9%  1,676    376   96.8%
Total  4,101    857   96.2%  3,558    735   96.5%
 
32
 
Below are the key operating metrics summarizing the leasing activity of our O&M operating portfolio.
 
 
(1) Square feet of leases commenced and weighted average net ef fective rent change were calculated for leases with initial terms
of one year or greater . We retained more than 70% of our customers, based on the total square feet of leases commenced, for
each year .
 
(2) Turnover costs include external leasing commissions and tenant improvements and represent the obligations incurred in
connection with the lease commencement for leases greater than one year . In 2020 and 2019, turnover costs per square foot
increased, however , due to the longer terms and higher rents on leases commenced, this resulted in a lower cost as a
percentage of lease value.
 
Same Store Analysis
 
Our same store metrics are non-GAAP financial measures, which are commonly used in the real estate industry and expected from
the financial community , on both a net ef fective and cash basis. W e evaluate the performance of the operating properties we own and
manage using a “same store” analysis because the population of properties in this analysis is consistent from period to period, which
allows us and investors to analyze our ongoing business operations. W e determine our same store metrics on property NOI, which is
calculated as rental revenue less rental expense for the applicable properties in the same store population for both consolidated and
unconsolidated properties based on our ownership interest, as further defined below .
 
We define our same store population for the three months ended December 31, 2020 as the properties in our O&M operating portfolio,
including the property NOI for both consolidated properties and properties owned by the unconsolidated co-investment ventures at
January 1, 2019 and owned throughout the same three-month period in both 2019 and 2020. W e believe the drivers of property NOI
for the consolidated portfolio are generally the same for the properties owned by the ventures in which we invest and therefore we
evaluate the same store metrics of the O&M portfolio based on Prologis’ ownership in the properties (“Prologis Share”). The same
store population excludes properties held for sale to third parties, along with development properties that were not stabilized at the
beginning of the period (January 1, 2019) and properties acquired or disposed of to third parties during the period. T o derive an
appropriate measure of period-to-period operating performance, we remove the ef fects of foreign currency exchange rate movements
by using the reported period-end exchange rate to translate from local currency into the U.S. dollar , for both periods.
 
As non-GAAP financial measures, the same store metrics have certain limitations as an analytical tool and may vary among real
estate companies. As a result, we provide a reconciliation of Rental Revenues  less Rental Expenses  (“Property NOI”) (from our
Consolidated Financial Statements prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP) to our Same Store Property NOI measures.
 
We evaluate the results of our same store portfolio on a quarterly basis. The following is a reconciliation of our consolidated rental
revenues, rental expenses and property NOI for each quarter in 2020 and 2019 to the full year , as included in the Consolidated
Statements of Income and within Note 19 to the Consolidated Financial Statements and to the respective amounts in our same store
portfolio analysis for the three months ended December 31 (dollars in millions):
 
  Three Months Ended      
  March 31,   June 30,   September 30,   December 31,   Full Y ear  
2020                     
Rental revenues  $ 879  $ 944  $ 980  $ 988  $ 3,791  
Rental expenses   (228 )  (232 )  (245 )  (247 )  (952 )
Property NOI  $ 651  $ 712  $ 735  $ 741  $ 2,839  
2019                     
Rental revenues  $ 697  $ 701  $ 711  $ 723  $ 2,832  
Rental expenses   (188 )  (181 )  (181 )  (184 )  (734 )
Property NOI  $ 509  $ 520  $ 530  $ 539  $ 2,098
 
33
 
 
 Three Months Ended
December 31,      
 2020   2019   % Change  
Reconciliation of Consolidated Property NOI to Same Store Property NOI measures:  
            
Rental revenues $ 988  $ 723     
Rental expenses  (247 )  (184 )    
Consolidated Property NOI $ 741  $ 539     
            
Adjustments to derive same store results:            
Property NOI from consolidated properties not included in same store portfolio and
     other adjustments  (1)(2)  (253 )  (61)    
Property NOI from unconsolidated co-investment ventures included in same store
     portfolio  (1)(2)  515   493     
Third parties' share of Property NOI from properties included in same store portfolio (1)(2) (415 )  (403 )    
Prologis Share of Same Store Property NOI – Net Effective  (2) $ 588  $ 568   3.5%
Consolidated properties straight-line rent and fair value lease adjustments
     included in same store portfolio (3)  (11)  (9)    
Unconsolidated co-investment ventures straight-line rent and fair value lease
     adjustments included in same store portfolio  (3)  (11)  (7)    
Third parties' share of straight-line rent and fair value lease adjustments included
     in same store portfolio  (2)(3)  9   6     
Prologis Share of Same Store Property NOI – Cash  (2)(3) $ 575  $ 558   3.0%
 
 (1) We exclude properties held for sale to third parties, along with development properties that were not stabilized at the beginning
of the period and properties acquired or disposed of to third parties during the period. W e also exclude net termination and
renegotiation fees to allow us to evaluate the growth or decline in each property’ s rental revenues without regard to one-time
items that are not indicative of the property’ s recurring operating performance. Net termination and renegotiation fees represent
the gross fee negotiated to allow a customer to terminate or renegotiate their lease, of fset by the write-of f of the asset recorded
due to the adjustment to straight-line rents over the lease term. Same Store Property NOI is adjusted to include an allocation of
property management expenses for our consolidated properties based on the property management services provided to each
property (generally , based on a percentage of revenues). On consolidation, these amounts are eliminated and the actual costs
of providing property management services are recognized as part of our consolidated rental expense.
 
 (2) We include the Property NOI for the same store portfolio for both consolidated properties and properties owned by the co-
investment ventures based on our investment in the underlying properties. In order to calculate our share of Same Store
Property NOI from the co-investment ventures in which we own less than 100%, we use the co-investment ventures’ underlying
Property NOI for the same store portfolio and apply our ownership percentage at December 31, 2020 to the Property NOI for
both periods, including the properties contributed during the period. W e adjust the total Property NOI from the same store
portfolio of the co-investment ventures by subtracting the third parties’ share of both consolidated and unconsolidated co-
investment ventures .
 
During the periods presented, certain wholly owned properties were contributed to a co-investment venture and are included in
the same store portfolio. Neither our consolidated results nor those of the co-investment ventures, when viewed individually ,
would be comparable on a same store basis because of the changes in composition of the respective portfolios from period to
period (e.g. the results of a contributed property are included in our consolidated results through the contribution date and in the
results of the venture subsequent to the contribution date based on our ownership interest at the end of the period). As a result,
only line items labeled “Prologis Share of Same Store Property NOI” are comparable period over period.
 
 (3) We further remove certain noncash items (straight-line rent and amortization of fair value lease adjustments) included in the
financial statements prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP to reflect a Same Store Property NOI – Cash measure.
 
We manage our business and compensate our executives based on the same store results of our O&M portfolio at 100% as we
manage our portfolio on an ownership blind basis. W e calculate those results by including 100% of the properties included in our
same store portfolio.
 
Other Components of Income (Expense)
 
Earnings from Unconsolidated Entities, Net
 
We recognized net earnings from unconsolidated entities, which are accounted for using the equity method, of $297 million and $200
million during 2020 and 2019, respectively . The earnings we recognize can be impacted by: (i) variances in revenues and expenses of
each venture; (ii) the size and occupancy rate of the portfolio of properties owned by each venture; (iii) gains or losses from the
dispositions of properties and extinguishment of debt; (iv) our ownership interest in each venture; and (v) fluctuations in foreign
currency exchange rates used to translate our share of net earnings to U.S. dollars.
 
34
 
See the discussion of our unconsolidated entities above in the Strategic Capital segment discussion and in Note 5 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements for a further breakdown of our share of net earnings recognized.
 
Interest Expense
 
The following table details our net interest expense (dollars in millions):
 
  2020   2019  
Gross interest expense  $ 348  $ 271 
Amortization of debt discount and debt issuance costs, net   9   17 
Capitalized amounts   (42)  (48)
Net interest expense  $ 315  $ 240 
Weighted average ef fective interest rate during the year   2.2%  2.4%
 
Interest expense increased due to higher debt balances in 2020 as compared to 2019, driven primarily by the issuance of senior notes
and debt assumed in the Liberty T ransaction, reduced partially by lower interest rates as a result of our refinancing activities as
discussed under the Summary of 2020 section.
 
See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements and the Liquidity and Capital Resources section, for further discussion of our
debt and borrowing costs.  
 
Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net
 
We are exposed to foreign currency exchange risk related to investments in and earnings from our foreign investments.  We may use
derivative financial instruments to manage foreign currency exchange rate risk. W e recognize the change in fair value of the
undesignated derivative contracts in unrealized gains and losses. Upon settlement of these transactions, we recognize realized gains
or losses.
 
We primarily hedge our foreign currency risk by borrowing in the currencies in which we invest thereby providing a natural hedge. W e
have issued debt in a currency that is not the same functional currency of the borrowing entity and have designated a portion of the
debt as a nonderivative net investment hedge. We recognize the remeasurement and settlement of the unhedged portion of the debt
and accrued interest in unrealized gains or losses.
 
The following table details our foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net included in earnings (in millions):
 
  2020   2019  
Realized foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net:         
Gains (losses) on the settlement of undesignated derivatives  $ (6) $ 28 
Gains on the settlement of transactions with third parties   -   1 
Total realized foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   (6)  29 
         
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net:         
Losses on the change in fair value of undesignated derivatives and unhedged debt   (152 )  (74)
Gains (losses) on remeasurement of certain assets and liabilities   (9)  3 
Total unrealized foreign currency and derivative losses, net   (161 )  (71)
Total foreign currency and derivative losses, net  $ (167 ) $ (42)
 
See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our foreign currency and derivative financial
instrument policies and Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our derivative and nonderivative
transactions.
 
Losses on Early Extinguishment of Debt, Net
 
As discussed above, during 2020 we issued $6.2 billion of senior notes, aggregate principal in U.S. dollars, and used the proceeds to
redeem certain higher interest rate debt before maturity . This resulted in extending our weighted average remaining maturity to 10
years and lowering our weighted average ef fective interest rate to approximately 1.9% at December 31, 2020 and the recognition of
losses on early extinguishment of debt of $188 million during 2020. The losses included the extinguishment of debt assumed in the
Liberty T ransaction and the IPT T ransaction, which represented the excess of the prepayment penalties over the premium recorded
upon assumption of the debt. During 2019 we recognized $16 million of losses on early extinguishment of debt. See Note 8 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements and the Liquidity and Capital Resources section, for more information regarding our debt
repurchases.
 
Income Tax Expense
 
We recognize income tax expense related to our taxable REIT subsidiaries and in the local, state and foreign jurisdictions in which we
operate. Our current income tax expense fluctuates from period to period based primarily on the timing of our taxable income,
including
35
gains on the disposition and contribution of properties  and fees earned from the co-investment ventures . Deferred income tax
expense (benefit) is generally a function of the period’ s temporary dif ferences and the utilization of net operating losses generated in
prior years that had been previously recognized as deferred income tax assets in taxable subsidiaries.
 
The following table summarizes our income tax expense (benefit) (in millions):
 
  2020   2019  
Current income tax expense:         
Income tax expense  $ 83  $ 48 
Income tax expense on dispositions   41   15 
Income tax expense on dispositions related to acquired tax liabilities   6   - 
Total current income tax expense   130   63 
         
Deferred income tax expense (benefit):         
Income tax expense   6   12 
Income tax benefit on dispositions related to acquired tax liabilities   (6)  - 
Total deferred income tax expense   -   12 
Total income tax expense  $ 130  $ 75
 
 
Our income taxes are discussed in more detail in Note 13 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
Net Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests
 
This amount represents the third-party investors’ share of the earnings generated in consolidated entities in which we do not own
100% of the equity , reduced by the third-party share of fees or promotes payable to us and earned during the period.  We had net
earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests of $135 million and $129 million in 2020 and 2019, respectively . Included in these
amounts were $42 million and $47 million in 2020 and 2019, respectively , of net earnings attributable to the common limited
partnership unitholders of Prologis, L.P .
 
See Note 11 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on our noncontrolling interests.
 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
 
See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our foreign currency and derivative financial
instrument policies and Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our derivative and nonderivative
transactions and other comprehensive income (loss).
 
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
 
See Note 16 in the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information about environmental liabilities.
 
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
 
Overview
 
We consider our ability to generate cash from operating activities, distributions from our co-investment ventures, contributions and
dispositions of properties and available financing sources to be adequate to meet our anticipated future development, acquisition,
operating, debt service, dividend and distribution requirements.
 
Near-Term Principal Cash Sources and Uses
 
In addition to dividends and distributions, we expect our primary cash needs will consist of the following:
 
• completion of the development and leasing of the properties in our active consolidated development portfolio (at December 31,
2020, 82 properties in our development portfolio were 61.6% leased with a current investment of $1.9 billion and a TEI of $3.7
billion when completed and leased, leaving $1.8 billion of estimated additional required investment);
 
• development of new properties that we may hold for long-term investment or subsequently contribute to unconsolidated co-
investment ventures, including the acquisition of land in certain markets;
 
• capital expenditures and leasing costs on properties in our operating portfolio;
 
• repayment of debt and scheduled principal payments of $376 million in 2021;
 
• additional investments in current and future unconsolidated co-investment ventures and other ventures;
 
36
 
• acquisition of operating properties or portfolios of operating properties, (depending on market and other conditions) for direct,
long-term investment in our consolidated portfolio (this might include acquisitions from our co-investment ventures); and
 
• repurchase of our outstanding debt or equity securities (depending on prevailing market conditions, our liquidity , contractual
restrictions and other factors) through cash purchases, open-market purchases, privately negotiated transactions, tender of fers
or otherwise.
 
We expect to fund our cash needs principally from the following sources (subject to market conditions):
 
• net cash flow from property operations;
 
• fees earned for services performed on behalf of co-investment ventures, including promotes;
 
• distributions received from co-investment ventures;
 
• proceeds from disposition of properties, land parcels or other investments to third parties;
 
• proceeds from contributions of properties to current or future co-investment ventures;
 
• available unrestricted cash balances ($598 million at December 31, 2020);
 
• borrowing capacity under our current credit facility arrangements and multi-currency term loan ($4.2 billion available at
December 31, 2020);
 
• proceeds from issuance of debt; and
 
• proceeds from the sale of a portion of our investments in co-investment ventures to achieve long-term ownership targets.
 
We may also generate proceeds from the issuance of equity securities, subject to market conditions.
 
Debt
 
The following table summarizes information about our consolidated debt by currency at December 31 (dollars in millions):
 
  2020   2019  
  Weighted
Average
Interest Rate   Amount
Outstanding   % of
Total   Weighted
Average
Interest Rate   Amount
Outstanding   % of T otal 
British pound sterling   2.2% $ 1,019    6.1%  2.3% $ 657   5.5%
Canadian dollar   2.7%  286   1.7%  3.4%  280   2.3%
Euro   1.4%  6,550    38.8%  1.9%  6,129    51.5%
Japanese yen   0.8%  2,877    17.1%  0.7%  2,329    19.6%
U.S. dollar   2.8%  6,117    36.3%  4.4%  2,511    21.1%
Total debt (1)   1.9% $ 16,849        2.2% $ 11,906     
 
 
(1) The weighted average maturity for total debt outstanding at December 31, 2020 and 2019 was 122 and 94 months, respectively .
Of the amount of debt outstanding at December 31, 2020, $13.6 billion matures after 2025. Our refinancing activities in 2020
significantly lengthened the maturity of our senior notes.  
 
Our credit ratings at December 31, 2020, were A3 from Moody’ s and A- from Standard & Poor ’s, both with stable outlook. These
ratings allow us to borrow at an advantageous interest rate. Adverse changes in our credit ratings could negatively impact our
business and, in particular , our refinancing and other capital market activities, our ability to manage debt maturities, our future growth
and our development and acquisition activity . A securities rating is not a recommendation to buy , sell or hold securities and is subject
to revision or withdrawal at any time by the rating organization.
 
At December 31, 2020, we were in compliance with all of our financial debt covenants. These covenants include customary financial
covenants for total debt, encumbered debt and fixed charge coverage ratios.
 
See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion on our debt.
 
Equity Commitments Related to Certain Co-Investment Ventures
 
Certain co-investment ventures have equity commitments from us and our venture partners. Our venture partners fulfill their equity
commitment with cash. W e may fulfill our equity commitment through contributions of properties or cash.
 
37
 
The following table summarizes the remaining equity commitments at December 31, 2020 (in millions):
 
  Equity Commitments (1)    
  Prologis   Venture Partners   Total   Expiration Date
Prologis T argeted U.S. Logistics Fund  $ -  $ 763  $ 763  2023 (2)
Prologis European Logistics Fund   -   1,813    1,813   2022 – 2023 (2)
Prologis UK Logistics V enture   8   49   57  2024
Prologis China Core Logistics Fund   -   115   115  2022 – 2023
Prologis China Logistics V enture   289   1,636    1,925   2021 – 2028
Prologis Brazil Logistics V enture   49   195   244  2026 – 2027
Total  $ 346  $ 4,571   $ 4,917    
 
(1) The equity commitments for co-investment ventures that operate in a dif ferent functional currency than the U.S. dollar are
calculated using the foreign currency exchange rate at December 31, 2020.
 
(2) Venture partners have the option to cancel their equity commitment up to 18 months after the initial commitment date.
 
See the Cash Flow Summary below for more information about our investment activity in the unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
Unconsolidated Co-Investment Venture Debt
 
We had investments in and advances to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures, at December 31, 2020, of $6.7 billion. The
ventures listed below had total third-party debt of $11.8 billion at December 31, 2020. Certain of our ventures do not have third-party
debt and are therefore excluded. This debt is non-recourse to Prologis and other investors in the co-investment ventures and matures
and bears interest as follows at December 31, 2020 (dollars in millions):
 
  Total (1)  Weighted A verage Interest
Rate   Gross Book V alue (1)  Ownership %  
Prologis T argeted U.S. Logistics
Fund  $3,129   3.2%   $ 11,395   25.6%  
FIBRA Prologis   854  3.4%    2,573   46.8%  
Prologis European Logistics Fund   3,389   2.1%    12,941   24.3%  
Prologis UK Logistics V enture   613  3.1%    990  15.0%  
Nippon Prologis REIT   2,504   0.7%    6,831   15.1%  
Prologis China Core Logistics Fund   721  5.6%    2,128   15.8%  
Prologis China Logistics V enture   606  2.9%    1,208   15.0%  
Total  $11,816       $ 38,066     
 
 
(1) The weighted average loan-to-value ratio for all unconsolidated co-investment ventures was 27.4% at December 31, 2020.
Loan-to-value, a non-GAAP measure, was calculated as the percentage of total third-party debt to the gross book value of real
estate for each venture and weighted based on the cumulative gross book value of all unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
At December 31, 2020, we did not guarantee any third-party debt of the unconsolidated co-investment ventures. In our role as the
manager or sponsor , we work with the co-investment ventures to maintain suf ficient liquidity and refinance their maturing debt. There
can be no assurance that the co-investment ventures will be able to refinance any maturing indebtedness on terms as favorable as
the maturing debt, or at all. If the ventures are unable to refinance the maturing indebtedness with newly issued debt, they may be
able to obtain funds by voluntary capital contributions from us and our partners or by selling assets. Certain of our ventures also have
credit facilities, or unencumbered properties, both of which may be used to obtain funds.
 
Cash Flow Summary
 
The following table summarizes our cash flow activity (in millions):
 
  2020   2019  
Net cash provided by operating activities  $ 2,937   $ 2,264  
Net cash used in investing activities  $ (3,074 ) $ (685 )
Net cash used in financing activities  $ (372 ) $ (840 )
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents, including the ef fect of foreign
    currency exchange rates  $ (491 ) $ 745
 
 
38
 
Operating Activities
 
Cash provided by operating activities, exclusive of changes in receivables and payables, was impacted by the following significant
activities:
 
• Real estate operations. We receive the majority of our operating cash through the net revenues of our Real Estate Operations
segment. See the Results of Operations section above for further explanation on our Real Estate Operations segment. The
revenues from this segment include noncash adjustments for straight-lined rents and amortization of above and below market
leases of $126 million and $98 million for 2020 and 2019, respectively .
 
• Strategic capital.  We also generate operating cash through our Strategic Capital segment by providing asset and property
management and other services to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures. See the Results of Operations section above for
the key drivers of the net revenues from our Strategic Capital segment. Included in Strategic Capital Revenues  is the third-party
investors’ share that is owed for promotes, which is recognized in operating activities in the period the cash is received.
 
• G&A expenses and equity-based compensation awards.  We incurred $275 million and $266 million of G&A costs in 2020
and 2019, respectively . We recognized equity-based, noncash compensation expenses of $110 million and $98 million in 2020
and 2019, respectively , which were recorded to Rental Expenses in the Real Estate Operations segment, Strategic Capital
Expenses in the Strategic Capital segment and G&A Expenses.
 
• Operating distributions from unconsolidated entities.  We received $451 million and $347 million of distributions as a return
on our investment from the cash flows generated from the operations of our unconsolidated entities in 2020 and 2019,
respectively .
 
• Cash paid for interest, net of amounts capitalized.  We paid interest, net of amounts capitalized, of $309 million and $214
million in 2020 and 2019, respectively . See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on this
activity .
 
• Cash paid for income taxes, net of refunds.  We paid income taxes, net of refunds, of $101 million and $62 million in 2020
and 2019, respectively . See Note 13 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on this activity .
 
Investing Activities
 
Cash provided by investing activities is driven by proceeds from contributions and dispositions of real estate properties. Cash used in
investing activities is primarily driven by our capital deployment activities of investing in real estate development, acquisitions and
capital expenditures. See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on these activities. In addition, the
following significant transactions also impacted our cash provided by or used in investing activities:  
 
• Liberty T ransaction, net of cash acquired . We paid net cash of $29 million to complete the Liberty T ransaction in 2020,
primarily due to transaction costs. The acquisition was financed through the issuance of equity and the assumption of debt. A
portion of this debt was paid down subsequent to the acquisition, as noted in the Financing Activities section below . See Note 3
to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information on this transaction.
 
• IPT T ransaction, net of cash acquired . Our consolidated co-investment venture, USL V, acquired real estate assets from IPT
for a cash purchase price of $1.7 billion. Our partner in USL V contributed their share of the purchase price, $917 million, which
is presented in Noncontrolling Interests Contributions  in financing activities. All of the debt assumed was paid down subsequent
to the acquisition, as noted in the Financing Activities section below . See Notes 4 and 11 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements for more information on this transaction.
 
• Investments in and advances to our unconsolidated entities.  We invested cash in our unconsolidated entities that
represented our proportionate share, of $386 million and $276 million in 2020 and 2019, respectively . The ventures used the
funds for the acquisition of properties, development and repayment of debt. See Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements for more detail on our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
• Return of investment. We received distributions from unconsolidated entities as a return of investment of $257 million and
$389 million during 2020 and 2019, respectively . Included in these amounts were distributions from venture activities including
proceeds from property sales, debt refinancing and the redemption of our investment in certain unconsolidated entities.
 
• Settlement of net investment hedges . We paid net cash of $7 million for the settlement of net investment hedges in each of
2020 and 2019. See Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on our derivative transactions.
 
39
 
Financing Activities
 
Cash provided by and used in financing activities is principally driven by proceeds from and payments on credit facilities and other
debt, along with dividends paid on common and preferred stock and noncontrolling interest contributions and distributions.  In addition,
the following significant transactions also impacted our cash provided by or used in financing activities:
 
•Repurchase of common and preferred stock . We paid $35 million and $7 million to repurchase common shares and shares of
Series Q preferred stock, respectively , during 2020.
 
Our repurchase of and payments on debt and proceeds from the issuance of debt consisted of the following activity (in millions):
 
  2020 (1)  2019  
Repurchase of and payments on debt (including extinguishment costs)         
Regularly scheduled debt principal payments and payments at maturity  $ 10  $ 29 
Secured mortgage debt   565   433 
Senior notes   4,856    669 
Term loans   1,351    2,171  
Total  $ 6,782   $ 3,302  
         
Proceeds from the issuance of debt         
Secured mortgage debt  $ 155  $ 250 
Senior notes   6,170    2,053  
Term loans   1,500    1,674  
Total  $ 7,825   $ 3,977
 
 
(1) We completed the Liberty T ransaction in 2020 and assumed $2.8 billion of debt, of which $1.8 billion was paid of f with the
proceeds from the issuance of senior notes. USL V assumed $342 million of debt in the IPT T ransaction, all of which was paid of f
at closing. The assumption of debt was excluded from the table above. See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for
more information.
 
Distribution and Dividend Requirements
 
Our dividend policy on our common stock is to distribute a percentage of our cash flow to ensure that we will meet the dividend
requirements of the IRC, relative to maintaining our REIT status, while still allowing us to retain cash to fund capital improvements and
other investment activities.
 
Under the IRC, REIT s may be subject to certain federal income and excise taxes on undistributed taxable income.
 
We paid quarterly cash dividends of $0.58 and $0.53 per common share in 2020 and 2019, respectively . Our future common stock
dividends, if and as declared, may vary and will be determined by the Board based upon the circumstances prevailing at the time,
including our financial condition, operating results and REIT distribution requirements, and may be adjusted at the discretion of the
Board during the year .
 
We make distributions on the common limited partnership units outstanding at the same per unit amount as our common stock
dividend. The Class A Units in the OP are entitled to a quarterly distribution equal to $0.64665 per unit so long as the common units
receive a quarterly distribution of at least $0.40 per unit. W e paid a quarterly cash distribution of $0.64665 per Class A Unit in 2020
and 2019.
 
At December 31, 2020, we had 1.3 million shares of Series Q preferred stock outstanding with a liquidation preference of $50 per
share. The annual dividend rate is 8.54% per share and dividends are payable quarterly in arrears. Pursuant to the terms of our
preferred stock, we are restricted from declaring or paying any dividend with respect to our common stock unless and until all
cumulative dividends with respect to the preferred stock have been paid and suf ficient funds have been set aside for dividends that
have been declared for the relevant dividend period with respect to the preferred stock.
 
Other Commitments
 
On an ongoing basis, we are engaged in various stages of negotiations for the acquisition or disposition of individual properties or
portfolios of properties.
 
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES
 
A critical accounting policy is one that involves an estimate or assumption that is subjective and requires management judgment about
the ef fect of a matter that is inherently uncertain and material to an entity’ s financial condition and results of operations. Management’ s
judgment considers historical and current economic conditions and expectations for the future. Changes in estimates could af fect our
financial position and specific items in our results of operations that are used by stockholders, potential investors, industry analysts
and lenders in their evaluation of our performance. Of the significant accounting policies discussed in Note 2 to the Consolidated
Financial
40
Statements, those presented below have been identified by us as meeting the criteria to be considered critical accounting policies.
Refer to Not e 2 for more information on these critical accounting policies.
 
Asset Acquisitions
 
We generally account for an acquisition of a single property or portfolio of properties as an asset acquisition. W e measure the real
estate assets acquired through an asset acquisition based on their cost or total consideration exchanged and any excess
consideration or bargain purchase amount is allocated to the real estate properties and related lease intangibles on a relative fair
value basis. Assets we do not intend to hold long-term are recorded at fair value. At a property-level, we allocate the fair value to the
components which include building, land, improvements, and intangible assets or liabilities related to acquired leases. The most
significant portion of the allocation is to building and land and requires the use of market based estimates and assumptions.
 
The purchase price allocation is based on the expected future cash flows of the property and various characteristics of the markets
where the property is located utilizing an income approach methodology , which may be a discounted cash flow analysis or applying a
capitalization rate to the estimated NOI of a property . Key assumptions include market rents, growth rates, and discount and
capitalization rates. Estimates of future cash flows are based on a number of factors including historical operating results, known
trends and market and economic conditions. W e determine discount and capitalization rates by market based on recent transactions
and other market data and adjust if necessary , based on the property characteristics. The fair value of land is generally based on
relevant market data, such as a comparison of the subject site to similar parcels that have recently been sold or are currently being
offered on the market for sale. The use of dif ferent assumptions to value the acquired properties and allocate the most significant
portion of the property value between the building and land could af fect the expenses we recognize over the estimated remaining
useful life.
 
Recoverability of Real Estate Assets
 
We assess the carrying values of our respective long-lived assets whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the
carrying amounts of these assets may not be fully recoverable. This assessment is primarily triggered based on the shortening of the
expected hold period due to our change in intent to sell a property in the near term. W e have processes to monitor our intent with
regard to our investments and the estimated disposition value in comparison to the current carrying value. If our assessment of
potential triggering events indicates that the carrying value of a property that we expect to sell in the near term is not recoverable, we
recognize an impairment charge for the amount by which the carrying value exceeds the current estimated fair value of the property .
We determine the fair value of the property based on the proceeds from disposition that are estimated based on quoted market
values, third-party appraisals or discounted cash flow models that utilize the future net rental income of the property and expected
market capitalization rates. The use of projected future cash flows is based on assumptions that are consistent with our estimates of
future expectations and the strategic plan we use to manage our underlying business. Changes in economic and operating conditions
could impact our intent and the assumptions used in determining the fair value that could result in future impairment.
 
NEW ACCOUNTING PRONOUNCEMENTS
 
See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
FUNDS FROM OPERATIONS ATTRIBUTABLE TO COMMON STOCKHOLDERS/UNITHOLDERS (“FFO”)
 
FFO is a non-GAAP financial measure that is commonly used in the real estate industry . The most directly comparable GAAP
measure to FFO is net earnings.
 
The National Association of Real Estate Investment T rusts (“NAREIT”) defines FFO as earnings computed under GAAP to exclude
historical cost depreciation and gains and losses from the sales, along with impairment charges, of previously depreciated properties.
We also exclude the gains on revaluation of equity investments upon acquisition of a controlling interest and the gain recognized from
a partial sale of our investment, as these are similar to gains from the sales of previously depreciated properties. W e exclude similar
adjustments from our unconsolidated entities and the third parties’ share of our consolidated co-investment ventures.
 
Our FFO Measures
 
Our FFO measures begin with NAREIT’ s definition and we make certain adjustments to reflect our business and the way that
management plans and executes our business strategy . While not infrequent or unusual, the additional items we adjust for in
calculating FFO, as modified by Prologis and Core FFO , both as defined below , are subject to significant fluctuations from period to
period. Although these items may have a material impact on our operations and are reflected in our financial statements, the removal
of the ef fects of these items allows us to better understand the core operating performance of our properties over the long term. These
items have both positive and negative short-term ef fects on our results of operations in inconsistent and unpredictable directions that
are not relevant to our long-term outlook.
 
We calculate our FFO measures, as defined below , based on our proportionate ownership share of both our unconsolidated and
consolidated ventures. W e reflect our share of our FFO measures for unconsolidated ventures by applying our average ownership
percentage for the period to the applicable reconciling items on an entity by entity basis. W e reflect our share for consolidated
ventures in which we do not own 100% of the equity by adjusting our FFO measures to remove the noncontrolling interests share of
the applicable reconciling items based on our average ownership percentage for the applicable periods.
 
41
 
These FFO measures are used by management as supplemental financial measures of operating performance and we believe that it
is important that stockholders, potential investors and financial analysts understand the measures management uses. W e do not use
our FFO measures as, nor should they be considered to be, alternatives to net earnings computed under GAAP , as indicators of our
operating performance, as alternatives to cash from operating activities computed under GAAP or as indicators of our ability to fund
our cash needs.
 
We analyze our operating performance principally by the rental revenue of our real estate and the revenues from our strategic capital
business, net of operating, administrative and financing expenses. This income stream is not directly impacted by fluctuations in the
market value of our investments in real estate or debt securities.
 
FFO, as modified by Prologis attributable to common stockholders/unitholders (“FFO, as modified by Prologis”)
 
To arrive at FFO, as modified by Prologis , we adjust the NAREIT defined FFO measure to exclude the impact of foreign currency
related items and deferred tax, specifically:
 
• deferred income tax benefits and deferred income tax expenses recognized by our subsidiaries;
 
• current income tax expense related to acquired tax liabilities that were recorded as deferred tax liabilities in an acquisition, to the
extent the expense is of fset with a deferred income tax benefit in earnings that is excluded from our defined FFO measure; and
 
• foreign currency exchange gains and losses resulting from (i) debt transactions between us and our foreign entities, (ii) third-
party debt that is used to hedge our investment in foreign entities, (iii) derivative financial instruments related to any such debt
transactions, and (iv) mark-to-market adjustments associated with other derivative financial instruments.
 
We use FFO, as modified by Prologis , so that management, analysts and investors are able to evaluate our performance against
other REIT s that do not have similar operations or operations in jurisdictions outside the U.S.
 
Core FFO attributable to common stockholders/unitholders (“Core FFO”)
 
In addition to FFO, as modified by Prologis , we also use Core FFO.  To arrive at Core FFO, we adjust FFO, as modified by Prologis , to
exclude the following recurring and nonrecurring items that we recognized directly in FFO, as modified by Prologis :
 
• gains or losses from the disposition of land and development properties that were developed with the intent to contribute or sell;
 
• income tax expense related to the sale of investments in real estate;
 
• impairment charges recognized related to our investments in real estate generally as a result of our change in intent to
contribute or sell these properties;
 
• gains or losses from the early extinguishment of debt and redemption and repurchase of preferred stock; and
 
• expenses related to natural disasters.
 
We use Core FFO , including by segment and geographies, to: (i) assess our operating performance as compared to other real estate
companies; (ii) evaluate our performance and the performance of our properties in comparison with expected results and results of
previous periods; (iii) evaluate the performance of our management; (iv) budget and forecast future results to assist in the allocation of
resources; (v) provide guidance to the financial markets to understand our expected operating performance; and (vi) evaluate how a
specific potential investment will impact our future results.
 
Limitations on the use of our FFO measures
 
While we believe our modified FFO measures are important supplemental measures, neither NAREIT’ s nor our measures of FFO
should be used alone because they exclude significant economic components of net earnings computed under GAAP and are,
therefore, limited as an analytical tool. Accordingly , these are only a few of the many measures we use when analyzing our business.
Some of the limitations are:
 
• The current income tax expenses that are excluded from our modified FFO measures represent the taxes that are payable.
 
• Depreciation and amortization of real estate assets are economic costs that are excluded from FFO. FFO is limited, as it does
not reflect the cash requirements that may be necessary for future replacements of the real estate assets. Furthermore, the
amortization of capital expenditures and leasing costs necessary to maintain the operating performance of logistics facilities are
not reflected in FFO.
 
• Gains or losses from property dispositions and impairment charges related to expected dispositions represent changes in value
of the properties. By excluding these gains and losses, FFO does not capture realized changes in the value of disposed
properties arising from changes in market conditions.
 
42
 
• The deferred income tax benefits and expenses that are excluded from our modified FFO measures result from the creation of a
deferred income tax asset or liability that may have to be settled at some future point. Our modified FFO measures do not
currently reflect any income or expense that may result from such settlement.
 
• The foreign currency exchange gains and losses that are excluded from our modified FFO measures are generally recognized
based on movements in foreign currency exchange rates through a specific point in time. The ultimate settlement of our foreign
currency-denominated net assets is indefinite as to timing and amount. Our FFO measures are limited in that they do not reflect
the current period changes in these net assets that result from periodic foreign currency exchange rate movements.
 
• The gains and losses on extinguishment of debt or preferred stock that we exclude from our Core FFO, may provide a benefit or
cost to us as we may be settling our obligation at less or more than our future obligation.
 
• The natural disaster expenses that we exclude from Core FFO are costs that we have incurred.
 
We compensate for these limitations by using our FFO measures only in conjunction with net earnings computed under GAAP when
making our decisions. This information should be read with our complete Consolidated Financial Statements prepared under GAAP .
To assist investors in compensating for these limitations, we reconcile our modified FFO measures to our net earnings computed
under GAAP as follows (in millions):
 
  2020   2019  
Reconciliation of net earnings attributable to common stockholders to FFO measures:         
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $ 1,473   $ 1,567  
         
Add (deduct) NAREIT defined adjustments:         
Real estate related depreciation and amortization   1,523    1,102  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   (252 )  (390 )
Reconciling items related to noncontrolling interests   (57)  (8)
Our share of reconciling items included in earnings related to unconsolidated entities   268   246 
NAREIT defined FFO attributable to common stockholders/unitholders   2,955    2,517  
         
Add (deduct) our defined adjustments:         
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative losses, net   161   69 
Deferred income tax expense   -   12 
Current income tax expense on dispositions related to acquired tax liabilities   6   - 
Reconciling items related to noncontrolling interests   (2)  - 
Our share of reconciling items included in earnings related to unconsolidated entities   -   (7)
FFO, as modified by Prologis attributable to common stockholders/unitholders   3,120    2,591  
         
Adjustments to arrive at Core FFO:         
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   (465 )  (468 )
Current income tax expense on dispositions   41   15 
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, preferred stock repurchase and other , net   199   16 
Reconciling items related to noncontrolling interests   (3)  - 
Our share of reconciling items included in earnings related to unconsolidated entities   (28)  10 
Core FFO attributable to common stockholders/unitholders  $ 2,864   $ 2,164
 
 
ITEM 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk
 
We are exposed to the impact of foreign exchange-related variability and earnings volatility on our foreign investments and interest
rate changes. See our risk factors in Item 1A. Risk Factors, specifically Risks Related to our Global Operations and Risks Related to
Financing and Capital. See also Notes 2 and 15 in the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and
Supplementary Data for more information about our foreign operations and derivative financial instruments.
 
We monitor our market risk exposures using a sensitivity analysis. Our sensitivity analysis estimates the exposure to market risk
sensitive instruments assuming a hypothetical 10% adverse change in foreign currency exchange rates or interest rates at December
31, 2020. The results of the sensitivity analysis are summarized in the following sections. The sensitivity analysis is of limited
predictive value. As a result, revenues and expenses, as well as our ultimate realized gains or losses with respect to foreign currency
exchange rate and interest rate fluctuations will depend on the exposures that arise during a future period, hedging strategies at the
time and the prevailing foreign currency exchange rates and interest rates.
 
Foreign Currency Risk
 
We are exposed to foreign currency exchange variability related to investments in and earnings from our foreign investments. Foreign
currency market risk is the possibility that our results of operations or financial position could be better or worse than planned because
of changes in foreign currency exchange rates. W e primarily hedge our foreign currency risk by borrowing in the currencies in which
we invest thereby providing a natural hedge. Additionally , we hedge our foreign currency risk by entering into derivative financial
43
instruments  that we designate  as net investment hedges, as these amounts of fset the translation adjustments on the underlying net
assets of our foreign investments.  At December 31, 20 20, after consideration of our ability to borrow in the foreign currencies in which
we invest and also derivative and nonderivative financial instruments as discussed in Note 1 5 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, we had minimal net equity denominated in a currency other than the U.S. dollar .
 
For the year ended December 31, 2020, $442 million or 10.0% of our total consolidated revenue was denominated in foreign
currencies. W e enter into other foreign currency contracts, such as forwards, to reduce fluctuations in foreign currency associated with
the translation of the future earnings of our international subsidiaries. W e have forward contracts that were not designated as hedges,
denominated principally in British pound sterling, Canadian dollar , euro and Japanese yen, and have an aggregate notional amount of
$1.2 billion to mitigate risk associated with the translation of the future earnings of our subsidiaries denominated in these currencies.
The gain or loss on settlement of these contracts is included in our earnings and of fsets the lower or higher translation of earnings
from our investments denominated in currencies other than the U.S. dollar . Although the impact to net earnings is mitigated through
higher translated U.S. dollar earnings from these currencies, a weakening of the U.S. dollar against these currencies by 10% could
result in a $116 million cash payment on settlement of these contracts.
 
Interest Rate Risk
 
We are also exposed to the impact of interest rate changes on future earnings and cash flows. T o mitigate that risk, we generally
borrow with fixed rate debt and we may use derivative instruments to fix the interest rate on our variable rate debt. At December 31,
2020, $14.9 billion of our debt bore interest at fixed rates and therefore the fair value of these instruments was af fected by changes in
market interest rates. At December 31, 2020, $2.0 billion of our debt bore interest at variable rates. The following table summarizes
the future repayment of debt and scheduled principal payments at December 31, 2020 (dollars in millions):
 
 2021   2022   2023   2024   Thereafter   Total   Fair V alue  
Fixed rate debt (1) $271  $196  $ 34  $869  $13,505   $14,875   $16,034  
Weighted average interest
rate (2)  1.8%   0.6%   4.5%   4.2%   2.0%   2.1%     
                            
Variable rate debt                            
Credit facilities $ -  $ -  $172  $ -  $ -  $ 172  $ 172 
Secured mortgage debt  105   63   -   136   -   304   304 
Senior notes  -   368   -   -   -   368   370 
Term loans  -   -   134   -   1,067    1,201    1,204  
Total variable rate debt $105  $431  $306  $136  $ 1,067   $ 2,045   $ 2,050
 
 
(1) At December 31, 2020, we had interest rate swap agreements to fix €150 million ($165 million) of our floating rate euro senior
notes and $250 million of our multi-currency term loan, both of which were included in fixed rate debt.
 
(2) The interest rates represent the ef fective interest rates (including amortization of the debt issuance costs and the noncash
premiums and discounts) at December 31, 2020 for the debt outstanding .
 
At December 31, 2020, the weighted average ef fective interest rate on our variable rate debt was 0.5%. Changes in interest rates can
cause interest expense to fluctuate on our variable rate debt. On the basis of our sensitivity analysis, a 10% increase in interest rates
on our average outstanding variable rate debt balances would result in additional annual interest expense of $1 million for the year
ended December 31, 2020, which equates to a change in interest rates of 5 basis points on our average outstanding variable rate
debt balances and 1 basis point on our average total debt portfolio balances.
 
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
 
The Consolidated Balance Sheets of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P . at December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Consolidated Statements
of Income of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis,
L.P., the Consolidated Statements of Equity of Prologis, Inc., the Consolidated Statements of Capital of Prologis, L.P . and the
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P . for each of the years in the three-year period ended
December 31, 2020, Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements and Schedule III — Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation,
together with the reports of KPMG LLP , independent registered public accounting firm, are included under Item 15 of this report and
are incorporated herein by reference. Selected unaudited quarterly financial data are voluntarily presented in Note 19 of the
Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
ITEM 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
 
None.
 
ITEM 9A. Controls and Procedures
 
Controls and Procedures (Prologis, Inc.)
 
Prologis, Inc. carried out an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Of ficer, of the ef fectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under
the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the “Exchange Act”)) at December 31, 2020. Based on this evaluation, the Chief Executive
44
Officer and the Chief Financial Of ficer have concluded that the disclosure controls and procedures are ef fective to ensure that
information required to be disclosed by us in reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed,
summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the SEC rules and forms. Subsequent to December 31, 2020, there
were no significant changes in the internal controls or in other factors that could significantly af fect these controls, including any
corrective actions with regard to significant deficiencies and material weaknesses.
 
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
There has been no change in our internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15(d)-15(f)
under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2020, that has materially af fected, or is reasonably
likely to materially af fect, our internal control over financial reporting.
 
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
We are responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting as defined in Rules 13a-15(f)
and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act.
 
Under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer, an
evaluation of the ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting was conducted at December 31, 2020, based on the
criteria described in “Internal Control — Integrated Framework” (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission. Based on this assessment, management determined that, at December 31, 2020, the internal control over
financial reporting was ef fective.
 
Our internal control over financial reporting at December 31, 2020, has been audited by KPMG LLP , an independent registered public
accounting firm, as stated in their attestation report, which is included herein.
 
Limitations of the Effectiveness of Controls
 
Management’ s assessment included an evaluation of the design of the internal control over financial reporting and testing of the
operational ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting. The internal control over financial reporting is a process
designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external purposes in accordance with GAAP . Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not
prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of ef fectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures
may deteriorate.
 
Controls and Procedures (Prologis, L.P.)
 
Prologis, L.P . carried out an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Of ficer, of the ef fectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under
the Exchange Act) at December 31, 2020. Based on this evaluation, the Chief Executive Of ficer and the Chief Financial Of ficer have
concluded that the disclosure controls and procedures are ef fective to ensure that information required to be disclosed by us in reports
that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in
the SEC rules and forms. Subsequent to December 31, 2020, there were no significant changes in the internal controls or in other
factors that could significantly af fect these controls, including any corrective actions with regard to significant deficiencies and material
weaknesses.
 
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
There has been no change in our internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15(d)-15(f)
under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2020, that has materially af fected, or is reasonably
likely to materially af fect, our internal control over financial reporting.
 
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
We are responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting as defined in Rules 13a-15(f)
and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act.
 
Under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer, an
evaluation of the ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting was conducted at December 31, 2020, based on the
criteria described in “Internal Control — Integrated Framework” (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission. Based on this assessment, management determined that, at December 31, 2020, the internal control over
financial reporting was ef fective.
 
Limitations of the Effectiveness of Controls
 
Management’ s assessment included an evaluation of the design of the internal control over financial reporting and testing of the
operational ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting. The internal control over financial reporting is a process
45
designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external purposes in accordance with GAAP . Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not
prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of ef fectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures
may deteriorate.
 
ITEM 9B. Other Information
 
None.
 
PART III
 
ITEM 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to, including relevant sections in our 2021 Proxy Statement,
under the captions entitled Board of Directors and Corporate Governance; Executive Of ficers; Executive Compensation; Director
Compensation; Security Ownership; Equity Compensation Plans and Additional Information or will be provided in an amendment filed
on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 11. Executive Compensation
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2021 Proxy Statement, under
the captions entitled Board of Directors and Corporate Governance; Executive Of ficers; Executive Compensation and Director
Compensation or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2021 Proxy Statement, under
the captions entitled Security Ownership and Equity Compensation Plans or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 13. Certain Relationships and Related T ransactions, and Director Independence
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2021 Proxy Statement, under
the caption entitled Board of Directors and Corporate Governance or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2021 Proxy Statement, under
the caption entitled Audit Matters or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
PART IV
 
ITEM 15. Exhibits, Financial Statements and Schedules
 
The following documents are filed as a part of this report:
 
(a) Financial Statements and Schedules:
 
1. Financial Statements:
 
See Index to the Consolidated Financial Statements and Schedule III on page 48 of this report, which is incorporated herein
by reference.
 
2. Financial Statement Schedules:
 
Schedule III — Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
 
All other schedules have been omitted since the required information is presented in the Consolidated Financial Statements and the
related notes or is not applicable.
 
(b) Exhibits: The Exhibits required by Item 601 of Regulation S-K are listed in the Index to the Exhibits on pages 103 to 112 of this
report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(c) Financial Statements: See Index to the Consolidated Financial Statements and Schedule III on page 48 of this report, which is
incorporated by reference.
46
 
ITEM 16. Form 10-K Summary
 
Not Applicable.
47
INDEX T O THE CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL ST ATEMENTS AND SCHEDULE III
 
 Page
Number
Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .:  
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 49
Prologis, Inc.:  
Consolidated Balance Sheets 52
Consolidated Statements of Income 53
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 54
Consolidated Statements of Equity 55
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 56
Prologis, L.P .:  
Consolidated Balance Sheets 57
Consolidated Statements of Income 58
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 59
Consolidated Statements of Capital 60
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 61
Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .:  
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements 62
     Note 1. Description of the Business 62
     Note 2. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies 62
     Note 3. Acquisitions 69
     Note 4. Real Estate 71
     Note 5. Unconsolidated Entities 73
     Note 6. Assets Held for Sale or Contribution 76
     Note 7. Other Assets and Other Liabilities 76
     Note 8. Debt 77
     Note 9. Stockholders' Equity of Prologis, Inc. 81
     Note 10. Partners' Capital of Prologis, L.P . 82
     Note 11. Noncontrolling Interests 82
     Note 12. Long-T erm Compensation 83
     Note 13. Income T axes 86
     Note 14. Earnings Per Common Share or Unit 89
     Note 15. Financial Instruments and Fair V alue Measurements 90
     Note 16. Commitments and Contingencies 93
     Note 17. Business Segments 94
     Note 18. Supplemental Cash Flow Information 96
     Note 19. Selected Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited) 98
Schedule III — Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation 100
 
48
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
 
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors
Prologis, Inc.:
 
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
 
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Prologis, Inc. and subsidiaries (the Company) as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the related
consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, equity, and cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2020, and the related
notes and financial statement schedule III (collectively, the consolidated financial statements). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all
material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the years in the
three-year period ended December 31, 2020, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
 
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission, and our report dated February 10, 2021 expressed an unqualified opinion on the effectiveness of the Company’s internal
control over financial reporting.
 
Change in Accounting Principle
 
As discussed in Notes 2 and 4 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company has changed its method of accounting for leases as of January 1, 2019 due to the
adoption of Accounting Standards Codification Topic 842, Leases.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these consolidated financial
statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance
with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance
about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess
the risks of material misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included
evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
Critical Audit Matters
 
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial statements that were communicated or required
to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (2) involved our
especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts
or disclosures to which they relate.
 
Liberty Transaction
 
As discussed in Note 3 to the consolidated financial statements, on February 4, 2020 Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P. acquired Liberty Property Trust and Liberty
Property Limited Partnership (collectively the “Liberty Transaction”) for $13.0 billion and the transaction was accounted for as an asset acquisition. In asset
acquisitions, the Company measures the real estate assets acquired based on their cost or total consideration exchanged and any excess consideration is allocated to
the real estate properties, excluding those identified as held for sale, on a relative fair value basis. The components of the acquisition include an initial allocation to
investments in real estate properties acquired based on fair value and an initial allocation of that fair value to buildings and land. 
 
We identified the evaluation of the fair value allocated to investments in real estate properties acquired, including the allocation of the property fair value to land and
building, in the Liberty Transaction as a critical audit matter. Evaluating the fair value amounts estimated by the Company in the allocation, which have measurement
uncertainty, required specialized skill and knowledge. Specifically, testing significant assumptions of market rents and capitalization rates in relation to investments in
real estate and testing the allocation of property fair value to land and building.
 
The following are the primary procedures we performed to address this critical audit matter. We evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of certain
internal controls over the Company’s fair value estimation process for investments in real estate properties, land and building. This included controls related to the
determination of amounts allocated to land and building and significant assumptions used to estimate the fair value of investments in real estate properties. For a
selection of investments in real estate properties we involved valuation professionals with specialized skills and knowledge, who assisted in 1) comparing the
Company’s determination of the fair value of investments in real estate properties to sales prices from available property sales, 2) comparing the Company’s significant
assumptions used in the determination of the fair value of investments in real estate properties to available leasing information, industry research publications and
inquiries of market participants, 3) comparing the Company’s determination of the fair value of land to sales prices from available land sales and 4) comparing the
Company’s determination of fair value of building to developed ranges of estimates based on market data, such as industry guides used for developing replacement
building values.
 
Assessment of the Company’s evaluation of the expected holding period for operating properties
 
As discussed in Notes 2 and 4, the Company had $43,508 million of operating properties as of December 31, 2020. The Company tests the recoverability of operating
properties whenever events or changes in circumstances, including shortening the expected holding period of such assets, indicate that the carrying amount of these
assets may not be recoverable.
 
We identified the assessment of the Company’s evaluation of the expected holding period for operating properties as a critical audit matter. Subjective auditor
judgment was required to assess the relevant events or changes in circumstances that the Company used to evaluate its expected holding period. A shortening of the
expected holding period could indicate a potential impairment.
 
The following are the primary procedures we performed to address this critical audit matter. We evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of certain
internal controls over the Company’s recoverability of operating properties process including controls related to determining the expected holding period and any
related changes. We evaluated the Company’s expected holding period by inquiring of the Company regarding changes to the expected holding period, considering
certain factors related to the current economic environment, reading minutes of the meetings of the Company’s Board of Directors, reading external communications
with investors and analysts, and analyzing documents prepared by the Company regarding proposed real estate transactions and potential triggering events.
 
/s/ KPMG LLP
 
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 2002.
 
Denver, Colorado
February 10, 2021
49
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
 
To the Partners of Prologis, L.P. and the Board of Directors of Prologis, Inc.:
 
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
 
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Prologis, L.P. and subsidiaries (the Operating Partnership) as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the
related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, capital, and cash flows for each of the years in the three‑year period ended December 31, 2020, and the
related notes and financial statement schedule III (collectively, the consolidated financial statements). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly, in
all material respects, the financial position of the Operating Partnership as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of
the years in the three‑year period ended December 31, 2020, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
 
Change in Accounting Principle
 
As discussed in Notes 2 and 4 to the consolidated financial statements, the Operating Partnership has changed its method of accounting for leases as of January 1, 2019
due to the adoption of Accounting Standards Codification Topic 842, Leases.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Operating Partnership’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these consolidated
financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are
required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and
Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance
about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. The Operating Partnership is not required to have, nor
were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over
financial reporting but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly,
we express no such opinion.
 
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and
performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the
consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating
the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
Critical Audit Matters
 
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial statements that were communicated or required
to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (2) involved our
especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts
or disclosures to which they relate.
Liberty Transaction
 
As discussed in Note 3 to the consolidated financial statements, on February 4, 2020 Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P. acquired Liberty Property Trust and Liberty
Property Limited Partnership (collectively the “Liberty Transaction”) for $13.0 billion and the transaction was accounted for as an asset acquisition. In asset
acquisitions, the Operating Partnership measures the real estate assets acquired based on their cost or total consideration exchanged and any excess consideration is
allocated to the real estate properties, excluding those identified as held for sale, on a relative fair value basis. The components of the acquisition include an initial
allocation to investments in real estate properties acquired based on fair value and an initial allocation of that fair value to buildings and land.
 
We identified the evaluation of the fair value allocated to investments in real estate properties acquired, including the allocation of the property fair value to land and
building, in the Liberty Transaction as a critical audit matter. Evaluating the fair value amounts estimated by the Operating Partnership in the allocation, which have
measurement uncertainty, required specialized skill and knowledge. Specifically, testing significant assumptions of market rents and capitalization rates in relation to
investments in real estate and testing the allocation of property fair value to land and building.
 
The following are the primary procedures we performed to address this critical audit matter. We evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of certain
internal controls over the Operating Partnership’s fair value estimation process for investments in real estate properties, land and building. This included controls
related to the determination of amounts allocated to land and building and significant assumptions used to estimate the fair value of investments in real estate
properties. For a selection of investments in real estate properties we involved valuation professionals with specialized skills and knowledge, who assisted in 1)
comparing the Operating Partnership’s determination of the fair value of investments in real estate properties to sales prices from available property sales, 2)
comparing the Operating Partnership’s significant assumptions used in the determination of the fair value of investments in real estate properties to available leasing
information, industry research publications and inquiries of market participants, 3) comparing the Operating Partnership’s determination of the fair value of land to
sales prices from available land sales and 4) comparing the Operating Partnership’s determination of fair value of building to developed ranges of estimates based on
market data, such as industry guides used for developing replacement building values.
 
Assessment of the Operating Partnership’s evaluation of the expected holding period for operating properties
 
As discussed in Notes 2 and 4, the Operating Partnership had $43,508 million of operating properties as of December 31, 2020. The Operating Partnership tests the
recoverability of operating properties whenever events or changes in circumstances, including shortening the expected holding period of such assets, indicate that the
carrying amount of these assets may not be recoverable.
 
We identified the assessment of the Operating Partnership’s evaluation of the expected holding period for operating properties as a critical audit matter. Subjective
auditor judgment was required to assess the relevant events or changes in circumstances that the Operating Partnership used to evaluate its expected holding period.
A shortening of the expected holding period could indicate a potential impairment.
 
The following are the primary procedures we performed to address this critical audit matter. We evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of certain
internal controls over the Operating Partnership’s recoverability of operating properties process including controls related to determining the expected holding period
and any related changes. We evaluated the Operating Partnership’s expected holding period by inquiring of the Operating Partnership regarding changes to the
expected holding period, considering certain factors related to the current economic environment, reading minutes of the meetings of the Board of Directors of
Prologis, Inc., reading external communications with investors and analysts, and analyzing documents prepared by the Operating Partnership regarding proposed real
estate transactions and potential triggering events.
 
/s/ KPMG LLP
 
We have served as the Operating Partnership’s auditor since 2002.
 
Denver, Colorado
February 10, 2021
50
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
 
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors
Prologis, Inc.:
 
Opinion on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
 
We have audited Prologis, Inc. and subsidiaries' (the Company) internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal
Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all
material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013)
issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission.
 
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of
the Company as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, equity, and cash flows for each of the years in the
three-year period ended December 31, 2020, and the related notes and financial statement schedule III (collectively, the consolidated financial statements), and our report
dated February 10, 2021 expressed an unqualified opinion on those consolidated financial statements.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control
over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management's Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion
on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about
whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an
understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating
effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audit also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances.
We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
 
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation
of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes
those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the
assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and
directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s
assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
 
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to
future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or
procedures may deteriorate.
 
/s/ KPMG LLP
 
Denver, Colorado
February 10, 2021
 
 
51
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands, except per share data)
 
 December 31,  
 2020   2019  
ASSETS        
Investments in real estate properties $50,384,328  $35,224,414 
Less accumulated depreciation  6,539,156   5,437,662 
Net investments in real estate properties  43,845,172   29,786,752 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities  7,602,014   6,237,371 
Assets held for sale or contribution  1,070,724   720,685 
Net investments in real estate  52,517,910   36,744,808 
        
Lease right-of-use assets  492,801   486,330 
Cash and cash equivalents  598,086   1,088,855 
Other assets  2,456,208   1,711,857 
Total assets $56,065,005  $40,031,850 
        
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY        
Liabilities:        
Debt $16,849,076  $11,905,877 
Lease liabilities  486,972   471,634 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  1,143,372   704,954 
Other liabilities  1,261,005   877,601 
Total liabilities  19,740,425   13,960,066 
        
Equity:        
Prologis, Inc. stockholders’ equity:        
Series Q preferred stock at stated liquidation preference of $50 per share; $0.01 par value; 1,279 and
     1,379 shares issued and outstanding and 100,000 preferred shares authorized at December 31, 2020 and
     2019, respectively  63,948   68,948 
Common stock; $0.01 par value; 739,381 and 631,797 shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2020
     and 2019, respectively  7,394   6,318 
Additional paid-in capital  35,488,634   25,719,427 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss  (1,193,739)  (990,398)
Distributions in excess of net earnings  (2,394,690)  (2,151,168)
Total Prologis, Inc. stockholders’ equity  31,971,547   22,653,127 
Noncontrolling interests  4,353,033   3,418,657 
Total equity  36,324,580   26,071,784 
Total liabilities and equity $56,065,005  $40,031,850
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
52
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF INCOME
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
Revenues:             
Rental  $3,791,131  $2,831,818  $2,388,791 
Strategic capital   636,987   491,886   406,300 
Development management and other   10,617   6,917   9,358 
Total revenues   4,438,735   3,330,621   2,804,449 
Expenses:             
Rental   952,063   734,266   600,648 
Strategic capital   218,041   184,661   157,040 
General and administrative   274,845   266,718   238,985 
Depreciation and amortization   1,561,969   1,139,879   947,214 
Other   30,010   13,149   13,560 
Total expenses   3,036,928   2,338,673   1,957,447 
             
Operating income before gains on real estate transactions, net   1,401,807   991,948   847,002 
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   464,942   467,577   469,817 
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   252,195   390,241   371,179 
Operating income   2,118,944   1,849,766   1,687,998 
             
Other income (expense):             
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   297,370   200,178   298,260 
Interest expense   (314,507)  (239,953)  (229,141)
Interest and other income, net   1,044   24,213   14,663 
Foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   (167,473)  (41,715)  117,096 
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, net   (188,290)  (16,126)  (2,586)
Total other income (expense)   (371,856)  (73,403)  198,292 
Earnings before income taxes   1,747,088   1,776,363   1,886,290 
Total income tax expense   130,458   74,517   63,330 
Consolidated net earnings   1,616,630   1,701,846   1,822,960 
Less net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   134,816   128,887   173,599 
Net earnings attributable to controlling interests   1,481,814   1,572,959   1,649,361 
Less preferred stock dividends   6,345   6,009   5,935 
Loss on preferred stock repurchase   2,347   -   - 
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $1,473,122  $1,566,950  $1,643,426 
             
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Basic   728,323   630,580   567,367 
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Diluted   754,414   654,903   590,239 
             
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders – Basic  $ 2.02  $ 2.48  $ 2.90 
             
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders – Diluted  $ 2.01  $ 2.46  $ 2.87
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
53
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In thousands )
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
Consolidated net earnings  $1,616,630  $1,701,846  $ 1,822,960 
Other comprehensive income (loss):             
Foreign currency translation gains (losses), net   (194,673)  98,482   (190,590)
Unrealized losses on derivative contracts, net   (14,117)  (1,335)  (1,323)
Comprehensive income   1,407,840   1,798,993   1,631,047 
Net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   (134,816)  (128,887)  (173,599)
Other comprehensive loss (income) attributable to noncontrolling interests   5,449   (2,874)  8,900 
Comprehensive income attributable to common stockholders  $1,278,473  $1,667,232  $ 1,466,348
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
54
PROLOGIS, INC.
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF EQUITY
(In thousands)
 
     Common Stock      Accumulated  Distributions         
     Number      Additional  Other   in Excess of  Non-      
 Preferred  of   Par  Paid-in   Comprehensive  Net   controlling  Total  
 Stock  Shares  Value  Capital  Income (Loss)  Earnings  Interests  Equity 
Balance at January 1, 2018 $68,948   532,186  $5,322  $19,363,007  $ (901,658) $(2,904,461) $3,074,583  $18,705,741 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   -   -   1,649,361   173,599   1,822,960 
Effect of equity compensation plans  -   1,251   12   33,544   -   -   52,219   85,775 
DCT Transaction, net of issuance costs -   96,179   962   6,321,667   -   -   298,092   6,620,721 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   181,866   181,866 
Redemption of noncontrolling interests  -   -   -   (11,257)  -   -   (64,663)  (75,920)
Foreign currency translation losses, net -   -   -   -   (181,728)  -   (8,862)  (190,590)
Unrealized losses on derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   -   (1,285)  -   (38)  (1,323)
Reallocation of equity  -   -   -   (20,849)  -   -   20,849   - 
Dividends ($1.92 per common share) and
     other distributions  -   -   -   (125)  -   (1,123,367)  (224,850)  (1,348,342)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $68,948   629,616  $6,296  $25,685,987  $ (1,084,671) $(2,378,467) $3,502,795  $25,800,888 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   -   -   1,572,959   128,887   1,701,846 
Effect of equity compensation plans  -   961   10   37,008   -   -   67,691   104,709 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   11,604   11,604 
Purchase of noncontrolling interests  -   -   -   2,133   -   -   (15,383)  (13,250)
Redemption of noncontrolling interests  -   1,220   12   32,878   -   -   (141,323)  (108,433)
Contribution to Brazil venture  -   -   -   -   -   -   (12,630)  (12,630)
Foreign currency translation gains, net  -   -   -   -   95,572   -   2,910   98,482 
Unrealized losses on derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   -   (1,299)  -   (36)  (1,335)
Reallocation of equity  -   -   -   (38,561)  -   -   38,561   - 
Dividends ($2.12 per common share) and
     other distributions  -   -   -   (18)  -   (1,345,660)  (164,419)  (1,510,097)
Balance at December 31, 2019 $68,948   631,797  $6,318  $25,719,427  $ (990,398) $(2,151,168) $3,418,657  $26,071,784 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   -   -   1,481,814   134,816   1,616,630 
Effect of equity compensation plans  -   690   7   27,745   -   -   82,233   109,985 
Liberty Transaction, net of issuance costs -   106,723   1,067   9,801,373   -   -   211,086   10,013,526 
Issuance of units related to acquisitions -   -   -   -   -   -   48,533   48,533 
Repurchase of common shares  -   (539)  (5)  (34,824)  -   -   -   (34,829)
Repurchase of preferred stock  (5,000)  -   -   147   -   (2,347)  -   (7,200)
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   917,092   917,092 
Redemption of noncontrolling interests  -   710   7   30,727   -   -   (147,712)  (116,978)
Foreign currency translation losses, net -   -   -   -   (189,599)  -   (5,074)  (194,673)
Unrealized losses on derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   -   (13,742)  -   (375)  (14,117)
Reallocation of equity  -   -   -   (55,413)  -   -   55,413   - 
Dividends ($2.32 per common share) and
     other distributions  -   -   -   (548)  -   (1,722,989)  (361,636)  (2,085,173)
Balance at December 31, 2020 $63,948   739,381  $7,394  $35,488,634  $ (1,193,739) $(2,394,690) $4,353,033  $36,324,580
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
55
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
Operating activities:             
Consolidated net earnings  $1,616,630  $1,701,846  $1,822,960 
Adjustments to reconcile net earnings to net cash provided by operating activities:             
Straight-lined rents and amortization of above and below market leases   (126,328)  (98,426)  (66,938)
Equity-based compensation awards   109,831   97,557   76,093 
Depreciation and amortization   1,561,969   1,139,879   947,214 
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   (297,370)  (200,178)  (298,260)
Operating distributions from unconsolidated entities   450,622   346,517   349,877 
Decrease (increase) in operating receivables from unconsolidated entities   14,670   11,557   (39,890)
Amortization of debt discounts and debt issuance costs, net   7,859   17,006   12,653 
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   (464,942)  (467,577)  (469,817)
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   (252,195)  (390,241)  (371,179)
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative losses (gains), net   160,739   70,693   (120,358)
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, net   188,290   16,126   2,586 
Deferred income tax expense   744   12,221   1,448 
Increase in accounts receivable, lease right-of-use assets and other assets   (127,619)  (108,165)  (72,955)
Increase in accounts payable and accrued expenses, lease liabilities and other liabilities   94,105   115,219   30,125 
Net cash provided by operating activities   2,937,005   2,264,034   1,803,559 
Investing activities:             
Real estate development   (1,920,218)  (1,795,137)  (1,953,144)
Real estate acquisitions   (1,239,034)  (1,006,043)  (999,131)
Liberty Transaction, net of cash acquired   (29,436)  -   - 
IPT Transaction, net of cash acquired   (1,665,359)  -   - 
DCT Transaction, net of cash acquired   -   -   (45,870)
Tenant improvements and lease commissions on previously leased space   (221,491)  (179,274)  (134,868)
Property improvements   (149,491)  (143,029)  (93,073)
Proceeds from dispositions and contributions of real estate properties   2,281,940   2,331,623   2,310,388 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities   (385,936)  (276,169)  (160,358)
Return of investment from unconsolidated entities   257,065   389,463   360,278 
Proceeds from repayment of notes receivable backed by real estate   4,312   -   34,260 
Proceeds from the settlement of net investment hedges   2,352   23,640   29,425 
Payments on the settlement of net investment hedges   (9,034)  (30,424)  (11,703)
Net cash used in investing activities   (3,074,330)  (685,350)  (663,796)
Financing activities:             
Proceeds from issuance of common stock   2,217   6,082   6,891 
Repurchase and retirement of common stock   (34,829)  -   - 
Repurchase of preferred stock   (7,200)  -   - 
Dividends paid on common and preferred stock   (1,722,989)  (1,345,660)  (1,123,367)
Noncontrolling interests contributions   917,092   11,604   170,066 
Noncontrolling interests distributions   (361,636)  (164,419)  (224,850)
Settlement of noncontrolling interests   (116,978)  (109,811)  (75,920)
Tax paid for shares withheld   (24,887)  (22,434)  (26,508)
Debt and equity issuance costs paid   (54,204)  (17,656)  (17,446)
Net proceeds from (payments on) credit facilities   (10,959)  127,566   (674,559)
Repurchase of and payments on debt   (6,782,306)  (3,301,827)  (4,166,088)
Proceeds from the issuance of debt   7,824,517   3,976,956   4,899,680 
Net cash used in financing activities   (372,162)  (839,599)  (1,232,101)
             
Effect of foreign currency exchange rate changes on cash   18,718   5,914   (10,852)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents   (490,769)  744,999   (103,190)
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year   1,088,855   343,856   447,046 
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year  $598,086  $1,088,855  $343,856
 
 
See Note 18 for information on noncash investing and financing activities and other information.
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
56
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLIDA TED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands)
 
 December 31,  
 2020   2019  
ASSETS        
Investments in real estate properties $ 50,384,328  $ 35,224,414 
Less accumulated depreciation  6,539,156   5,437,662 
Net investments in real estate properties  43,845,172   29,786,752 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities  7,602,014   6,237,371 
Assets held for sale or contribution  1,070,724   720,685 
Net investments in real estate  52,517,910   36,744,808 
        
Lease right-of-use assets  492,801   486,330 
Cash and cash equivalents  598,086   1,088,855 
Other assets  2,456,208   1,711,857 
Total assets $ 56,065,005  $ 40,031,850 
        
LIABILITIES AND CAPITAL        
Liabilities:        
Debt $ 16,849,076  $ 11,905,877 
Lease liabilities  486,972   471,634 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  1,143,372   704,954 
Other liabilities  1,261,005   877,601 
Total liabilities  19,740,425   13,960,066 
        
Capital:        
Partners’ capital:        
General partner – preferred  63,948   68,948 
General partner – common  31,907,599   22,584,179 
Limited partners – common  523,954   355,076 
Limited partners – Class A common  345,553   288,187 
Total partners’ capital  32,841,054   23,296,390 
Noncontrolling interests  3,483,526   2,775,394 
Total capital  36,324,580   26,071,784 
Total liabilities and capital $ 56,065,005  $ 40,031,850
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
57
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF INCOME
(In thousands, except per unit amounts)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
Revenues:             
Rental  $3,791,131  $2,831,818  $2,388,791 
Strategic capital   636,987   491,886   406,300 
Development management and other   10,617   6,917   9,358 
Total revenues   4,438,735   3,330,621   2,804,449 
Expenses:             
Rental   952,063   734,266   600,648 
Strategic capital   218,041   184,661   157,040 
General and administrative   274,845   266,718   238,985 
Depreciation and amortization   1,561,969   1,139,879   947,214 
Other   30,010   13,149   13,560 
Total expenses   3,036,928   2,338,673   1,957,447 
             
Operating income before gains on real estate transactions, net   1,401,807   991,948   847,002 
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   464,942   467,577   469,817 
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   252,195   390,241   371,179 
Operating income   2,118,944   1,849,766   1,687,998 
             
Other income (expense):             
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   297,370   200,178   298,260 
Interest expense   (314,507)  (239,953)  (229,141)
Interest and other income, net   1,044   24,213   14,663 
Foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   (167,473)  (41,715)  117,096 
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, net   (188,290)  (16,126)  (2,586)
Total other income (expense)   (371,856)  (73,403)  198,292 
Earnings before income taxes   1,747,088   1,776,363   1,886,290 
Total income tax expense   130,458   74,517   63,330 
Consolidated net earnings   1,616,630   1,701,846   1,822,960 
Less net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   93,195   82,222   124,712 
Net earnings attributable to controlling interests   1,523,435   1,619,624   1,698,248 
Less preferred unit distributions   6,345   6,009   5,935 
Loss on preferred unit repurchase   2,347   -   - 
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $1,514,743  $1,613,615  $1,692,313 
             
Weighted average common units outstanding – Basic   740,860   641,128   575,798 
Weighted average common units outstanding – Diluted   754,414   654,903   590,239 
             
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders – Basic  $ 2.02  $ 2.48  $ 2.90 
             
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders – Diluted  $ 2.01  $ 2.46  $ 2.87
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
58
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In thousands)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
Consolidated net earnings  $1,616,630  $1,701,846  $ 1,822,960 
Other comprehensive income (loss):             
Foreign currency translation gains (losses), net   (194,673)  98,482   (190,590)
Unrealized losses on derivative contracts, net   (14,117)  (1,335)  (1,323)
Comprehensive income   1,407,840   1,798,993   1,631,047 
Net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   (93,195)  (82,222)  (124,712)
Other comprehensive loss (income) attributable to noncontrolling interests   (92)  (188)  3,416 
Comprehensive income attributable to common unitholders  $1,314,553  $1,716,583  $ 1,509,751
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
59
 
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF CAPIT AL
(In thousands)
 
 General Partner   Limited Partners          
 Preferred   Common   Common   Class A Common  Non-
controlling     
 Units  Amount  Units  Amount  Units  Amount  Units  Amount  Interests  Total  
Balance at January 1, 2018  1,379  $68,948   532,186  $15,562,210   5,656  $165,401   8,894  $248,940  $2,660,242  $18,705,741 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   1,649,361   -   24,422   -   24,465   124,712   1,822,960 
Effect of equity compensation plans -   -   1,251   33,556   2,087   52,219   -   -   -   85,775 
DCT Transaction, net of issuance
costs  -   -   96,179   6,322,629   3,551   233,472   -   -   64,620   6,620,721 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   181,866   181,866 
Redemption of noncontrolling
interests  -   -   -   (11,257)  -   -   -   -   (11,471)  (22,728)
Redemption of limited partnership
units  -   -   -   -   (778)  (50,390)  (45)  (2,802)  -   (53,192)
Foreign currency translation losses,
net  -   -   -   (181,728)  -   (3,035)  -   (2,411)  (3,416)  (190,590)
Unrealized losses on derivative
contracts, net  -   -   -   (1,285)  -   (21)  -   (17)  -   (1,323)
Reallocation of capital  -   -   -   (20,849)  -   (28,969)  -   49,818   -   - 
Distributions ($1.92 per common unit)
and other  -   -   -   (1,123,492)  -   (21,818)  -   (22,948)  (180,084)  (1,348,342)
Balance at December 31, 2018  1,379  $68,948   629,616  $22,229,145   10,516  $371,281   8,849  $295,045  $2,836,469  $25,800,888 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   1,572,959   -   26,211   -   20,454   82,222   1,701,846 
Effect of equity compensation plans -   -   961   37,018   1,525   67,691   -   -   -   104,709 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   11,604   11,604 
Purchase of noncontrolling interests -   -   -   2,133   -   -   -   -   (15,383)  (13,250)
Redemption of noncontrolling
interests  -   -   -   (8,045)  -   -   -   -   (13,048)  (21,093)
Redemption of limited partnership
units  -   -   1,220   40,935   (2,108)  (120,387)  (236)  (7,888)  -   (87,340)
Contribution to Brazil venture  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   (12,630)  (12,630)
Foreign currency translation gains, net -   -   -   95,572   -   1,502   -   1,220   188   98,482 
Unrealized losses on derivative
contracts, net  -   -   -   (1,299)  -   (19)  -   (17)  -   (1,335)
Reallocation of capital  -   -   -   (38,561)  -   36,603   -   1,958   -   - 
Distributions ($2.12 per common unit)
and other  -   -   -   (1,345,678)  -   (27,806)  -   (22,585)  (114,028)  (1,510,097)
Balance at December 31, 2019  1,379  $68,948   631,797  $22,584,179   9,933  $355,076   8,613  $288,187  $2,775,394  $26,071,784 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   1,481,814   -   25,359   -   16,262   93,195   1,616,630 
Effect of equity compensation plans -   -   690   27,752   1,362   82,233   -   -   -   109,985 
Liberty Transaction, net of issuance
costs  -   -   106,723   9,802,440   2,288   210,190   -   -   896   10,013,526 
Issuance of units related to
acquisitions  -   -   -   -   461   48,533   -   -   -   48,533 
Repurchase of common units  -   -   (539)  (34,829)  -   -   -   -   -   (34,829)
Repurchase of preferred units  (100)  (5,000)  -   (2,200)  -   -   -   -   -   (7,200)
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   917,092   917,092 
Redemption of limited partnership
units  -   -   710   30,734   (1,902)  (146,990)  (18)  (722)  -   (116,978)
Foreign currency translation gains
(losses), net  -   -   -   (189,599)  -   (3,113)  -   (2,053)  92   (194,673)
Unrealized losses on derivative
contracts, net  -   -   -   (13,742)  -   (226)  -   (149)  -   (14,117)
Reallocation of capital  -   -   -   (55,413)  -   (10,868)  -   66,281   -   - 
Distributions ($2.32 per common unit)
and other  -   -   -   (1,723,537)  -   (36,240)  -   (22,253)  (303,143)  (2,085,173)
Balance at December 31, 2020  1,279  $63,948   739,381  $31,907,599   12,142  $523,954   8,595  $345,553  $3,483,526  $36,324,580
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
60
PROLOGIS, L.P
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2020   2019   2018  
Operating activities:             
Consolidated net earnings  $1,616,630  $1,701,846  $1,822,960 
Adjustments to reconcile net earnings to net cash provided by operating activities:             
Straight-lined rents and amortization of above and below market leases   (126,328)  (98,426)  (66,938)
Equity-based compensation awards   109,831   97,557   76,093 
Depreciation and amortization   1,561,969   1,139,879   947,214 
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   (297,370)  (200,178)  (298,260)
Operating distributions from unconsolidated entities   450,622   346,517   349,877 
Decrease (increase) in operating receivables from unconsolidated entities   14,670   11,557   (39,890)
Amortization of debt discounts and debt issuance costs, net   7,859   17,006   12,653 
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   (464,942)  (467,577)  (469,817)
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   (252,195)  (390,241)  (371,179)
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative losses (gains), net   160,739   70,693   (120,358)
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, net   188,290   16,126   2,586 
Deferred income tax expense   744   12,221   1,448 
Increase in accounts receivable, lease right-of-use assets and other assets   (127,619)  (108,165)  (72,955)
Increase in accounts payable and accrued expenses, lease liabilities and other liabilities   94,105   115,219   30,125 
Net cash provided by operating activities   2,937,005   2,264,034   1,803,559 
Investing activities:             
Real estate development   (1,920,218)  (1,795,137)  (1,953,144)
Real estate acquisitions   (1,239,034)  (1,006,043)  (999,131)
Liberty Transaction, net of cash acquired   (29,436)  -   - 
IPT Transaction, net of cash acquired   (1,665,359)  -   - 
DCT Transaction, net of cash acquired   -   -   (45,870)
Tenant improvements and lease commissions on previously leased space   (221,491)  (179,274)  (134,868)
Property improvements   (149,491)  (143,029)  (93,073)
Proceeds from dispositions and contributions of real estate properties   2,281,940   2,331,623   2,310,388 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities   (385,936)  (276,169)  (160,358)
Return of investment from unconsolidated entities   257,065   389,463   360,278 
Proceeds from repayment of notes receivable backed by real estate   4,312   -   34,260 
Proceeds from the settlement of net investment hedges   2,352   23,640   29,425 
Payments on the settlement of net investment hedges   (9,034)  (30,424)  (11,703)
Net cash used in investing activities   (3,074,330)  (685,350)  (663,796)
Financing activities:             
Proceeds from issuance of common partnership units in exchange for contributions from
     Prologis, Inc.   2,217   6,082   6,891 
Repurchase and retirement of common units   (34,829)  -   - 
Repurchase of preferred units   (7,200)  -   - 
Distributions paid on common and preferred units   (1,781,482)  (1,396,051)  (1,168,133)
Noncontrolling interests contributions   917,092   11,604   170,066 
Noncontrolling interests distributions   (303,143)  (114,028)  (180,084)
Settlement of noncontrolling interests   -   (22,471)  (22,728)
Redemption of common limited partnership units   (116,978)  (87,340)  (53,192)
Tax paid for shares of the Parent withheld   (24,887)  (22,434)  (26,508)
Debt and equity issuance costs paid   (54,204)  (17,656)  (17,446)
Net proceeds from (payments on) credit facilities   (10,959)  127,566   (674,559)
Repurchase of and payments on debt   (6,782,306)  (3,301,827)  (4,166,088)
Proceeds from the issuance of debt   7,824,517   3,976,956   4,899,680 
Net cash used in financing activities   (372,162)  (839,599)  (1,232,101)
             
Effect of foreign currency exchange rate changes on cash   18,718   5,914   (10,852)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents   (490,769)  744,999   (103,190)
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year   1,088,855   343,856   447,046 
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year  $598,086  $1,088,855  $343,856
 
 
See Note 18 for information on noncash investing and financing activities and other information.
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
61
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC. AND PROLOGIS, L.P .
NOTES T O THE CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL ST ATEMENTS
 
NOTE 1. DESCRIPTION OF THE BUSINESS
 
Prologis, Inc. (or the “Parent”) commenced operations as a fully integrated real estate company in 1997, elected to be taxed as a real
estate investment trust (“REIT”) under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the “Internal Revenue Code” or “IRC”), and
believes the current organization and method of operation will enable it to maintain its status as a REIT . The Parent is the general
partner of Prologis, L.P . (or the “Operating Partnership” or “OP”). Through the OP , we are engaged in the ownership, acquisition,
development and management of logistics facilities with a focus on key markets in 19 countries on four continents. W e invest in real
estate through wholly owned subsidiaries and other entities through which we co-invest with partners and investors. W e maintain a
significant level of ownership in these co-investment ventures, which may be consolidated or unconsolidated based on our level of
control of the entity . Our current business strategy consists of two operating business segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic
Capital. Our Real Estate Operations segment represents the ownership and development of logistics properties. Our Strategic Capital
segment represents the management of unconsolidated co-investment ventures and other ventures. See Note 17 for further
discussion of our business segments. Unless otherwise indicated, the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements apply to both
the Parent and the OP . The terms “the Company ,” “Prologis,” “we,” “our” or “us” means the Parent and OP collectively .
 
For each share of preferred or common stock the Parent issues, the OP issues a corresponding preferred or common partnership
unit, as applicable, to the Parent in exchange for the contribution of the proceeds from the stock issuance. At December 31, 2020, the
Parent owned a 97.35 % common general partnership interest in the OP and 100% of the preferred units in the OP . The remaining
2.65% common limited partnership interests, which include Class A common limited partnership units (“Class A Units”) in the OP , are
owned by unaf filiated investors and certain current and former directors and of ficers of the Parent. Each partner ’s percentage interest
in the OP is determined based on the number of OP units held, including the number of OP units into which Class A Units are
convertible, compared to total OP units outstanding at each period end and is used as the basis for the allocation of net income or
loss to each partner . At the end of each reporting period, a capital adjustment is made in the OP to reflect the appropriate ownership
interest for each of the common unitholders. These adjustments are reflected in the line items Reallocation of Equity  in the
Consolidated Statements of Equity of the Parent and Reallocation of Capital  in the Consolidated Statements of Capital of the OP .
 
As the sole general partner of the OP , the Parent has complete responsibility and discretion in the day-to-day management and
control of the OP and we operate the Parent and the OP as one enterprise. The management of the Parent consists of the same
members as the management of the OP . These members are of ficers of the Parent and employees of the OP or one of its
subsidiaries. As general partner with control of the OP , the Parent is the primary beneficiary and therefore consolidates the OP .
Because the Parent’ s only significant asset is its investment in the OP , the assets and liabilities of the Parent and the OP are the same
on their respective financial statements.
 
Information with respect to the square footage, number of buildings and acres of land is unaudited.
 
NOTE 2. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
 
Basis of Presentation.  The accompanying Consolidated Financial Statements are prepared in accordance with United States
(“U.S.”) generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”) and are presented in our reporting currency , the U.S. dollar . Intercompany
transactions with consolidated entities have been eliminated.
 
Consolidation. We consolidate all entities that are wholly owned and those in which we own less than 100% of the equity  but control,
as well as any variable interest entities (“VIEs”) in which we are the primary beneficiary . We evaluate our ability to control an entity and
whether the entity is a VIE and we are the primary beneficiary through consideration of substantive terms of the arrangement to
identify which enterprise has the power to direct the activities of the entity that most significantly impact the entity’ s economic
performance and the obligation to absorb losses and the right to receive benefits from the entity .
 
For entities that are not defined as VIEs, we first consider whether we are the general partner or the limited partner (or the equivalent
in such investments that are not structured as partnerships). W e consolidate entities in which we are the general partner and the
limited partners in such entities do not have rights that would preclude control. For entities in which we are the general partner but do
not control the entity as the other partners hold substantive participating or kick-out rights, we apply the equity method of accounting
since, as the general partner , we have the ability to exercise significant influence over the operating and financial policies of the
venture. For ventures for which we are a limited partner , or our investment is in an entity that is not structured similar to a partnership,
we consider factors such as ownership interest, voting control, authority to make decisions and contractual and substantive
participating rights of the partners. In instances where the factors indicate that we have a controlling financial interest in the venture,
we consolidate the entity . 
 
Use of Estimates.  GAAP requires us to make estimates and assumptions that af fect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities,
disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements, and revenues and expenses during the reporting
period. Although we believe the assumptions and estimates we made are reasonable and appropriate, as discussed in the applicable
sections throughout the Consolidated Financial Statements, dif ferent assumptions and estimates could materially impact our reported
results.
 
62
 
 
Foreign Operations.  The U.S. dollar is the functional currency for our consolidated subsidiaries and unconsolidated entities operating
in the U.S. and Mexico. The functional currency for our consolidated subsidiaries and unconsolidated entities operating in other
countries is the principal currency in which the entity’ s assets, liabilities, income and expenses are denominated, which may be
different from the local currency of the country of incorporation or where the entity conducts its operations. The functional currencies
of entities outside of the U.S. and Mexico generally include the Brazilian real, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar , Chinese
renminbi, euro, Japanese yen, Singapore dollar and Swedish krona. W e take part in business transactions denominated in these and
other local currencies where we operate.
 
For our consolidated subsidiaries whose functional currency is not the U.S. dollar , we translate their financial statements into
U.S. dollars at the time we consolidate those subsidiaries’ financial statements. Generally , assets and liabilities are translated at the
exchange rate in ef fect at the balance sheet date. The resulting translation adjustments are included in Accumulated Other
Comprehensive Income (Loss) (“AOCI/L ”) in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Certain balance sheet items, primarily equity and
capital-related accounts, are reflected at the historical exchange rate. Income statement accounts are translated using the average
exchange rate for the period and income statement accounts that represent significant nonrecurring transactions are translated at the
rate in ef fect at the date of the transaction. W e translate our share of the net income or loss of our unconsolidated entities at the
average exchange rate for the period and significant nonrecurring transactions of the unconsolidated entities are translated at the rate
in effect at the date of the transaction.
 
We and certain of our consolidated subsidiaries have intercompany and third-party debt that is not denominated in the entity’ s
functional currency . When the debt is remeasured against the functional currency of the entity , a gain or loss can result. The resulting
adjustment is reflected in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net  in the Consolidated Statements of Income, unless it is
intercompany debt that is deemed to be long-term in nature or third-party debt that has been designated as a nonderivative net
investment hedge and then the adjustment is reflected as a cumulative translation adjustment in AOCI/L .
 
Acquisitions.  We apply a screen test to evaluate if substantially all the fair value of the acquired property is concentrated in a single
identifiable asset or group of similar identifiable assets to determine whether a transaction is accounted for as an asset acquisition or
business combination. As most of our real estate acquisitions are concentrated in either a single or a group of similar identifiable
assets, our real estate transactions are generally accounted for as asset acquisitions, which permits the capitalization of transaction
costs to the basis of the acquired property . We measure the real estate assets acquired through an asset acquisition based on their
cost or total consideration exchanged and any excess consideration or bargain purchase amount is allocated to the real estate
properties and related lease intangibles on a relative fair value basis . All other assets and liabilities assumed, including debt, and real
estate assets that we do not intend to operate long-term are recorded at fair value. At a property-level, we allocate the fair value to the
components which include building, land, improvements, and intangible assets or liabilities related to acquired leases. Purchase price
allocations for a business combination are recorded at fair value.
 
When we obtain control of an unconsolidated entity and the acquisition qualifies as a business combination, we account for the
acquisition in accordance with the guidance for a business combination achieved in stages. W e remeasure our previously held
interest in the unconsolidated entity at its acquisition-date fair value and recognize any resulting gain or loss in earnings.
 
We allocate the purchase price using primarily Level 2 and Level 3 inputs (further defined in Fair V alue Measurements below) as
follows:
 
Investments in Real Estate Properties.  We value operating properties as if vacant. W e estimate fair value by applying an income
approach methodology using either a discounted cash flow analysis or applying a capitalization rate to the estimated Net Operating
Income (“NOI”) of a property . Key assumptions include market rents, growth rates, and discount and capitalization rates. Estimates of
future cash flows are based on a number of factors including historical operating results, known trends and market and economic
conditions. W e determine the discount or capitalization rate by market based on recent transactions and other market data and adjust
if necessary , based on the property characteristics. The fair value of land is generally based on relevant market data, such as a
comparison of the subject site to similar parcels that have recently been sold or are currently being of fered on the market for sale. At a
property level, we allocate the fair value to land and building.
 
Lease Intangibles . We determine the portion of the purchase price related to acquired in-place leases as intangible assets and
liabilities as follows:
 
•Above and Below Market Leases . We recognize an asset or liability with favorable or unfavorable rents based on our estimate of
current market rents of the applicable markets. The above or below market lease intangibles are valued using a discounted cash
flow approach through which we recognize the present value of the dif ference in cash flows between in-place and market rents.
The value is recorded in either Other Assets  or Other Liabilities , as appropriate, and is amortized over the remaining term of the
respective leases, including any bargain renewal options, to rental revenues.
 
•Foregone Rent . We calculate the value of the revenue and recovery of costs foregone during a reasonable lease-up period, as if
the space was vacant, in each of the applicable markets. The values are recorded in Other Assets  and amortized over the
remaining life of the respective leases to amortization expense.
 
•Leasing Commissions.  We recognize an asset for leasing commissions based on our estimate of the cost to lease space in the
applicable markets. The value is recorded in Other Assets and amortized over the remaining life of the respective leases to
amortization expense.
63
 
 
Investments in Unconsolidated Entities. We estimate the fair value of the entity by using similar valuation methods as those used for
the consolidated real estate properties and debt. W e apply our ownership percentage to the estimated net asset value of the entity to
determine the fair value of our investment.
 
Debt . We estimate the fair value of debt based on contractual future cash flows discounted using borrowing spreads and market
interest rates that would be available to us for the issuance of debt with similar terms and remaining maturities. In the case of publicly
traded debt, we estimate the fair value based on available market data. Any discount or premium to the principal amount is included in
the carrying value and amortized to interest expense over the remaining term of the related debt using the ef fective interest method.
 
Noncontrolling Interests . We estimate the portion of the fair value of the net assets owned by third parties based on the fair value of
the consolidated net assets, principally real estate properties and debt.
 
Working Capital . We estimate the fair value of other acquired assets and assumed liabilities using the best information available.
 
Fair V alue Measurements.  The objective of fair value is to determine the price that would be received on the sale of an asset or paid
to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date (the exit price). W e estimate fair
value using available market information and valuation methodologies we believe to be appropriate for these purposes. Considerable
judgment and a high degree of subjectivity are involved in developing these estimates and, accordingly , they are not necessarily
indicative of amounts that we would realize on disposition. The fair value hierarchy consists of three broad levels:
 
•Level 1 — Quoted prices (unadjusted) in active markets for identical assets or liabilities that the entity can access at the
measurement date.
 
•Level 2 — Inputs other than quoted prices included within Level 1 that are observable for the asset or liability , either directly or
indirectly .
 
•Level 3 — Unobservable inputs for the asset or liability .
 
Fair V alue Measurements on a Recurring Basis. We estimate the fair value of our financial instruments using available market
information and valuation methodologies we believe to be appropriate for these purposes.
 
We determine the fair value of our derivative financial instruments using widely accepted valuation techniques including discounted
cash flow analysis on the expected cash flows of each derivative. This analysis reflects the contractual terms of the derivatives,
including the period to maturity , and uses observable market-based inputs, including interest rate curves, foreign exchange rates and
implied volatilities. W e determine the fair values of our interest rate swaps using the market standard methodology of netting the
discounted future fixed cash receipts or payments and the discounted expected variable cash payments. W e base the variable cash
payments on an expectation of future interest rates, or forward curves, derived from observable market interest rate curves. W e base
the fair values of our net investment hedges on the change in the spot rate at the end of the period as compared with the strike price
at inception.
 
We incorporate credit valuation adjustments to appropriately reflect nonperformance risk for us and the respective counterparty in the
fair value measurements. In adjusting the fair value of our derivative contracts for the ef fect of nonperformance risk, we consider the
impact of netting and any applicable credit enhancements, such as collateral postings, thresholds, mutual puts and guarantees.
 
We have determined that the majority of the inputs used to value our derivatives fall within Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy . Although
the credit valuation adjustments associated with our derivatives utilize Level 3 inputs, such as estimates of current credit spreads to
evaluate the likelihood of default by us and our counterparties, we assess the significance of the impact of the credit valuation
adjustments on the overall valuation of our derivative positions and have determined that the credit valuation adjustments are not
significant to the overall valuation of our derivatives.
 
Fair V alue Measurements on a Nonrecurring Basis. Assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis generally consist of real
estate assets and investments in unconsolidated entities that were subject to impairment charges related to our change of intent to
sell the investments and through our recoverability analysis discussed below . We estimate fair value based on expected sales prices
in the market (Level 2) or by applying the income approach methodology using a discounted cash flow analysis (Level 3).
 
Fair V alue of Financial Instruments. We estimate the fair value of our senior notes for disclosure purposes based on quoted market
prices for the same (Level 1) or similar (Level 2) issues when current quoted market prices are available. W e estimate the fair value of
our credit facilities, term loans, secured mortgage debt and assessment bonds by discounting the future cash flows using rates and
borrowing spreads currently available to us (Level 3).
 
Real Estate Assets.  Real estate assets are carried at depreciated cost. W e capitalize costs incurred in developing, renovating,
rehabilitating and improving real estate assets as part of the investment basis. W e expense costs for repairs and maintenance as
incurred.
 
Depreciation and Amortization. We charge the depreciable portions of real estate assets to depreciation expense on a straight-line
basis over the respective estimated useful lives. Depreciation on development buildings commences when the asset is ready for its
intended use, which we define as the earlier of stabilization ( 90% occupied) or one year after completion of construction.  We generally
use the following useful lives: 5 to 7 years for capital improvements, 10 years for standard tenant improvements, 15 to 25 years for
depreciable land improvements, 25 to 35 years for operating properties acquired based on the age of the building and 40 years for
operating properties we develop. W e depreciate building improvements on land parcels subject to land leases over the shorter of the
estimated life of the building improvement or the contractual term of the underlying land lease. Capitalized leasing costs are amortized
over the estimated remaining lease term. Our weighted average lease term on leases commenced during 2020, based on square feet
for all leases, was 64 months.
64
 
 
 
Capitalization of Costs. During the land development and construction periods of qualifying projects, we capitalize interest costs,
insurance, real estate taxes and general and administrative costs of the personnel performing the development, renovation and
rehabilitation; if such costs are incremental and identifiable to a specific activity to ready the asset for its intended use. W e capitalize
transaction costs related to the acquisition of land for future development and operating properties that qualify as asset acquisitions.
We capitalize incremental costs incurred to successfully originate a lease that result directly from obtaining a lease and would not
have been incurred if the lease had not been obtained. With the adoption of the new lease standard on January 1, 2019, we no longer
capitalize internal costs related to our leasing activities. During the year ended December 31, 2018, we capitalized $ 21.2 million of
internal costs related to our leasing activities. Amounts capitalized prior to adoption were not adjusted and continue to be amortized in
accordance with previously applicable guidance. Leasing costs that meet the requirements for capitalization are presented as a
component of Other Assets  and all other capitalized costs are included in the investment basis of the real estate assets.
 
Recoverability of Real Estate Assets. We assess the carrying values of our respective long-lived assets whenever events or changes
in circumstances indicate that the carrying amounts of these assets may not be fully recoverable. This assessment is primarily
triggered based on the shortening of the expected hold period due to our change in intent to sell a property in the near term. W e have
processes to monitor our intent with regard to our investments and the estimated disposition value in comparison to the current
carrying value. If our assessment of potential triggering events indicates that the carrying value of a property that we expect to sell in
the near term is not recoverable, we recognize an impairment charge for the amount by which the carrying value exceeds the current
estimated fair value of the property . We determine the fair value of the property based on the proceeds from disposition that are
estimated based on quoted market values, third-party appraisals or discounted cash flow models that utilize the future rental income
of the property and expected market capitalization rates. The use of projected future cash flows is based on assumptions that are
consistent with our estimates of future expectations and the strategic plan we use to manage our underlying business. Changes in
economic and operating conditions could impact our intent and the assumptions used in determining the fair value that could result in
future impairment.
 
In addition to monitoring for triggering events, we measure the recoverability of our assets by comparing the carrying amount to the
estimated future undiscounted cash flows. W e estimate the future undiscounted cash flows and fair value based on our intent as
follows:
 
•for real estate properties that we intend to hold long-term; including land held for development, properties currently under
development and operating properties; recoverability is assessed based on the estimated undiscounted future net rental income
from operating the property and the terminal value, including anticipated costs to develop;
 
•for real estate properties we intend to sell, including properties currently under development and operating properties;
recoverability is assessed based on proceeds from disposition that are estimated based on the future net rental income of the
property , expected market capitalization rates and anticipated costs to develop;
 
•for land parcels we intend to sell, recoverability is assessed based on the estimated proceeds from disposition; and
 
•for costs incurred related to the potential acquisition of land and operating properties and future development projects,
recoverability is assessed based on the probability that the acquisition or development is likely to occur at the measurement date.
 
Assets Held for Sale or Contribution.  We classify a property as held for sale or contribution when certain criteria are met in
accordance with GAAP . Assets classified as held for sale are expected to be sold to a third party and assets classified as held for
contribution are generally newly developed assets we intend to contribute to an unconsolidated co-investment venture within twelve
months. When the criteria are met, the respective assets and liabilities are presented separately in the Consolidated Balance Sheets
and depreciation is not recognized. Assets held for sale or contribution are reported at the lower of carrying amount or estimated fair
value less costs to sell.
 
Investments in Unconsolidated Entities.  We present our investments in certain entities under the equity method. W e use the equity
method when we have the ability to exercise significant influence over operating and financial policies of the venture but do not have
control of the entity . Under the equity method, we initially recognize these investments (including advances) in the balance sheet at
our cost, including formation costs and net of deferred gains from the contribution of properties, if applicable. The transaction costs
related to the formation of equity method investments are also capitalized. W e subsequently adjust the accounts to reflect our
proportionate share of net earnings or losses recognized and accumulated other comprehensive income or loss, distributions
received, contributions made, sales and redemptions of our investments and certain other adjustments, as appropriate. When
circumstances indicate there may have been a reduction in the value of an equity investment, we evaluate whether the loss in value is
other than temporary . If we conclude it is other than temporary , we recognize an impairment charge to reflect the equity investment at
fair value.
 
With regard to distributions from unconsolidated entities, we have elected the nature of distribution approach as the information is
available to us to determine the nature of the underlying activity that generated the distributions. In accordance with the nature of
65
 
distribution approach, cash flows generated from the operations of an unconsolidated entity are classified as a return on investment
(cash inflow from operating activities) and cash flows that are generated from property sale s, debt refinancing or sales  and
redemptions  of our investments are classified as a return of investment (cash inflow from investing activities).
 
Cash and Cash Equivalents.  We consider all cash on hand, demand deposits with financial institutions and short-term highly liquid
investments with original maturities of three months or less to be cash equivalents. Our cash and cash equivalents are financial
instruments that are exposed to concentrations of credit risk. W e invest our cash with high-credit quality institutions. Cash balances
may be invested in money market accounts that are not insured. W e have not realized any losses of such cash investments or
accounts and believe that we are not exposed to any significant credit risk.
 
Derivative Financial Instruments. We primarily hedge our foreign currency risk by borrowing in the currencies in which we invest.
We may use derivative financial instruments, such as foreign currency forward and option contracts to manage foreign currency
exchange rate risk related to both our foreign investments and the related earnings. In addition, we occasionally use interest rate
swap and forward contracts to manage interest rate risk and limit the impact of future interest rate changes on earnings and cash
flows, primarily with variable-rate debt.
 
We do not use derivative financial instruments for trading or speculative purposes. Each derivative transaction is customized and not
exchange-traded. W e recognize all derivatives at fair value within the line items Other Assets  or Other Liabilities . We do not net our
derivative position by counterparty for purposes of balance sheet presentation and disclosure. Management reviews our derivative
positions, overall risk management strategy and hedging program, on a regular basis. W e only enter into transactions that we believe
will be highly ef fective at of fsetting the underlying risk. Our use of derivatives involves the risk that counterparties may default on a
derivative contract; therefore we: (i) establish exposure limits for each counterparty to minimize this risk and provide counterparty
diversification; (ii) contract with counterparties that have long-term credit ratings of single-A or better; (iii) enter into master
agreements that generally allow for netting of certain exposures; thereby significantly reducing the actual loss that would be incurred
should a counterparty fail to perform its contractual obligations; and (iv) set minimum credit standards that become more stringent as
the duration of the derivative financial instrument increases. Based on these factors, we consider the risk of counterparty default to be
minimal.
 
Designated Derivatives. We may choose to designate our derivative financial instruments, generally foreign currency forwards to
hedge our net investment in foreign operations or interest rate swaps to hedge future interest payments on variable debt. At inception
of the transaction, we formally designate and document the derivative financial instrument as a hedge of a specific underlying
exposure, the risk management objective and the strategy for undertaking the hedge transaction. W e formally assess both at
inception and at least quarterly thereafter , the ef fectiveness of our hedging transactions. Due to the high degree of ef fectiveness
between the hedging instruments and the underlying exposures hedged, fluctuations in the value of the derivative financial
instruments will generally be of fset by changes in the cash flows or fair values of the underlying exposures being hedged. Additionally ,
the presentation of the earnings ef fect of the hedging instrument will be recognized in the same income statement line item in which
the earnings ef fect of the hedged item is reported.
 
Changes in the fair value of derivatives that are designated and qualify as net investment hedges of our foreign operations and cash
flow hedges are recorded in AOCI/L . For net investment hedges, these amounts of fset the translation adjustments on the underlying
net assets of our foreign investments and are recorded in AOCI/L . This includes debt issued in a currency that is not the same
functional currency of the borrowing entity that we may designate as a nonderivative net investment hedge. W e compare the net
equity available from our foreign investments first to the derivative financial instruments designated as net investment hedges followed
by any nonderivative net investment hedges. If the total notional amount of the derivative and nonderivative net investment hedges
exceeds the net equity available, that excess portion is considered unhedged and recognized in Foreign Currency and Derivative
Gains (Losses), Net .
 
For cash flow hedges, we report the ef fective portion of the gain or loss as a component of AOCI/ L and reclassify it to the applicable
line item in the Consolidated Statements of Income, generally Interest Expense , over the corresponding period of the underlying
hedged item. The inef fective portion of the change in fair value of a derivative financial instrument is recognized in earnings, generally
Interest Expense , at the time the inef fectiveness occurred. T o the extent the hedged forecasted interest payments on debt related to
our interest rate swaps is paid of f, the remaining balance in AOCI/L is recognized  in Interest Expense  in the Consolidated Statements
of Income.
 
Undesignated Derivatives.  We also use derivatives, such as foreign currency forwards and option contracts, that are not designated
as hedges to manage foreign currency exchange rate risk related to the translation of our results of operations. The changes in fair
values of these derivatives that were not designated as hedging instruments are immediately recognized in earnings within the line
item Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net . These gains or losses are generally of fset by lower or higher earnings due
to the translation at exchange rates that were dif ferent than our expectations. In addition, we may choose to not designate our interest
rate swap contracts. If a swap contract is not designated as a hedge, the changes in fair value of these instruments is immediately
recognized in earnings within the line item Interest Expense  in the Consolidated Statements of Income .
 
Noncontrolling Interests.  Noncontrolling interests represent the share of consolidated entities owned by third parties. W e recognize
each noncontrolling holder ’s respective share of the estimated fair value of the net assets at the date of formation or acquisition.
Noncontrolling interests are subsequently adjusted for the noncontrolling holder ’s share of additional contributions, distributions and
their share of the net earnings or losses of each respective consolidated entity . We allocate net income to noncontrolling interests
based on the weighted average ownership interest during the period. The net income that is not attributable to us is reflected in the
line item Net Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests . We do not recognize a gain or loss on transactions with a consolidated
entity in which we do not own 100% of the equity , but we reflect the dif ference in cash received or paid from the noncontrolling
interests carrying amount as additional paid-in-capital .
66
 
 
Certain limited partnership interests, including OP units, are exchangeable into our common stock. Common stock issued upon
exchange of a holder ’s noncontrolling interest is accounted for at the carrying value of the surrendered limited partnership interest and
the dif ference between the carrying value and the fair value of the common stock issued is recorded to additional paid-in-capital.
 
Revenue Recognition.
Rental Revenues and Recoveries.  We lease our operating properties to customers under agreements that are classified as operating
leases. W e recognize the total minimum lease payments provided for under the leases on a straight-line basis over the lease term.
Generally , under the terms of our leases, the majority of our rental expenses are recovered from our customers, including common
area maintenance, real estate taxes and insurance. Rental expenses recovered through reimbursements received from customers are
recognized in Rental Revenues  in the Consolidated Statements of Income. W e record amounts reimbursed by our customers (“rental
recoveries”) as revenues in the period that the applicable expenses are incurred. W e account for and present rental revenue and
rental recoveries as a single component under Rental Revenues  as the timing of recognition is the same, the pattern with which we
transfer the right of use of the property and related services to the lessee are both on a straight-line basis and our leases qualify as
operating leases. W e perform credit analyses of our customers prior to the execution of our leases and continue these analyses for
each individual lease on an ongoing basis in order to ensure the collectability of rental revenue. W e recognize revenue to the extent
that amounts are determined to be collectible.
 
Strategic Capital Revenues.  Strategic capital revenues include revenues we earn from the management services we provide to
unconsolidated entities. These fees are determined in accordance with the terms specific to each arrangement and may include
recurring fees such as property and asset management fees or transactional fees for leasing, acquisition, development, construction,
financing and tax services provided. W e recognize these fees as we provide the services or on a cost basis for development fees.
 
We may also earn incentive returns (“promotes” or “promote revenues”) based on a venture’ s cumulative returns over a certain time-
period and the returns are determined by both the operating performance and real estate valuation of the venture, including highly
variable inputs such as capitalization rates, market rents, interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates. As these key inputs are
highly volatile and out of our control, and such volatility can materially impact our promotes period over period, we recognize promote
revenues at or near the end of the performance period. W e generally earn promote revenue directly from third-party investors in the
co-investment ventures. W e include the third-party investors’ share of promotes in Strategic Capital Revenues.
 
We also earn fees from ventures that we consolidate. Upon consolidation, these fees are eliminated from our earnings and the third-
party investors’ share of these fees are recognized as a reduction of Net Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests.
 
Development Management and Other Revenues. Development management and other revenues principally include development and
construction management fees and are recognized as we provide the services or on a cost basis.
 
Gains on Real Estate T ransactions, Net.
Throughout the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements, Gains on Real Estate T ransactions, Net collectively  refers to Gains
on Dispositions of Development Properties and Land, Net  and Gains on Other Dispositions of Investments in Real Estate, Net .
 
We recognize gains on the disposition of real estate when the recognition criteria have been met, generally at the time the risks and
rewards and title have transferred, and we no longer have substantial continuing involvement with the real estate sold. W e recognize
losses from the disposition of real estate when known.
 
Beginning January 1, 2018 with the adoption of the new revenue recognition guidance, we recognize the entire gain attributed to
contributions of real estate properties to unconsolidated entities. W e previously recognized a gain on contribution only to the extent of
the third-party ownership in the unconsolidated entity acquiring the property and deferred the portion of the gain related to our
ownership through a reduction to our investment in the applicable unconsolidated entity . We adjusted our proportionate share of net
earnings or losses recognized in future periods to reflect the entities’ recorded depreciation expense as if it were computed on our
lower basis in the contributed properties rather than on the entity’ s basis.  For deferred gains from partial sales recorded prior to the
adoption, we continue to recognize these gains over the lives of the underlying real estate properties or at the time of disposition to a
third party . If our ownership interest in an unconsolidated entity decreases and the decrease is expected to be permanent, we
recognize the amounts relating to previously deferred gains to coincide with our new ownership interest.
 
Gains on Dispositions of Development Properties and Land, Net.  We present gains separately based on the type of real estate sold or
contributed. W e present gains on sales to third parties or contributions to our unconsolidated entities as Gains on Dispositions of
Development Properties and Land, Net  when the property was included in our land portfolio or when we developed the property with
the intent to sell or contribute.  
 
Gains on Other Dispositions of Investments in Real Estate, Net.  We present all other gains on sales to third parties or contributions to
our unconsolidated entities of non-developed properties (primarily operating properties) and other real estate transactions as Gains on
Other Dispositions of Investments in Real Estate, Net . We also include gains or losses on the remeasurement of equity investments to
fair value upon acquisition of a controlling interest and the transaction is considered the acquisition of a business and gains or losses
upon the partial redemption or sale of our investment in an unconsolidated entity .
67
 
 
Rental Expenses.  Rental expenses principally include the cost of our property management personnel, utilities, repairs and
maintenance, property insurance, real estate taxes and the other costs of managing our properties. Beginning January 1, 2019,
certain indirect costs, such as salaries and related costs for employees working on leasing activities for our properties are now
expensed through Rental Expenses. We are also a lessee of land and of fice space under leases which generally meet the criteria to
be accounted for as operating leases.
 
Strategic Capital Expenses.  Strategic capital expenses generally include the direct expenses associated with the asset
management of the co-investment ventures provided by our employees who are assigned to our Strategic Capital segment and the
costs of our Prologis Promote Plan (“PPP”) based on earned promotes. For further discussion on the PPP , see Note 12. In addition, in
order to achieve ef ficiencies and economies of scale, all of our property management and leasing functions are provided by property
management and leasing personnel who are assigned to our Real Estate Operations segment. These individuals perform the
property-level management and leasing of the properties in our owned and managed portfolio, which include properties we
consolidate and those we manage that are owned by the unconsolidated co-investment ventures. W e allocate the costs of our
property management and leasing teams to the properties we consolidate (included in Rental Expenses ) and the properties owned by
the unconsolidated co-investment ventures (included in Strategic Capital Expenses ) by using the square feet owned by the respective
portfolios.
 
Equity-Based Compensation.  We account for equity-based compensation by measuring the cost of employee services received in
exchange for an award of an equity instrument based on the fair value of the award on the grant date. W e recognize the cost of the
award on a straight-line basis over the period during which an employee is required to provide service in exchange for the award,
generally the vesting period.
 
Income T axes.  Under the IRC, REIT s are generally not required to pay federal income taxes if they distribute 100% of their taxable
income and meet certain income, asset and stockholder tests. If we fail to qualify as a REIT in any taxable year , we will be subject to
federal income taxes at regular corporate rates and may not be able to qualify as a REIT for the four subsequent taxable years. Even
as a REIT , we may be subject to certain foreign, state and local taxes on our own income and property , and to federal income and
excise taxes on our undistributed taxable income.
 
We have elected taxable REIT subsidiary (“TRS”) status for some of our consolidated subsidiaries. This allows us to provide services
that would otherwise be considered impermissible for REIT s. Many of the foreign countries in which we have operations do not
recognize REIT s or do not accord REIT status under their respective tax laws to our entities that operate in their jurisdiction. In the
U.S., we are taxed in certain states in which we operate. Accordingly , we recognize income tax expense for the federal and state
income taxes incurred by our TRSs, taxes incurred in certain states and foreign jurisdictions, and interest and penalties associated
with our unrecognized tax benefit liabilities.
 
We evaluate tax positions taken in the Consolidated Financial Statements under the interpretation for accounting for uncertainty in
income taxes. As a result of this evaluation, we may recognize a tax benefit from an uncertain tax position only if it is more likely than
not that the tax position will be sustained on examination by taxing authorities.
 
We recognize deferred income taxes in certain taxable entities. For federal income tax purposes, certain acquisitions have been
treated as tax-free transactions resulting in a carry-over basis in assets and liabilities. For financial reporting purposes and in
accordance with purchase accounting, we record all of the acquired assets and assumed liabilities based on their relative fair value at
date of acquisition, as discussed above. For our taxable subsidiaries, including certain international jurisdictions, we recognize the
deferred income tax liabilities that represent the tax ef fect of the dif ference between the tax basis carried over and the fair value of the
tangible and intangible assets at date of acquisition. Any subsequent increases or decreases to the deferred income tax liability
recorded in connection with these acquisitions, are reflected in earnings.
 
If taxable income is generated in these subsidiaries, we recognize a benefit in earnings as a result of the reversal of the deferred
income tax liability previously recorded at the acquisition date and we record current income tax expense representing the entire
current income tax liability . If the reversal of the deferred income tax liability results from a sale or contribution of assets, the
classification of the reversal to the Consolidated Statements of Income is based on the taxability of the transaction. If the sale or
contribution is of the real estate asset and results in a taxable transaction, the reversal is recorded to deferred income tax benefit. If
the sale or contribution is the disposition of the entity that owns the asset, the reversal is recorded through gains.
 
Deferred income tax expense is generally a function of the period’ s temporary dif ferences (items that are treated dif ferently for tax
purposes than for financial reporting purposes) and the utilization of tax net operating losses (“NOL”) generated in prior years that had
been previously recognized as deferred income tax assets. W e provide for a valuation allowance for deferred income tax assets if we
believe all or some portion of the deferred income tax asset may not be realized. Any increase or decrease in the valuation allowance
that results from a change in circumstances that causes a change in the estimated ability to realize the related deferred income tax
asset is included in deferred tax expense.
 
Environmental Costs.  We incur certain environmental remediation costs, including cleanup costs, consulting fees for environmental
studies and investigations, monitoring costs, and legal costs relating to cleanup, litigation defense, and the pursuit of responsible third
parties. W e expense costs incurred in connection with operating properties and properties previously sold. W e capitalize costs related
to undeveloped land as development costs and include any expected future environmental liabilities at the time of acquisition. W e
maintain a liability for the estimated costs of environmental remediation expected to be incurred in connection with undeveloped land,
acquired operating properties and properties previously sold that we adjust as appropriate as information becomes available.
68
 
 
New Accounting Pronouncements.
 
New Accounting Standards Adopted
 
Accounting for Lease Concessions Related to the Effects of the Coronavirus (“COVID-19”) Pandemic . In April 2020, the Financial
Accounting Standards Board (“F ASB”) issued a Staf f Question-and-Answer (“Q&A”) to clarify whether lease concessions related to the
effects of COVID-19 require the application of the lease modification guidance under the new lease standard, which we adopted on
January 1, 2019. For rent deferrals granted during the year ended December 31, 2020, we are allowing customers to defer rental
payments until a later period than was originally contracted under the lease in exchange for a note receivable, and we are continuing
to recognize rental revenue during the period. In accordance with the Q&A, we are electing to not apply the lease modification
guidance to concessions that result in deferred rent as the total cash flows required by the modified lease agreements are materially
the same as the cash flows required under the original lease and there are no substantive changes to the consideration. During 2020,
we deferred approximately $ 23 million of rental payments which represented less than 1% of our total consolidated rental revenue for
2020. At January 25, 2021, we had collected approximately $ 16 million, or 98%, of the deferred payments due at December 31 st, with
the remainder due in 2021. If we grant concessions to a customer that modify the terms and significantly change the underlying cash
flows of the original lease for the remaining term, we will account for these changes as a lease modification in accordance with U.S.
GAAP .
 
Reference Rate Reform . In July 2017, the Financial Conduct Authority and other independent groups announced they intended to
stop compelling banks to submit rates for the calculation of the London Inter-bank Of fered Rate (“LIBOR”) after 2021. As a result, in
the U.S., the Federal Reserve Board and the Federal Reserve Bank of New Y ork identified the Secured Overnight Financing Rate
(“SOFR”) as its preferred alternative rate for USD LIBOR in debt and derivative financial instruments. Additionally , other global
regulators have undertaken reference rate reform initiatives to identify a preferred alternative rate for other interbank of fered rates
(“IBORs”). Both LIBOR and IBOR are herein referred to as “IBOR-indexed rate”. In November 2020, the Federal Reserve Board along
with various independent groups announced the potential for certain USD LIBOR tenors to continue to be published until June 2023.
This change would allow most legacy USD LIBOR contracts to mature before disruptions occur in the USD LIBOR market, without the
need to transition those contracts to SOFR.
 
In March 2020, the F ASB issued an Accounting Standard Update (“ASU”) that provided practical expedients to address existing
guidance on contract modifications and hedge accounting due to the expected market transition from an IBOR-indexed rate to
alternative reference rates, such as SOFR for LIBOR. W e refer to this transition as “reference rate reform.”
 
The first practical expedient within the ASU allows companies to elect to not apply certain modification accounting requirements to
debt, derivative and lease contracts af fected by reference rate reform if certain criteria are met. These criteria include the following: (i)
the contract referenced an IBOR-indexed rate that is expected to be discontinued; (ii) the modified terms directly replace or have the
potential to replace the IBOR-indexed rate that is expected to be discontinued; and (iii) any contemporaneous changes to other terms
that change or have the potential to change the amount and timing of contractual cash flows must be related to the replacement of the
IBOR-indexed rate. If the contract meets all three criteria, there is no requirement for remeasurement of the contract at the
modification date or reassessment of the previous accounting determination.
 
The second practical expedient allows companies to change the reference rate and other critical terms related to the reference rate
reform in derivative hedge documentation without having to dedesignate the hedging relationship. This allows for companies to
continue applying hedge accounting to existing cash flow and net investment hedges.
 
The ASU was ef fective upon issuance on a prospective basis beginning January 1, 2020 and may be elected over time as reference
rate reform activities occur . We have not modified any contracts to date however , we will evaluate any debt, derivative and lease
contracts that are modified in the future to ensure they are eligible for modification relief and apply the practical expedients as needed.
 
NOTE 3. ACQUISITIONS
 
Liberty Transaction
 
On February 4, 2020 , we acquired Liberty Property T rust and Liberty Property Limited Partnership (collectively “Liberty” or the “Liberty
Transaction”).
 
The Liberty T ransaction was completed for $ 13.0 billion through the issuance of equity based on the value of the Prologis common
stock and units issued of $ 10.0 billion, the assumption of debt of $ 2.8 billion and transaction costs. In connection with the transaction,
each issued and outstanding share or unit held by a Liberty stockholder or unitholder was converted automatically into 0.675  shares of
Prologis common stock or common units of Prologis, L.P ., respectively , including shares and units under Liberty’ s equity incentive plan
that became fully vested at closing.
 
Through the Liberty T ransaction, we acquired a portfolio primarily comprised of logistics real estate assets, including 519 industrial
operating properties, aggregating 99.6 million square feet,  which are highly complementary to our U.S. portfolio in terms of product
quality , location and growth potential in  our key markets . There was approximately 34 million square feet of non-strategic industrial
properties acquired in the Liberty T ransaction that we do not intend to operate long-term. Depending on the expected hold period,
these assets are either classified as Assets Held for Sale or Contribution  or other real estate investments within Investments  in Real
Estate
69
 
Properties  in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. In addition, we acquired an ownership interest in eight  ventures that own industrial
and of fice properties.
 
The aggregate equity consideration is calculated below (in millions, except price per share):
 
Number of Prologis shares and units issued upon conversion of Liberty shares and units at February 4, 2020  109.01  
Multiplied by price of Prologis' common stock on February 3, 2020 $ 91.87  
Fair value of Prologis shares and units issued $ 10,015
 
 
We accounted for the Liberty T ransaction as an asset acquisition and as a result, the transaction costs of $ 115.8  million were
capitalized to the basis of the acquired properties. T ransaction costs included investment banker advisory fees, legal fees and other
costs.
 
Under acquisition accounting, the total purchase price was allocated to the Liberty real estate properties and related lease intangibles
on a relative fair value basis. All other assets acquired and liabilities assumed, including debt, and real estate assets that we do not
intend to operate long-term are recorded at fair value as follows (in millions):
 
Net investments in real estate $ 12,636  
Intangible assets, net of intangible liabilities  (1)  491 
Cash and other assets  233 
Debt  (2,845 )
Accounts payable, accrued expenses and other liabilities  (383)
Noncontrolling interests  (1)
Total purchase price, including transaction costs $ 10,131
 
 
(1) Intangible assets of $ 640.5  million and intangible liabilities of $ 149.9  million were included within Other Assets and Other
Liabilities , respectively , on the Consolidated Balance Sheets. The acquired lease intangibles from the Liberty T ransaction will be
amortized over the terms of the respective leases with a weighted average remaining lease term of 66 months.
 
DCT Transaction
 
We acquired DCT Industrial T rust Inc. and DCT Industrial Operating Partnership LP (collectively “DCT”) on August 22, 2018  (“DCT
Transaction”).
 
The DCT T ransaction was completed for $ 8.5 billion through the issuance of equity based on the closing price of Prologis’ common
stock on August 21, 2018 and the assumption of debt. In connection with the transaction, each issued and outstanding share or unit
held by a DCT stockholder or unitholder was converted automatically into 1.02 shares of Prologis common stock or common units of
Prologis, L.P ., respectively , including shares and units under DCT’ s equity incentive plan that became fully vested at closing.  
 
Through the DCT T ransaction, we acquired a portfolio of logistics real estate assets that consisted of 408 operating properties,
aggregating 68.0 million square feet, 10 properties under development, aggregating 2.8 million square feet and 305 acres of land with
build-out potential of 4.5 million square feet.
 
The aggregate equity consideration of approximately $ 6.6 billion is calculated below (in millions, except price per share):
 
Number of Prologis shares and units issued upon conversion of DCT shares and units at August 21, 2018  99.73  
Multiplied by price of Prologis' common stock on August 21, 2018 $ 65.75  
Fair value of Prologis shares and units issued $ 6,557
 
 
We accounted for the DCT T ransaction as an asset acquisition and as a result the transaction costs of $ 50.0 million were capitalized
to the basis of the acquired properties. T ransaction costs included investment banker advisory fees, legal fees and other costs.
 
Under acquisition accounting, the total purchase price was allocated to the DCT real estate properties and related lease intangibles on
a relative fair value basis. All other assets acquired and liabilities assumed, including debt, and real estate assets that we do not
intend to operate long-term are recorded at fair value as follows (in millions):  
 
Net investments in real estate $ 8,362  
Intangible assets, net of intangible liabilities  292 
Cash and other assets  24 
Debt  (1,863 )
Accounts payable, accrued expenses and other liabilities  (143)
Noncontrolling interests  (65)
Total purchase price, including transaction costs $ 6,607
 
 
70
 
 
NOTE 4. REAL ESTATE
 
Investments in real estate properties consisted of the following at December 31 (dollars and square feet in thousands):
 
 Square Feet   Number of Buildings     
 2020 (1)  2019   2020 (1)  2019   2020 (1)  2019  
Operating properties:                        
Buildings and improvements  441,336    354,297    2,261    1,876   $31,489,943   $23,067,625  
Improved land                  12,017,676    8,220,208  
Development portfolio, including land costs:                        
Prestabilized  6,076    9,133    24   28   553,266    784,584  
Properties under development  22,004    26,893    61   77   1,329,345    1,084,683  
Land (2)                  1,606,358    1,101,646  
Other real estate investments (3)                  3,387,740    965,668  
Total investments in real estate properties                  50,384,328    35,224,414  
Less accumulated depreciation                  6,539,156    5,437,662  
Net investments in real estate properties                 $43,845,172   $29,786,752
 
 
(1) Includes the acquired real estate properties from the Liberty T ransaction at December 31, 2020. See Note 3 for more
information.
 
(2) At December 31, 2020 and 2019, our land was comprised of 5,304  and 4,411  acres, respectively .
 
(3) Included in other real estate investments were: (i) non-strategic real estate assets acquired in the Liberty T ransaction t hat we do
not intend to operate long-term ; (ii) land parcels we own and lease to third parties; (iii) real estate assets that we intend to
redevelop into industrial properties; and (iv) costs associated with potential acquisitions and future development projects,
including purchase options on land.
 
At December 31, 2020, we had investments in real estate assets in the U.S. and other Americas (Brazil, Canada and Mexico), Europe
(Belgium, the Czech Republic, France, Germany , Hungary , Italy , the Netherlands, Poland, Slovakia, Spain, Sweden and the United
Kingdom (“U.K.”)) and Asia (China, Japan and Singapore).
 
Acquisitions
 
The following table summarizes our real estate acquisition activity , excluding the Liberty T ransaction and the DCT T ransaction as
discussed in Note 3, for the years ended December 31 (dollars and square feet in thousands):
 
  2020 (1)  2019   2018  
Number of operating properties   150   22   20 
Square feet   21,874    1,405    4,757  
Acres of land   830   1,269    1,210  
Acquisition cost of net investments in real estate (2)  $3,260,465   $1,074,815   $1,008,718
 
 
(1) In 2020, our two U.S. co-investment ventures, Prologis T argeted U.S. Logistics Fund, L.P . (“USLF”) and Prologis U.S. Logistics
Venture, LLC (“USL V”), acquired the wholly-owned real estate assets of Industrial Property T rust Inc. (“IPT”) for $ 2.0 billion each
in a cash transaction, including transaction costs and the assumption and repayment of debt (the “IPT T ransaction”). As USL V is
a consolidated co-investment venture, the number of operating properties, square feet and acquisition cost are included in the
consolidated acquisition activity . For further discussion on the acquisition by USLF , see Note 5, and by USL V, see Notes 8 and
11.
 
(2) Includes the acquisition cost of properties classified in other real estate investments of $ 206.1  million, $ 302.9  million and
$72.3 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
 
71
 
 
Dispositions
 
The following table summarizes our dispositions of net investments in real estate for the years ended December 31 (dollars and
square feet in thousands):
 
 2020   2019   2018  
Dispositions of development properties and land, net (1)            
Number of properties  41   31   44 
Square feet  14,482    10,027    15,527  
Net proceeds $1,693,557   $1,533,055   $1,803,240  
Gains on contributions and dispositions, net $464,942   $467,577   $469,817  
Total gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net $464,942   $467,577   $469,817  
            
Other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  (2)            
Number of properties  61   66   74 
Square feet  10,562    15,816    13,035  
Net proceeds $1,264,692   $1,492,212   $956,676  
Gains on contributions and dispositions, net $252,195   $255,219   $371,179  
Gains on partial redemptions of investment in an unconsolidated co-investment
     venture (3) $ -  $135,022   $ - 
Total gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net $252,195   $390,241   $371,179
 
 
(1) The gains we recognize in Gains on Dispositions of Development Properties and Land, Net  are primarily driven by the
contribution of newly developed properties to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
(2) In 2019, we formed Prologis Brazil Logistics V enture (“PBL V”), a Brazilian unconsolidated co-investment venture, with one
partner . We contributed an initial portfolio of real estate properties to PBL V consisting of 14 operating properties totaling 6.9
million square feet and 371 acres of land. W e received cash proceeds and units for our 20% equity interest .
 
(3) In 2019, we redeemed a portion of our investment in a European unconsolidated co-investment venture.
 
Leases
 
We adopted the new lease standard on January 1, 2019 and applied it to leases that were in place on the ef fective date for both
Prologis as a lessor and lessee. Our results for reporting periods beginning January 1, 2019 are presented under the new lease
standard. W e elected the package of practical expedients and were not required to reassess the following upon adoption: (i) whether
an expired or existing contract met the definition of a lease; (ii) the lease classification at January 1, 2019 for existing leases; and (iii)
whether leasing costs previously capitalized as initial direct costs would continue to be amortized.
 
As a Lessor
 
We lease our operating properties to customers under agreements that are classified primarily as operating leases. W e recognize the
total minimum lease payments provided for under the leases on a straight-line basis over the lease term. Our weighted average lease
term remaining was 50 months based on square feet for all leases in ef fect at December 31, 2020.
 
The following table summarizes the minimum lease payments due from our customers on leases with an original lease term greater
than one year for space in our operating properties, prestabilized and under development properties, other real estate investments
and assets held for sale or contribution at December 31, 2020 (in thousands):  
     
2021  $ 2,864,803  
2022   2,586,203  
2023   2,192,529  
2024   1,790,240  
2025   1,435,199  
Thereafter   4,863,735  
Total  $ 15,732,709
 
 
These amounts do not reflect future rental revenue from the renewal or replacement of existing leases and exclude reimbursements of
operating expenses and rental increases that are not fixed.
 
72
 
 
As a Lessee
 
We had approximately 130 land and of fice space leases in which we were the lessee at December 31, 2020 and 2019, which primarily
qualify as operating leases with remaining lease terms of 1 to 89 years . Our lease liabilities were $ 487.0  million and $ 471.6  million at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
 
The following table summarizes the fixed, future minimum rental payments, excluding variable costs, for which the lease has
commenced as of December 31, 2020, with amounts discounted by our incremental borrowing rates to calculate the lease liabilities of
our leases (in thousands):
     
2021  $ 46,504  
2022   47,270  
2023   44,613  
2024   43,107  
2025   36,877  
Thereafter   782,489  
Total undiscounted rental payments   1,000,860  
Less imputed interest   513,888  
Total lease liabilities  $ 486,972
 
 
The weighted average remaining lease term for these leases was 34 and 33 years at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively . We
do not include renewal options in the lease term for calculating the lease liability unless we are reasonably certain we will exercise the
option or the lessor has the sole ability to exercise the option. The weighted average incremental borrowing rate was 3.4% and 3.7%
at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively . We assigned a collateralized interest rate to each lease based on the term of the lease
and the currency in which the lease was denominated.
 
NOTE 5. UNCONSOLIDATED ENTITIES
 
Summary of Investments
 
We have investments in entities through a variety of ventures. W e co-invest in entities that own multiple properties with partners and
investors and we provide asset and property management services to these entities, which we refer to as co-investment ventures.
These entities may be consolidated or unconsolidated depending on the structure, our partner ’s participation and other rights and our
level of control of the entity . This note details our investments in unconsolidated co-investment ventures, which are related parties and
accounted for using the equity method of accounting. See Note 11 for more detail regarding our consolidated investments that are not
wholly owned.
 
We also have investments in other ventures, generally with one partner and that we do not manage, which we account for using the
equity method. W e refer to our investments in both unconsolidated co-investment ventures and other ventures, collectively , as
unconsolidated entities.
 
The following table summarizes our investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019  
Unconsolidated co-investment ventures  $ 6,685,567   $ 5,873,784  
Other ventures  (1)   916,447    363,587  
Total unconsolidated entities  $ 7,602,014   $ 6,237,371
 
 
(1) In 2020, we completed the Liberty T ransaction and acquired an equity method investment in eight  ventures.
 
73
 
 
Unconsolidated Co-Investment Ventures
 
The following table summarizes our investments in the individual co-investment ventures at December 31 (dollars in thousands):
 
  Ownership
Percentage  Investment in
and Advances to 
Co-Investment V enture  2020   2019   2020   2019  
Prologis T argeted U.S. Logistics Fund, L.P . (“USLF”)   25.6%  27.3% $1,885,467   $1,728,043  
FIBRA Prologis (1)   46.8%  47.1%  691,204    517,347  
Prologis European Logistics Partners Sàrl (“PELP”) (2)   50.0%  50.0%  1,687,749    1,595,331  
Prologis European Logistics Fund (“PELF”)   24.3%  24.1%  1,401,355    1,144,831  
Prologis UK Logistics V enture (“UKL V”) (2)   15.0%  15.0%  63,228    59,937  
Nippon Prologis REIT , Inc. (“NPR”) (3)   15.1%  15.1%  643,663    544,333  
Prologis China Core Logistics Fund, LP (“PCCLF”)   15.8%  15.6%  81,581    59,984  
Prologis China Logistics V enture I, LP , II, LP and III, LP
     (“Prologis China Logistics V enture”) (2)   15.0%  15.0%  111,406    83,285  
Prologis Brazil Logistics V enture (“PBL V”) and other joint ventures (2)   20.0%  20.0%  119,914    140,693  
Total          $6,685,567   $5,873,784
 
 
(1) At December 31, 2020, we owned 397.4  million units of FIBRA Prologis that had a closing price of Ps 44.64  ($2.24) per unit on
the Mexican Stock Exchange. W e have granted FIBRA Prologis a right of first refusal with respect to stabilized properties that
we plan to sell in Mexico.
 
(2)We have one partner in each of these co-investment ventures.
 
(3)At December 31, 2020, we owned 0.4 million units of NPR that  had a closing price of ¥ 322,000  ($3,124 ) per share on the T okyo
Stock Exchange. For any properties we develop and plan to sell in Japan, we have committed to of fer those properties to NPR if
we determine the properties meet NPR’ s investment objectives.
 
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had receivables from NPR of $ 160.3  million and $ 136.3  million, respectively , related to
customer security deposits that originated through a leasing company owned by us that pertain to properties previously
contributed to NPR. W e have a corresponding payable to NPR’ s customers in Other Liabilities . These amounts are repaid to us
as the leases turn over .
 
The amounts recognized in Strategic Capital Revenues  and Earnings from Unconsolidated Entities, Net  depend on the size,
operations and transactions of the unconsolidated co-investment ventures, the timing of revenues earned through promotes and
transactional fees, as well as fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates and our ownership interest. W e recognized Strategic
Capital Expenses  for direct costs associated with the asset management of these ventures and allocated property-level management
and leasing costs for the properties owned by the ventures.
 
The following table summarizes the Strategic Capital Revenues  we recognized in the Consolidated Statements of Income related to
our unconsolidated co-investment ventures (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019   2018  
Recurring fees  $318,423   $266,615   $230,746  
Transactional fees   65,804    57,334    55,816  
Promote revenue (1)   239,268    165,635    116,290  
Total strategic capital revenues from unconsolidated co-investment ventures (2) $623,495   $489,584   $402,852
 
 
(1) Includes promote revenue earned primarily from our unconsolidated co-investment venture in the U.S. in 2020, Europe in 2019
and China and Europe in 2018.
 
(2) These amounts exclude strategic capital revenues from other ventures.
 
74
 
 
The following table summarizes the key property information, financial position and operating information of our unconsolidated co-
investment ventures (not our proportionate share) and the amounts we recognized in the Consolidated Financial Statements related to
our unconsolidated co-investment ventures at December 31 and for the years ended December 31 (dollars and square feet in
millions):
 
 U.S. Other Americas (2) Europe Asia Total  
As of: 2020 (1)  2019  2020  2019  2020  2019  2020  2019  2020  2019 
Key property information:                                        
Ventures  1   1   2   2   3   3   3   3   9   9 
Operating properties  706   605   229   214   768   731   167   144   1,870   1,694 
Square feet  117   99   51   44   185   176   67   59   420   378 
                                        
Financial position:                                        
Total assets ($)  10,840   8,408   3,023   2,707   16,918   14,677   10,209   8,758   40,990   34,550 
Third-party debt ($)  3,129   2,130   854   769   4,002   3,213   3,831   3,296   11,816   9,408 
Total liabilities ($)  3,722   2,514   898   801   5,607   4,575   4,389   3,751   14,616   11,641 
                                        
Our investment balance ($)
(3)  1,886   1,728   811   658   3,152   2,800   837   688   6,686   5,874 
Our weighted average
ownership  (4)  25.6%  27.3%  40.8%  39.1%  30.0%  30.2%  15.2%  15.1%  26.1%  27.1%
 
 U.S.   Other Americas   Europe   Asia   Total  
Operating Information:2020
(1)  2019  2018  2020
(2)  2019
(2)  2018  2020 2019  2018  2020  2019  2018  2020  2019  2018 
For the years ended:                                                           
Total revenues ($)  946   738   676   278   266   217   1,208  1,099   1,101   584   514   457   3,016   2,617   2,451 
Net earnings ($)  169   128   150   91   91   63   390  311   509   255   49   88   905   579   810 
                                                           
Our earnings from
unconsolidated
     co-investment ventures,
net ($)  46   38   45   34   32   26   121  102   193   39   10   15   240   182   279
 
 
(1)In 2020, USLF acquired a portfolio of 108 operating properties, aggregating 18.3 million square feet, in the IPT T ransaction for
cash consideration of $ 2.0 billion, including transaction costs and the assumption and repayment of debt.
 
(2) PBLV and our other Brazilian joint ventures are combined as one venture for the purpose of this table.
 
(3)Prologis’ investment balance is presented at our adjusted basis derived from the ventures’ U.S. GAAP information. The
difference between our ownership interest of a venture’ s equity and our investment balance at December 31, 2020 and 2019,
results principally from four types of transactions: (i) deferred gains from the contribution of property to a venture prior to January
1, 2018 ($ 589.3  million and $ 611.5  million, respectively); (ii) recording additional costs associated with our investment in the
venture ($ 101.5  million and $ 87.2 million, respectively); (iii) receivables, principally for fees and promotes ($ 165.6  million and
$152.0  million, respectively); and (iv) customer security deposits retained subsequent to property contributions to NPR, as
discussed above.
 
(4)Represents our weighted average ownership interest in all unconsolidated co-investment ventures based on each entity’ s
contribution of total assets before depreciation, net of other liabilities.
 
Equity Commitments Related to Certain Unconsolidated Co-Investment Ventures
 
Certain unconsolidated co-investment ventures have equity commitments from us and our venture partners. Our venture partners
fulfill their equity commitment with cash. W e may fulfill our equity commitment through contributions of properties or cash. The
contributions are generally used for the acquisition or development of properties but may be used for the repayment of debt or other
general uses. The venture may obtain financing for the acquisition of properties and therefore the acquisition price of additional
investments that the venture could make may be more than the equity commitment. Depending on market conditions, the investment
objectives of the ventures, our liquidity needs and other factors, we may make additional contributions of properties or additional cash
investments in these ventures.
 
At December 31, 2020, our outstanding equity commitments were $ 346.2  million, primarily for Prologis China Logistics V enture.  The
equity commitments expire from 2021  to 2028  if they have not been previously called.
 
 
75
 
NOTE 6. ASSETS HELD FOR SALE OR CONTRIBUTION
 
We had investments in certain real estate properties that met the criteria to be classified as held for sale or contribution at December
31, 2020 and 2019. At the time of classification, these properties were expected to be sold to third parties or were recently stabilized
and expected to be contributed to unconsolidated co-investment ventures within twelve months. The amounts included in Assets Held
for Sale or Contribution  represented real estate investment balances and the related assets and liabilities for each property .
 
Assets held for sale or contribution, including certain properties acquired through the Liberty T ransaction and the IPT T ransaction,
consisted of the following at December 31 (dollars and square feet in thousands):
 
  2020   2019  
Number of operating properties   66   28 
Square feet   12,923    9,371  
Total assets held for sale or contribution  $1,070,724   $720,685  
Total liabilities associated with assets held for sale or contribution – included in Other Liabilities  $ 16,214   $ 41,994
 
 
NOTE 7. OTHER ASSETS AND OTHER LIABILITIES
 
The following table summarizes our other assets, net of amortization and depreciation, if applicable, at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019  
Acquired lease intangibles  $ 726,821   $ 314,179  
Rent leveling   488,828    404,516  
Leasing commissions   425,995    381,013  
Accounts receivable   189,356    85,835  
Value added taxes receivable   146,270    120,923  
Prepaid assets   138,726    109,676  
Fixed assets   117,700    107,468  
Other notes receivable   44,751    35,308  
Management contracts   13,610    14,888  
Deferred income taxes   5,592    4,595  
Derivative assets   1,667    13,266  
Other   156,892    120,190  
Total  $2,456,208   $1,711,857
 
The following table summarizes our other liabilities, net of amortization, if applicable, at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019  
Tenant security deposits  $ 342,627   $ 269,841  
Acquired lease intangibles   197,807    58,525  
Unearned rents   152,536    106,152  
Income tax liabilities   86,210    65,652  
Environmental liabilities   69,930    63,577  
Indemnification liability   45,129    39,830  
Derivative liabilities   36,482    23,851  
Value added taxes payable   23,959    10,036  
Liabilities associated with assets held for sale or contribution   16,214    41,994  
Deferred income   15,437    11,971  
Other   274,674    186,172  
Total  $1,261,005   $ 877,601
 
 
The following table summarizes the expected future amortization of leasing commissions and forgone rent (included in acquired lease
intangibles above) into amortization expense and above and below market leases (included in acquired lease intangibles above) and
rent leveling net assets into rental revenues, all based on the balances at December 31, 2020 (in thousands):
 
  Amortization
Expense   Net Decrease (Increase) to
Rental Revenues 
2021  $ 266,638   $ (39,910 )
2022   208,520    19,333  
2023   159,608    48,081  
2024   119,608    60,040  
2025   87,538    60,778  
Thereafter   211,129    242,474  
Total  $ 1,053,041   $ 390,796
 
76
 
 
 
NOTE 8. DEBT
 
All debt is incurred by the OP or its consolidated subsidiaries. The following table summarizes our debt at December 31 (dollars in
thousands):
 
 2020   2019  
 Weighted A verage   Amount   Weighted A verage   Amount  
 Interest Rate  (1)  Term (2)  Outstanding
(3)   Interest Rate  (1)  Term (2)  Outstanding (3) 
Credit facilities 0.8%    2.0   $ 171,794   0.4%    1.1   $ 184,255  
Senior notes (4)(5) 2.0%    11.2    14,275,870   2.4%    8.2    9,660,570  
Term loans and unsecured other (4) 0.9%    5.6    1,764,311   0.9%    7.5    1,441,882  
Secured mortgage (4)(6)(7) 3.1%    3.0    637,101   3.4%    4.0    619,170  
Total 1.9%    10.2   $ 16,849,076   2.2%    7.8   $ 11,905,877
 
 
(1) The interest rates presented represent the ef fective interest rates (including amortization of debt issuance costs and the
noncash premiums or discounts) at the end of the period for the debt outstanding and include the impact of designated interest
rate swaps, which ef fectively fix the interest rate on certain variable rate debt.
 
(2) The weighted average term represents the remaining maturity in years on the debt outstanding at period end.
 
(3)We borrow in the functional currencies of the countries where we invest. Included in the outstanding balances at December 31
were borrowings denominated in the following currencies:
 
   2020   2019  
   Weighted A verage
Interest Rate   Amount
Outstanding   % of
Total   Weighted A verage
Interest Rate   Amount
Outstanding   % of
Total  
 British pound sterling   2.2% $1,019,480    6.1%  2.3% $ 656,549    5.5%
 Canadian dollar   2.7%  285,708    1.7%  3.4%  279,730    2.3%
 Euro   1.4%  6,549,676    38.8%  1.9%  6,128,986    51.5%
 Japanese yen   0.8%  2,877,247    17.1%  0.7%  2,329,381    19.6%
 U.S. dollar   2.8%  6,116,965    36.3%  4.4%  2,511,231    21.1%
 Total   1.9% $16,849,076        2.2% $11,905,877     
 
 
(4)Through the Liberty T ransaction, we assumed $ 2.5 billion of senior notes, $ 246.9  million of secured mortgage debt and a $ 100.1
million term loan with a weighted average stated interest rate of 3.8%. W e subsequently paid down $ 1.8 billion of the assumed
debt with senior notes we issued at lower rates in February 2020. See below for additional activity on debt assumed in the
Liberty T ransaction and the extinguishment of a significant portion of the debt subsequent to acquisition.
 
(5)Senior notes are due from February 2022  to October 2050  with ef fective interest rates ranging from - 0.2% to 4.5% at December
31, 2020.
 
(6)Through the IPT T ransaction, USL V assumed $ 341.8  million of secured mortgage debt, all of which was paid down at closing.
See below for the early extinguishment of debt in the IPT T ransaction.
 
(7)Secured mortgage debt is due from January 2021  to November 2027  with ef fective interest rates ranging from 0.2% to 7.8% at
December 31, 2020. The debt was principally secured by 85 operating properties and 1 prestabilized property with an aggregate
undepreciated cost of $ 1.6 billion at December 31, 2020.
 
Credit Facilities
 
We have a global senior credit facility (the “Global Facility”) under which we may draw in British pounds sterling, Canadian dollars,
euro, Japanese yen, Mexican pesos  and U.S. dollars on a revolving basis up to $ 3.5 billion (subject to currency fluctuations). Pricing
under the Global Facility , including the spread over LIBOR, facility fees and letter of credit fees, varies based on the public debt
ratings of the OP . The Global Facility is scheduled to mature in January 2023 ; however , we may extend the maturity date for six
months on two occasions, subject to the satisfaction of certain conditions and payment of extension fees. W e have the ability to
increase the Global Facility to $ 4.5 billion, subject to currency fluctuations and obtaining additional lender commitments.
 
We also have a Japanese yen revolver (the “Revolver”) that we upsized in July 2020 with total commitments of ¥ 55.0 billion ($ 533.6
million at December 31, 2020). W e have the ability to increase the borrowing capacity of the Revolver to ¥ 75.0 billion ($ 727.6  million
at December 31, 2020), subject to obtaining additional lender commitments. Pricing under the Revolver , including the spread over Y en
LIBOR, facility fees and letter of credit fees, varies based on the public debt ratings of the OP . At December 31, 2020, the Revolver is
scheduled to mature in July 2024 ; however , we may extend the maturity date for one year , subject to the satisfaction of certain
conditions and payment of extension fees.
 
We refer to the Global Facility and the Revolver , collectively , as our “Credit Facilities.”
77
 
 
Liquidity
 
The following table summarizes information about our available liquidity (dollars in millions):
 
  2020   2019   2018  
For the years ended December 31:             
Weighted average daily interest rate   1.1%  1.5%  3.1%
Weighted average daily borrowings  $ 109  $ 85  $ 253 
Maximum borrowings outstanding at any month-end  $ 727  $ 257  $ 485 
At December 31:             
Aggregate lender commitments             
Credit Facilities  $ 4,119   $ 3,946   $ 3,470  
Less:             
Borrowings outstanding   172   184   51 
Outstanding letters of credit   24   36   31 
Current availability  $ 3,923   $ 3,726   $ 3,388  
Available term loans   250   500   - 
Cash and cash equivalents   598   1,089    344 
Total liquidity  $ 4,771   $ 5,315   $ 3,732  
            
 
Senior Notes
 
The senior notes are unsecured and our obligations are ef fectively subordinated in certain respects to any of our debt that is secured
by a lien on real property , to the extent of the value of such real property . The senior notes require interest payments be made
quarterly , semi-annually or annually . The majority of the senior notes are redeemable at any time at our option, subject to certain
prepayment penalties. Such repurchase and other terms are governed by the provisions of indenture agreements, various note
purchase agreements or trust deeds.
 
The following table summarizes the issuances and redemptions of senior notes during 2020 (principal in thousands):
 
  Aggregate Principal   Issuance Date W eighted A verage    
Initial Borrowing
Date  Borrowing
Currency   USD (1)  Interest Rate (2)   Term  (3)  Maturity Dates
February (4)(5)  € 1,350,000   $ 1,485,405   0.6%    10.7   February 2022 – 2035
February (4)  $ 2,200,000   $ 2,200,000   2.4%    15.0   April 2027 – 2050
February  £ 250,000   $ 322,490   1.9%    15.8   February 2035
June  (5)(6)  ¥41,200,000   $ 386,314   1.0%    12.4   June 2027 – 2050
August (5)(7)  $ 1,250,000   $ 1,250,000   1.6%    18.2   October 2030 – 2050
September  ¥19,700,000   $ 186,835   1.0%    14.1   September 2032 – 2040
December  € 300,000   $ 364,980   0.0%    2.0   December 2022
                   
  Aggregate Principal   Redemption Date W eighted A verage    
Redemption Date  Borrowing
Currency   USD (1)  Interest Rate (2)   Term  (3)  Maturity Dates
January  € 400,000   $ 445,880   0.0%    0.1   January 2020
March  (4)  € 700,000   $ 783,090   1.4%    1.2   May 2021
June  (6)  € 212,598   $ 238,067   3.0%    1.6   January 2022
June  (6)  € 100,486   $ 112,524   3.4%    3.6   February 2024
September (7)  $ 850,000   $ 850,000   4.3%    2.9   August 2023
December  € 485,066   $ 595,710   3.0%    1.1   January 2022
 
(1) The exchange rate used to translate into U.S. dollars was the spot rate at the settlement date.
 
(2) The interest rate represents the fixed or variable interest rate at the issuance or redemption date of the related debt.
 
(3) The issuance date and redemption date weighted average term represent the remaining maturity in years on the related debt at
the issuance or redemption date, respectively .
 
(4) We utilized the proceeds from these issuances to redeem $ 1.8 billion of debt assumed in the Liberty T ransaction, primarily
senior notes as discussed above, and our €700.0  million ($ 783.1  million) senior notes due in May 2021 . The remainder of the
proceeds were used for the repayment of other debt and general corporate purposes.
 
78
 
 
(5) Approximately $ 1.5 billion of the proceeds from the issuance of these notes were to fund sustainable and environmentally
beneficial projects and buildings in accordance with our green bond framework.
 
(6) We utilized the proceeds from the issuance of the Japanese yen senior notes to redeem €212.6  million ($ 238.1  million) and
€100.5  million ($ 112.5  million)  of the euro senior notes due in January 2022  and February 2024 , respectively , through a tender
offer.
 
(7) We utilized the proceeds from this issuance to redeem $850.0  million of senior notes due in August 2023 .
 
In February 2020, we completed an exchange of fer for two series of Liberty’ s senior notes for an aggregate amount of $ 750.0  million,
with $ 689.8  million, or 92%, of the aggregate principal amount being validly tendered for exchange. These senior notes are in the
aggregate principal amounts of $ 400.0  million due in October 2026  with an interest rate of 3.3% and $ 350.0  million due in February
2029  with an interest rate of 4.4%. The senior notes were exchanged for notes issued by a wholly owned subsidiary and guaranteed
by the OP . As a result of the exchange of fer, we have no separate remaining financial reporting obligations or financial covenants
associated with the senior notes assumed in the Liberty T ransaction. All other terms of the exchanged Liberty senior notes remained
substantially the same.
 
Term Loans
 
The following table summarizes our outstanding term loans at December 31 (dollars and borrowing currency in thousands):
 
Term LoanBorrowing
Currency Initial
Borrowing
Date  Lender Commitment at
2020   Amount
Outstanding
at 2020  Amount
Outstanding
at 2019  Interest Rate  Maturity Date
     Borrowing
Currency USD  USD   USD        
2017 Term Loan (1)USD, EUR,
JPY and GBP June 2014 $ 500,000 $500,000  $ 250,000  $ -  LIBOR + 0.9%  May 2021
2015 Canadian
     Term Loan CAD  December
2015  $ 170,506 $133,837   133,837   131,214  CDOR + 0.9%  February 2023
March 2017 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  March 2017 ¥12,000,000 $116,414   116,414   110,553  0.9% and
1.0%   March 2027 – 2028
October 2017 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  October
2017  ¥10,000,000 $97,012   97,012   92,127  0.9%   October 2032
December 2018 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  December
2018  ¥20,000,000 $194,023   194,023   184,254  1.2% and Yen
LIBOR + 0.7%  December 2031 –
June 2033
January 2019 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  January
2019  ¥15,000,000 $145,517   145,517   138,191  Yen LIBOR +
0.5% to 0.6%  January 2028 –
2030
March 2019 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  March 2019 ¥85,000,000 $824,599   824,599   783,082  Yen LIBOR +
0.4%   March 2026
Subtotal             1,761,402   1,439,421       
Debt issuance costs, net            (7,385)  (8,484)      
Total term loans            $1,754,017  $1,430,937      
 
 
(1) During 2020, we extended the maturity of the multi-currency term loan (“2017 T erm Loan”) by one year until May 2021 . We may
extend the maturity for one additional year , subject to the satisfaction of certain conditions and the payment of an extension fee.
During 2020 and 2019, we borrowed a net $250 million and paid down a net $ 496.5  million on the 2017 T erm Loan, respectively .
 
Long-Term Debt Maturities
 
Scheduled principal payments due on our debt for each year through the period ended December 31, 2025, and thereafter were as
follows at December 31, 2020 (in thousands):
 
 Unsecured        
  Credit   Senior   Term Loans   Secured      
Maturity  Facilities   Notes   and Other   Mortgage   Total  
2021  (1)(2)  $ -  $ -  $ 260,294   $ 115,767   $ 376,061  
2022   -   552,195    -   75,124    627,319  
2023 (3)   171,794    -   133,837    34,041    339,672  
2024   -   735,664    -   269,271    1,004,935  
2025   -   798,506    -   142,284    940,790  
Thereafter   -   12,251,211    1,377,565    2,468    13,631,244  
Subtotal   171,794    14,337,576    1,771,696    638,955    16,920,021  
Premiums (discounts), net   -   10,901    -   260   11,161  
Debt issuance costs, net   -   (72,607 )  (7,385 )  (2,114 )  (82,106 )
Total  $ 171,794   $14,275,870   $ 1,764,311   $ 637,101   $16,849,076 
79
 
 
(1)We expect to repay the amounts maturing in the next twelve months  with cash generated from operations, proceeds from
dispositions of real estate properties, or as necessary , with borrowings on our Credit Facilities.
 
(2)Included in the 2021 maturities is the 2017 T erm Loan that can be extended until 2022.
 
(3) Included in the 2023 maturities is the Global Facility that can be extended until 2024.
 
Interest Expense
 
The following table summarizes the components of interest expense for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019   2018  
Gross interest expense  $ 348,427   $ 271,451   $ 268,942  
Amortization of debt discounts (premiums), net   (6,741 )  3,713    (590)
Amortization of debt issuance costs, net   14,600    13,293    13,243  
Interest expense before capitalization  $ 356,286   $ 288,457   $ 281,595  
Capitalized amounts   (41,779 )  (48,504 )  (52,454 )
Net interest expense  $ 314,507   $ 239,953   $ 229,141  
Total cash paid for interest, net of amounts capitalized  $ 309,390   $ 214,375   $ 205,485
 
 
Early Extinguishment of Debt
 
Over the last three years, we repurchased or repaid certain debt before the maturity date in an ef fort to reduce our borrowing costs
and extend our debt maturities. As a result, the dif ference between the recorded debt (including premiums, discounts and related debt
issuance costs) and the consideration we paid to retire the debt, including fees, was recognized as gains or losses. Fees associated
with the restructuring of debt that meets the modification criteria, along with existing unamortized premium or discount and debt
issuance costs, are amortized over the term of the new debt .
 
We recognized losses of $ 188.3  million, $ 16.1 million and $ 2.6 million upon extinguishment of debt in 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively . During 2020 we issued $ 6.2 billion of senior notes, aggregate principal in U.S. dollars, and used the proceeds to redeem
certain higher interest rate debt before maturity . This resulted in extending our weighted average remaining maturity to 10 years and
lowering our weighted average ef fective interest rate to approximately 1.9% at December 31, 2020 and the recognition of losses on
early extinguishment of debt. The losses in 2020 included the extinguishment of debt assumed in the Liberty T ransaction and the IPT
Transaction, which represented the excess of the prepayment penalties over the premium recorded upon assumption of the debt.
 
Financial Debt Covenants
 
We had $ 14.3 billion of senior notes and $ 1.8 billion of term loans outstanding at December 31, 2020 that were subject to certain
financial covenants under their related indentures. W e are also subject to financial covenants under our Credit Facilities and certain
secured mortgage debt. At December 31, 2020, we were in compliance with all of our financial debt covenants.
 
Guarantee of Finance Subsidiary Debt
 
We have finance subsidiaries as part of our operations in Europe (Prologis Euro Finance LLC), Japan (Prologis Y en Finance LLC) and
the U.K. (Prologis Sterling Finance LLC) in order to mitigate our foreign currency risk by borrowing in the currencies in which we
invest. These entities are 100% indirectly owned by the OP and all unsecured debt issued or to be issued by each entity is or will be
fully and unconditionally guaranteed by the OP . There are no restrictions or limits on the OP’ s ability to obtain funds from its
subsidiaries by dividend or loan. In reliance on Rule 3-10 of Regulation S-X, the separate financial statements of Prologis Euro
Finance LLC, Prologis Y en Finance LLC and Prologis Sterling Finance LLC are not provided.
 
NOTE 9. STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY OF PROLOGIS, INC.
 
Shares Authorized
 
In 2020, our stockholders approved an amendment to our Articles of Incorporation that increased the number of authorized shares
from 1.0 billion to 2.0 billion shares of common stock. At December 31, 2020, 2.1 billion shares were authorized to be issued by the
Parent, of which 2.0 billion shares represent common stock and 0.1 billion shares represent preferred stock. Our board of directors
(the “Board”) may , without stockholder approval, classify or reclassify any unissued shares of our stock from time to time by setting or
changing the preferences, conversion or other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to distributions, qualifications and
terms or conditions of redemption of such shares.
 
80
 
 
Common Stock
 
In 2020, we entered into a new at-the-market program that allows us to sell up to $ 1.5 billion in aggregate gross sales proceeds of
shares of common stock through twenty  designated agents. These agents earn a fee of up to 2% of the gross sales price per share of
common stock as agreed to on a transaction-by-transaction basis. W e have not issued any shares of common stock under this new
program.
 
On February 4, 2020, we issued 106.7  million common shares in the Liberty T ransaction.  On August 22, 2018, we issued 96.2 million
common shares in the DCT T ransaction. See Note 3 for more detail on these transactions.
 
Under the 2020 Long-T erm Incentive Plan, certain of our employees and outside directors are able to participate in equity-based
compensation plans. See Note 12 for additional information on equity-based compensation plans.
 
Share Purchase Program
 
In 2020, the Board of Directors authorized a new share purchase program for the repurchase of outstanding shares of our common
stock on the open market or in privately negotiated transactions for an aggregate purchase price of up to $ 1.0 billion. In 2020, we
repurchased and retired 0.5 million shares of common stock for an aggregate price of $ 34.8 million at a weighted average price of
$64.66  per share on the open market.
 
Preferred Stock
 
In 2020, we repurchased approximately 0.1 million shares of Series Q preferred stock and recognized a loss of $ 2.3 million, which
primarily represented the dif ference between the repurchase price and the carrying value of the preferred stock, net of original
issuance costs.
 
At December 31, 2020 and 2019 our Series Q preferred stock outstanding had a dividend rate of 8.54% and will be redeemable at our
option on or after November 13, 2026. Holders have, subject to certain conditions, limited voting rights and all holders are entitled to
receive cumulative preferential dividends based on liquidation preference. The dividends are payable quarterly when, and if, they have
been declared by the Board, out of funds legally available for the payment of dividends.
 
Ownership Restrictions
 
For us to qualify as a REIT , five or fewer individuals may not own more than 50% of the value of our outstanding stock at any time
during the last half of our taxable year . Therefore, our charter restricts beneficial ownership (or ownership generally attributed to a
person under the REIT rules), by a person, or persons acting as a group, of issued and outstanding common and preferred stock that
would cause that person to own or be deemed to own more than 9.8% (by value or number of shares, whichever is more restrictive) of
our issued and outstanding capital stock. Furthermore, subject to certain exceptions, no person shall at any time directly or indirectly
acquire ownership of more than 25% of any of the preferred stock. These provisions assist us in protecting and preserving our REIT
status and protect the interests of stockholders in takeover transactions by preventing the acquisition of a substantial block of
outstanding shares of stock.
 
Shares of stock owned by a person or group of people in excess of these limits are subject to redemption by us. The provision does
not apply where a majority of the Board, in its sole and absolute discretion, waives such limit after determining that our status as a
REIT for federal income tax purposes will not be jeopardized.
 
Dividends
 
To comply with the REIT requirements of the IRC, we are generally required to make common and preferred stock dividends (other
than capital gain distributions) to our stockholders in amounts that together at least equal (i) the sum of (a) 90% of our “REIT taxable
income” computed without regard to the dividends paid deduction and net capital gains and (b) 90% of the net income (after tax), if
any, from foreclosure property , minus (ii) certain excess noncash income. Our common stock distribution policy is to distribute a
percentage of our cash flow that ensures that we will meet the distribution requirements of the IRC and that allows us to also retain
cash to meet other needs, such as capital improvements and other investment activities.
 
The taxability of our dividends for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 are presented below . The taxability of
dividends paid in 2020 was based on management’ s estimates as our tax return for the year ended December 31, 2020 has not been
filed. As the statute of limitations is generally three years, our tax returns for certain years remain subject to examination and
consequently the taxability of the dividends is subject to change.
 
81
 
 
In 2020, 2019 and 2018, we paid all of our dividends in cash.
 
The following summarizes the taxability of our common and preferred stock dividends for the years ended December 31:
 
  2020 (1)   2019   2018  
Common Stock:             
Ordinary income  $ 2.12  $ 2.08  $ 1.34 
Qualified dividend   0.00   0.00   0.03 
Capital gains   0.20   0.04   0.55 
Total distribution  $ 2.32  $ 2.12  $ 1.92 
Preferred Stock – Series Q:             
Ordinary income  $ 3.96  $ 4.00  $ 2.98 
Qualified dividend   0.02   0.01   0.06 
Capital gains   0.29   0.26   1.23 
Total dividend  $ 4.27  $ 4.27  $ 4.27
 
 
(1) Taxability for 2020 is estimated.
 
Common stock dividends are characterized for federal income tax purposes as ordinary income, qualified dividend, capital gains, non-
taxable return of capital or a combination of the four . Common stock dividends that exceed our current and accumulated earnings and
profits (calculated for tax purposes) constitute a return of capital rather than a dividend and generally reduce the stockholder ’s basis in
the common stock. T o the extent that a dividend exceeds both current and accumulated earnings and profits and the stockholder ’s
basis in the common stock, it will generally be treated as a gain from the sale or exchange of that stockholder ’s common stock. At the
beginning of each year , we notify our stockholders of the taxability of the common stock dividends paid during the preceding year .
 
Pursuant to the terms of our preferred stock, we are restricted from declaring or paying any dividend with respect to our common
stock unless and until all cumulative dividends with respect to the preferred stock have been paid and suf ficient funds have been set
aside for dividends that have been declared for the relevant dividend period with respect to the preferred stock.
 
NOTE 10. PARTNERS’ CAPITAL OF PROLOGIS, L.P.
 
Distributions paid on the common limited partnership units, and the taxability of those distributions, are similar to dividends paid on the
Parent’ s common stock disclosed above.
 
On February 4, 2020, we issued 2.3 million common limited partnership units in the OP in the Liberty T ransaction. On August 22,
2018, we issued 3.6 million common limited partnership units in the OP in the DCT T ransaction. See Note 3 for more detail on these
transactions.
 
We issued Class A Units in the OP through an acquisition of a portfolio of properties in 2015. The Class A Units generally have the
same rights as the existing common limited partnership units of the OP , except that the Class A Units are entitled to a quarterly
distribution equal to $ 0.64665  per unit so long as the common limited partnership units receive a quarterly distribution of at least $ 0.40
per unit (in the event the common limited partnership units receive a quarterly distribution of less than $0.40 per unit, the Class A Unit
distribution would be reduced by a proportionate amount). Class A Units are convertible into common limited partnership units at an
initial conversion rate of one-for-one. The conversion rate will be increased or decreased to the extent that, at the time of conversion,
the net present value of the distributions paid with respect to the Class A Units are less or more than the distributions paid on common
limited partnership units from the time of issuance of the Class A Units until the time of conversion. At December 31, 2020 and 2019,
the Class A Units were convertible into 8.0 million and 8.1 million common limited partnership units, respectively . The OP may redeem
the Class A Units at any time after October 7, 2025, for an amount in cash equal to the then-current number of the common limited
partnership units into which the Class A Units are convertible, multiplied by $ 43.11 , subject to the holders’ right to convert the Class A
Units into common limited partnership units. Dividends paid to the Class A Units were $ 2.58660  annually during the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
 
NOTE 11. NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS
 
Prologis, L.P.
 
We report noncontrolling interests related to several entities we consolidate but of which we do not own 100% of the equity . These
entities include two real estate partnerships that have issued limited partnership units to third parties. Depending on the specific
partnership agreements, these limited partnership units are redeemable for cash or , at our option, into shares of the Parent’ s common
stock, generally at a rate of one share of common stock to one limited partnership unit . We also consolidate certain entities in which
we do not own 100% of the equity but the equity of these entities is not exchangeable into our common stock.
82
 
 
As discussed in Note 1, the Parent has complete responsibility , power and discretion in the day-to-day management of the OP . The
Parent, through its majority interest, has the right to receive benefits from and incur losses of the OP . In addition, the OP does not
have either substantive liquidation rights or substantive kick-out rights without cause or substantive participating rights that could be
exercised by a simple majority of noncontrolling interests. The absence of such rights renders the OP as a VIE. Accordingly , the
Parent is the primary beneficiary and therefore consolidates the OP .
 
Prologis, Inc.
 
The noncontrolling interests of the Parent include the noncontrolling interests described above for the OP , as well as the limited
partnership units in the OP that are not owned by the Parent. The outstanding limited partnership units receive quarterly cash
distributions equal to the quarterly dividends paid on our common stock pursuant to the terms of the applicable partnership
agreements.
 
The following table summarizes our ownership percentages and noncontrolling interests and the consolidated entities’ total assets and
total liabilities at December 31 (dollars in thousands):
 
 Our Ownership
Percentage   Noncontrolling Interests   Total Assets   Total Liabilities  
 2020   2019   2020   2019   2020   2019   2020   2019  
Prologis U.S. Logistics
Venture  (1)  55.0%  55.0% $3,385,110   $2,677,846   $7,663,800   $6,077,016   $145,131   $99,397  
Other consolidated entities
(2) various   various    98,416    97,548    1,066,129    849,620    73,987    85,186  
Prologis, L.P .          3,483,526    2,775,394    8,729,929    6,926,636    219,118    184,583  
Limited partners in Prologis,
L.P. (3)(4)          869,507    643,263    -   -   -   - 
Prologis, Inc.         $4,353,033   $3,418,657   $8,729,929   $6,926,636   $219,118   $184,583
 
 
(1) As discussed in Note 4, in 2020, USL V acquired a portfolio of 127 operating properties, aggregating 19.0 million square feet, in
the IPT T ransaction for $ 2.0 billion, including transaction costs and the assumption and repayment of debt . Our partner
contributed their share of the purchase price to fund the acquisition.
 
(2) Includes our two partnerships that have issued limited partnership units to third parties, as discussed above, along with various
other consolidated entities. The limited partnership units outstanding at December 31, 2020 and 2019 were exchangeable into
cash or , at our option, 0.3 million shares of the Parent’ s common stock.
 
(3) We had 8.6 million Class A Units that were convertible into 8.0 million and 8.1 million limited partnership units of the OP at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively . See Note 10 for further discussion of our Class A Units.
 
(4) At December 31, 2020 and 2019, excluding the Class A Units, there were limited partnership units in the OP that were
exchangeable into cash or , at our option, 8.2 million and 6.2 million shares of the Parent’ s common stock, respectively . We
issued 2.3 million limited partnership units in the Liberty T ransaction and 0.5 million limited partnership units as partial
consideration for the acquisition of other properties in 2020. Also included are the vested OP Long-T erm Incentive Plan Units
associated with our long-term compensation plans. See further discussion of Long-T erm Incentive Plan Units in Note 12. 
 
NOTE 12. LONG-TERM COMPENSATION
 
2020 Long-Term Incentive Plan
 
In 2020, our stockholders approved the 2020 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (“2020 L TIP”), which replaced the 2012 Long-T erm Incentive
Plan (“2012 L TIP”). After approval of the 2020 L TIP, no further awards could be made under the 2012 L TIP and outstanding awards
previously granted under the 2012 L TIP will remain outstanding in accordance with the awards’ terms.
 
The 2020 L TIP provides for grants of awards to of ficers, directors, employees and consultants of the Parent or its subsidiaries. A wards
can be in the form of: full value awards, stock appreciation rights and stock options (non-qualified options and incentive stock options).
Full value awards generally consist of: (i) common stock; (ii) restricted stock units (“RSUs”); (iii) OP L TIP units (“L TIP Units”) and (iv)
Prologis Outperformance Plan (“POP”) OP L TIP units (“POP L TIP Units”).  The equity-based compensation plans and programs under
which awards can be made were not changed under the 2020 L TIP. Awards may be made under the 2020 L TIP until it is terminated by
the Board or until the ten-year anniversary of the ef fective date of the plan.
 
The awards have been issued under the following components of our equity-based compensation plans and programs at December
31, 2020: (i) POP; (ii) Prologis Promote Plan (“PPP”); (iii) annual long-term incentive (“L TI”) equity award program (“Annual L TI
Award”); and (iv) annual bonus exchange program. Under all of these components, certain employees may elect to receive their
equity award payout either in the form of RSUs or other equity of the Parent or L TIP Units of the OP .
 
At December 31, 2020, we had 34.2 million shares reserved or available for issuance, including 4.1 million shares of common stock to
be issued upon vesting of awards previously granted and 23.5 million shares of common stock remaining available for future issuance
under equity compensation plans. Each L TIP Unit and POP L TIP Unit counts as one share of common stock for purposes of
calculating the limit on shares that may be issued.
83
 
 
Equity-Based Compensation Plans and Programs
 
Prologis Outperformance Plan (“POP”)
 
We allocate participation points or a percentage of the compensation pool to participants under our POP corresponding to three-year
performance periods beginning every January 1. The fair value of the awards is measured at the grant date and amortized over the
period from the grant date to the date at which the awards vest, which ranges from three  to ten years . The performance hurdle
(“Outperformance Hurdle”) at the end of the initial three-year performance period requires our three-year compound annualized total
stockholder return (“TSR”) to exceed a threshold set at the three-year compound annualized TSR for the Morgan Stanley Capital
International (“MSCI”) US REIT Index for the same period plus 100 basis points. If the Outperformance Hurdle is met, a compensation
pool will be formed equal to 3% of the excess value created, subject to a maximum as defined by each performance period. POP
awards cannot be paid at a time when our absolute TSR is negative. If after seven years  our absolute TSR has not been positive, the
awards will be forfeited.
 
For the 2016 – 2018 and 2017 – 2019 performance periods, awards (“Initial A wards”), equaling in aggregate up to $ 75 million of the
applicable compensation pool, were earned after the end of the initial three-year performance period as the Outperformance Hurdle
was met. Participants are not able to sell or transfer equity awards received until three years after the end of the initial period. One-
third of the remaining compensation pool in excess of the $ 75 million aggregate initial award amounts can be earned at the end of
each of the three years  following the end of the initial three-year performance period if our performance meets or exceeds the MSCI
US REIT Index at the end of each of such three years.
 
Beginning with the 2018 – 2020 performance period and performance periods thereafter , the plan requires an absolute maximum cap
of $100 million on the compensation pool. If an award is earned at the end of the initial three-year  performance period, then 20% of
the POP award is paid at the end of the initial performance period and the remaining 80% is subject to additional seven-year cliff
vesting. The 20% that is paid at the end of the initial three-year performance period is subject to an additional three-year  holding
requirement. In 2018, our Named Executive Of ficers (“NEOs”) adopted the vesting construct of the 2018 – 2020 performance period
retroactively for the 2016 – 2018 and 2017 – 2019 performance periods. The change in vesting did not result in a remeasurement
event under the accounting rules.
 
Each participant is eligible to receive a percentage of the total compensation pool based on the number of participation points
allocated to the participant, or in the case of our NEOs, a set percentage of the compensation pool. If the performance criteria are
met, the participants’ points or compensation pool percentage will be paid in the form of common stock, restricted stock units or POP
LTIP Units, as elected by the participant. Annually , a participant may exchange their participation points or compensation pool
percentage for POP L TIP Units. If the performance criteria are not met, the participants’ points, compensation pool percentage and
POP L TIP Units will be forfeited.
 
At December 31, 2020, all awards were equity classified. The initial valuation was calculated using a Monte Carlo valuation model.
 
The following table details the assumptions used for each grant based on the year it was granted (dollars in thousands):
 
  2020   2019   2018  
Risk free interest rate   1.7%  2.6%  2.1%
Expected volatility   16.0%  20.0%  16.5%
Aggregate fair value  $28,800   $21,200   $23,300
 
 
Total remaining compensation cost related to the POP at December 31, 2020, was $ 50.9 million, prior to adjustments for capitalized
amounts due to our development activities. The remaining compensation cost will be recognized through 2029, with a weighted
average period of 3.2 years.
 
The performance criteria were met for the 2018 – 2020, 2017 – 2019 and 2016 – 2018 performance periods at the end of the initial
three-year  performance period, which resulted in awards being earned in January 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively , in the form of
the awards listed below . See below for details on these performance periods (dollars, shares and units in thousands, except average
price):
 
  2018 – 2020   2017 – 2019 (1)  2016 – 2018 (1) 
Performance pool  $ 100,000   $ 97,377   $ 101,633  
Common stock shares   61   336   462 
Restricted stock units   242  -  - 
POP L TIP Units and L TIP Units   701   706   1,022  
Average price used to determine number of awards  $ 99.67   $ 93.42   $ 68.50
 
 
84
 
 
(1) These performance period amounts include awards earned subsequent to the initial performance period that relate to the
compensation pool in excess of the Initial A ward.
 
Other Equity-Based Compensation Plans and Programs
 
Awards may be issued in the form of RSUs or L TIP Units at the participants’ elections under the following equity-based compensation
plans and programs. RSUs and L TIP Units are valued based on the market price of the Parent’ s common stock on the date the award
is granted and the grant date value is charged to compensation expense over the service period. The service period is generally four
years , except for awards under the annual bonus exchange program. Dividends and distributions are paid with respect to both RSUs
and L TIP Units during the vesting period, and therefore they are considered participating securities. W e do not allocate undistributed
earnings to participating securities as our net earnings per share or unit would not be materially dif ferent. The value of the dividend is
charged to retained earnings for RSUs and the distribution is charged to Net Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests  in the
OP for L TIP Units in the Consolidated Financial Statements of the Parent.
 
Prologis Promote Plan (“PPP”)
 
Under the PPP , we establish a compensation pool for certain employees up to 40% of the third-party portion of promotes earned by
Prologis from the co-investment ventures. The awards may be settled in some combination of cash and full value awards, at our
election.
 
Annual LTI Equity Award Program (“Annual LTI Award”)
 
The Annual L TI Award provides for grants to certain employees subject to our performance against benchmark indices that relate to
the most recent year ’s performance.
 
Annual Bonus Exchange Program
 
Under our bonus exchange program, generally all our employees may elect to receive all or a portion of their annual cash bonus in
equity . Equity awards granted through the bonus exchange are valued at a premium to the cash bonus exchanged and vest over three
years, excluding the NEOs. As our NEOs do not receive a bonus exchange premium for participating in the bonus exchange program,
the equity they receive upon exchange for their cash bonuses does not have a vesting period.
 
Summary of Award Activity
 
RSUs
 
Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of common stock of the Parent.
 
The following table summarizes the activity for RSUs for the year ended December 31, 2020 (units in thousands):
 
  Unvested RSUs   Weighted A verage Grant
Date Fair V alue  
Balance at January 1, 2020   1,165   $ 68.44  
Granted   483   94.78  
Vested and distributed   (553)  65.00  
Forfeited   (109)  77.72  
Balance at December 31, 2020   986  $ 80.32
 
 
The fair value of stock awards granted and vested was $ 45.8 million and $ 36.0 million for 2020, respectively , and $ 46.6 million and
$35.7 million for 2019, respectively , based on the weighted average grant date fair value per unit.
 
Total remaining compensation cost related to RSUs outstanding at December 31, 2020, was $ 44.9 million, prior to adjustments for
capitalized amounts due to our development activities. The remaining compensation cost will be recognized through 2024, with a
weighted average period of 1.3 years.
 
LTIP Units
 
An LTIP Unit represents a partnership interest in the OP . After vesting and the satisfaction of certain conditions, an L TIP Unit may be
exchangeable for a common limited partnership unit in the OP and then redeemable for a share of common stock or cash at our
option.
85
 
 
The following table summarizes the activity for L TIP Units for the year ended December 31, 2020 (units in thousands):
 
  Vested L TIP
Units   Unvested L TIP
Units   Unvested W eighted
Average Grant Date
Fair V alue  
Balance at January 1, 2020   3,714    2,678   $ 60.06  
Granted   -   1,088    96.58  
Forfeited   -   -   - 
Vested L TIP Units   1,059    (1,059 )  65.44  
Vested POP L TIP Units   303   -  N/A 
Unvested POP L TIP Units   -   345   19.03  
Converted   (1,164 )  -  N/A 
Balance at December 31, 2020   3,912    3,052   $ 66.50
 
 
The fair value of unit awards granted and vested, excluding POP awards, was $ 105.1  million and $ 69.3 million for 2020, respectively ,
and $ 82.6 million and $ 41.2 million for 2019, respectively , based on the weighted average grant date fair value per unit.
 
Total remaining compensation cost related to L TIP Units, excluding POP , at December 31, 2020, was $ 128.8  million, prior to
adjustments for capitalized amounts due to our development activities. The remaining compensation cost will be recognized through
2024, with a weighted average period of 1.4 years.
 
Other Plans
 
In 2020, the Prologis 401(k) Plan (the “401(k) Plan”) was amended to provide for a new matching employer contribution of $ 0.50 for
every dollar contributed by an employee, up to 12% of the employee’ s annual compensation (within the statutory compensation limit).
The matching employer contribution was previously up to 6% of the employee’ s annual compensation. In the 401(k) Plan, vesting in
the matching employer contributions is based on the employee’ s years of service, with 100% vesting at the completion of one year  of
service. Our contributions under the matching provisions were $ 5.9 million, $ 3.0 million and $ 2.9 million for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
 
We have a non-qualified savings plan that allows highly compensated employees the opportunity to defer the receipt and income
taxation of a certain portion of their compensation in excess of the amount permitted under the 401(k) Plan. There has been no
employer matching within this plan in the three-year period ended December 31, 2020.
 
NOTE 13. INCOME TAXES
 
Components of Earnings Before Income Taxes
 
The following table summarizes the components of earnings before income taxes for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019   2018  
Domestic  $1,030,609   $981,188   $1,078,678  
International   716,479    795,175    807,612  
Earnings before income taxes  $1,747,088   $1,776,363   $1,886,290
 
 
86
 
 
Summary of Current and Deferred Income Taxes
 
The following table summarizes the components of the provision for income taxes for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019   2018  
Current income tax expense:             
U.S. federal  $48,440   $ 3,232   $ 1,727  
International   65,720    41,855    50,731  
State and local   15,554    17,209    9,424  
Total current income tax expense   129,714    62,296    61,882  
             
Deferred income tax expense (benefit):             
U.S. federal   (2,464 )  (208)  (317)
International   3,208    12,429    1,765  
Total deferred income tax expense   744   12,221    1,448  
Total income tax expense  $130,458   $74,517   $63,330
 
 
Current Income Taxes
 
We recognize current income tax expense for the federal and state income taxes incurred by our TRSs  and taxes incurred in certain
states and foreign jurisdictions. Current income tax expense fluctuates from period to period based primarily on the timing of our
taxable income. T axable income incurred over the last three years was principally due to the following: (i) the contribution of real
estate properties to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures and sales to third parties; (ii) recurring and transactional fees earned;
and (iii) taxable earnings from unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recognized current tax expense of $ 5.4 million related to the settlement of an
uncertain tax position. For the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, we did not recognize any expense for uncertain tax
positions.
 
During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, cash paid for income taxes, net of refunds, was $ 100.7  million, $ 62.1
million and $ 60.3 million, respectively .
 
Deferred Income Taxes
 
The deferred income tax expense recognized in 2020, 2019 and 2018 was primarily due to changes in temporary dif ferences and
utilization of NOLs.
 
The following table summarizes the deferred income tax assets and liabilities at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019  
Gross deferred income tax assets:         
NOL carryforwards  $297,900   $287,516  
Basis dif ference – real estate properties   59,259    42,472  
Basis dif ference – equity investments   -   445 
Section 163(j) interest limitation   1,486    480 
Capital loss carryforward   16,845    1 
Other – temporary dif ferences   4,122    2,754  
Total gross deferred income tax assets   379,612    333,668  
Valuation allowance   (326,706 )  (299,092 )
Gross deferred income tax assets, net of valuation allowance   52,906    34,576  
Gross deferred income tax liabilities:         
Basis dif ference – real estate properties   79,230    78,113  
Basis dif ference – equity investments   31,995    12,622  
Other – temporary dif ferences   999   1,898  
Total gross deferred income tax liabilities   112,224    92,633  
Net deferred income tax liabilities  $ 59,318   $ 58,057
 
 
87
 
 
At December 31, 2020, we had NOL carryforwards as follows (in thousands):
 
 U.S.   Europe   Mexico   Japan   Other  
Gross NOL carryforward $ 94,574   $ 698,936   $ 217,532   $ 113,743   $ 36,023  
Tax-ef fected NOL carryforward  24,213    177,386    67,843    19,688    8,770  
Valuation allowance  (18,919 )  (168,630 )  (67,843 )  (18,037 )  (8,532 )
Net deferred tax asset – NOL carryforward $ 5,294   $ 8,756   $ -  $ 1,651   $ 238 
Expiration periods 2021 – indefinite   2021 – indefinite   2021 – 2031   2021 – 2030   2021 – indefinite
 
 
The deferred tax asset valuation allowance at December 31, 2020, was adequate to reduce the total deferred tax asset to an amount
that we estimate will more likely than not be realized.
 
Liability for Uncertain Tax Positions
 
During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, we believe that we had complied with the REIT requirements of the IRC.
The statute of limitations for our tax returns is generally three years. As such, our tax returns that remain subject to examination would
be primarily from 2017 and thereafter .
 
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recognized a $ 21.3 million liability for uncertain tax positions related to acquisition
activities. In 2020, we settled the $ 3.0 million liability for the uncertain tax position at December 31, 2019.
 
 
88
 
NOTE 14. EARNINGS PER COMMON SHARE OR UNIT
 
We determine basic earnings per share or unit based on the weighted average number of shares of common stock or units
outstanding during the period. W e compute diluted earnings per share or unit based on the weighted average number of shares or
units outstanding combined with the incremental weighted average ef fect from all outstanding potentially dilutive instruments.
 
The computation of our basic and diluted earnings per share and unit for the years ended December 31 was as follows (in thousands,
except per share and unit amounts):
 
Prologis, Inc.  2020   2019   2018  
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders – Basic  $1,473,122   $1,566,950   $1,643,426  
Net earnings attributable to exchangeable limited partnership units (1)   41,938    46,986    49,743  
Adjusted net earnings attributable to common stockholders – Diluted  $1,515,060   $1,613,936   $1,693,169  
             
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Basic   728,323    630,580    567,367  
Incremental weighted average ef fect on exchange of limited partnership units (1)   20,877    19,154    17,768  
Incremental weighted average ef fect of equity awards   5,214    5,169    5,104  
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Diluted (2)   754,414    654,903    590,239  
             
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders:             
Basic  $ 2.02  $ 2.48  $ 2.90 
Diluted  $ 2.01  $ 2.46  $ 2.87
 
 
Prologis, L.P .  2020   2019   2018  
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $1,514,743   $1,613,615   $1,692,313  
Net earnings attributable to Class A Units   (16,262 )  (20,454 )  (24,465 )
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders – Basic   1,498,481    1,593,161    1,667,848  
Net earnings attributable to Class A Units   16,262    20,454    24,465  
Net earnings attributable to exchangeable other limited partnership units   317   321   856 
Adjusted net earnings attributable to common unitholders – Diluted  $1,515,060   $1,613,936   $1,693,169  
             
Weighted average common partnership units outstanding – Basic   740,860    641,128    575,798  
Incremental weighted average ef fect on exchange of Class A Units   8,041    8,231    8,446  
Incremental weighted average ef fect on exchange of other limited partnership units   299   375   891 
Incremental weighted average ef fect of equity awards of Prologis, Inc.   5,214    5,169    5,104  
Weighted average common units outstanding – Diluted  (2)   754,414    654,903    590,239  
             
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders:             
Basic  $ 2.02  $ 2.48  $ 2.90 
Diluted  $ 2.01  $ 2.46  $ 2.87
 
 
(1) The exchangeable limited partnership units include the units as discussed in Note 11. Earnings allocated to the exchangeable
OP units not held by the Parent have been included in the numerator and exchangeable common units have been included in
the denominator for the purpose of computing diluted earnings per share for all periods as the per share and unit amount is the
same .
 
(2) Our total weighted average potentially dilutive shares and units outstanding for the years ended December 31 consisted of the
following:
 
  2020   2019   2018  
 Class A Units  8,041    8,231    8,446  
 Other limited partnership units  299   375   891 
 Equity awards  7,798    7,933    8,175  
 Prologis, L.P .  16,138    16,539    17,512  
 Common limited partnership units  12,537    10,548    8,431  
 Prologis, Inc.  28,675    27,087    25,943
 
 
89
 
 
NOTE 15. FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS AND FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
 
Derivative Financial Instruments
 
In the normal course of business, our operations are exposed to market risks, including the ef fect of changes in foreign currency
exchange rates and interest rates. W e may enter into derivative financial instruments to of fset these underlying market risks. See Note
2 for our derivative financial instruments policy .
 
The following table presents the fair value of our derivative financial instruments recognized within Other Assets and Other Liabilities
on the Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31 (in thousands):
  2020   2019  
  Asset   Liability   Asset   Liability  
Undesignated derivatives                 
Foreign currency contracts                 
     Forwards                 
          Brazilian real  $ 620  $ 66  $ 181  $ 49 
          British pound sterling   174   7,589    731   3,823  
          Canadian dollar   80   5,827    523   1,855  
          Chinese renminbi   -   717   -   81 
          Euro   73   6,247    7,135    2,034  
          Japanese yen   720   1,604    3,889    97 
          Swedish krona   -   2,355    -   797 
                 
Designated derivatives                 
Foreign currency contracts                 
     Net investment hedges                 
          British pound sterling   -   2,081    807   13,189  
          Canadian dollar   -   9,847    -   1,926  
                 
Interest rate swaps                 
     Cash flow hedges                 
          Euro   -   9   -   - 
          U.S. dollar   -   140   -   - 
Total fair value of derivatives  $ 1,667   $ 36,482   $ 13,266   $ 23,851
 
 
Undesignated Derivative Financial Instruments
 
Foreign Currency Contracts
 
The following table summarizes the activity of our undesignated foreign currency contracts for the years ended December 31 (in
millions, except for weighted average forward rates and number of active contracts):
 
 2020   2019   2018  
 CAD EUR GBP JPY SEK Other Total  CAD EUR GBP JPY SEK Other Total  CAD EUR GBP JPY Other Total 
Notional
amounts
at
    
January 1
($)  120  581  178  182  31  15  1,107   55  314  118  177  -  5  669   56  233  132  153  -  574 
New
contracts
($)  88  1,314  364  154  37  48  2,005   201  619  1,111  85  31  524  2,571   28  252  55  102  423  860 
Matured,
expired or
     settled
contracts
($)  (45) (1,421) (335) (84) (30) (35) (1,950)  (136) (352) (1,051) (80) -  (514) (2,133)  (29) (171) (69) (78) (418) (765)
Notional
amounts
at
    
December
31 ($)  163  474  207  252  38  28  1,162   120  581  178  182  31  15  1,107   55  314  118  177  5  669 
                                                               
Weighted
average
    
forward
rate
     at
December
31  1.32  1.23  1.32  102.66  8.64         1.32  1.13  1.32  103.39  9.42         1.28  1.21  1.32  105.17       
Active
contracts
at
    
December
31  58  64  53  59  42         40  53  50  44  20         24  35  24  34      
 
 
The following table summarizes the undesignated derivative financial instruments exercised and associated realized and unrealized
gains (losses) in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net in the Consolidated Statements of Income for the years ended
December 31 (in millions, except for number of exercised contracts):
             
  2020   2019   2018  
Exercised contracts   173   115   89 
Realized gains (losses) on the matured, expired or settled contracts  $ (6) $ 28  $ (3)
Unrealized gains (losses) on the change in fair value of outstanding contracts  $ (13) $ (10) $ 29
 
 
90
 
 
Designated Derivative Financial Instruments
 
Foreign Currency Contracts
 
The following table summarizes the activity of our foreign currency contracts designated as net investment hedges for the years
ended December 31 (in millions, except for weighted average forward rates and number of active contracts):
 
 2020   2019   2018  
 CAD GBP Total  BRL CAD EUR GBP Total  BRL CAD EUR GBP Total 
Notional amounts at January 1 ($)  97  387  484   460  100  -  127  687   -  99  -  -  99 
New contracts ($)  377  459  836   489  97  420  649  1,655   1,568  100  1,053  127  2,848 
Matured, expired or settled contracts ($)  (97) (711) (808)  (949) (100) (420) (389) (1,858)  (1,108) (99) (1,053) -  (2,260)
Notional amounts at December 31 ($)  377  135  512   -  97  -  387  484   460  100  -  127  687 
                                          
Weighted average forward rate
     at December 31  1.31  1.35      -  1.32  -  1.29      3.91  1.28  -  1.28    
Active contracts at December 31  6  1      -  2  -  5      1  2  -  2   
 
 
Interest Rate Swaps
 
The following table summarizes the activity of our interest rate swaps designated as cash flow hedges for the years ended December
31 (in millions):
 2020   2019   2018  
 EUR USD Total  EUR Total  CAD EUR USD Total 
Notional amounts at January 1 ($)  -  -  -   500  500   271  -  -  271 
New contracts ($) (1)(2)(3)(4)(5)  165  1,500  1,665   -  -   -  500  300  800 
Matured, expired or settled contracts ($) (2)(4)(5)(6) -  (1,250) (1,250)  (500) (500)  (271) -  (300) (571)
Notional amounts at December 31 ($)  165  250  415   -  -   -  500  -  500
 
 
(1) During 2020, we entered into one interest rate swap contract with an aggregate notional amount of € 150.0  million ($ 165.0
million) to ef fectively fix the interest rate on our euro senior notes bearing a floating rate of Euribor plus 0.3% issued in February
2020.   
 
(2) During 2020, we entered into four treasury lock contracts with an aggregate notional amount of $ 750.0  million to ef fectively fix
the interest rate on the forecasted issuance of U.S. dollar senior notes, which were then issued in February 2020. Subsequent
to issuance, we recorded a loss of $ 16.8 million associated with these derivatives that will be amortized out of AOCI/L  to Interest
Expense , in accordance with our policy .
 
(3) During 2020, we entered into two interest rate swap contracts with an aggregate notional amount of $ 250.0  million to ef fectively
fix the interest rate on the outstanding balance of our 2017 T erm Loan bearing a floating rate of 1-month USD LIBOR plus 0.9%.
 
(4) During 2020, we entered into two treasury lock contracts with an aggregate notional amount of $ 500.0  million to ef fectively fix
the interest rate on the forecasted issuance of U.S. dollar senior notes, which were then issued in August 2020. The loss
associated with the settlement of the derivatives upon issuance of the senior notes was not significant.
 
(5) During 2018, we entered into two interest rate swap contracts with an aggregated notional amount of € 400.0  million ($ 499.7
million) to ef fectively fix the interest rate on our senior notes bearing a floating rate of Euribor plus 0.3% issued in January 2018.
In 2019, the interest rate swap contracts matured and in January 2020 we redeemed the senior notes.
 
(6) During 2018, we repaid CAD 201.4  million ($ 158.9  million) on our 2015 Canadian T erm Loan. At that time, we settled the
interest rate swaps related to the 2015 Canadian T erm Loan as we determined it was no longer probable that we would continue
to have the future cash flows as originally hedged. As a result, the $ 12.5 million gain in AOCI/L  at the time of settlement was
reclassified to Interest Expense  during 2018 .
 
Designated Nonderivative Financial Instruments
 
The following table summarizes our debt and accrued interest, designated as a hedge of our net investment in international
subsidiaries at December 31 (in millions):
 
   2020    2019    2018  
British pound sterling  $ 842  $ 329  $ 269 
Euro  $ -  $ 850  $ 2,645
 
 
91
 
 
The following table summarizes the unrealized gains (losses) in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net on the
remeasurement of the unhedged portion of our debt and accrued interest for the years ended December 31 (in millions):
             
  2020   2019   2018  
Unrealized gains (losses) on the unhedged portion  $ (139) $ (64) $ 96
 
 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
 
The change in Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)  in the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income during the periods
presented was due to the translation into U.S. dollars from the consolidation of the financial statements of our consolidated
subsidiaries whose functional currency is not the U.S. dollar . The change in fair value of the ef fective portion of our derivative financial
instruments that have been designated as net investment hedges and cash flow hedges and the translation of the hedged portion of
our debt, as discussed above, are also included in Other Comprehensive Income (Loss).
 
The following table presents these changes in Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)  for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019   2018  
Derivative net investment hedges  $ (4,301 ) $ (22,600 ) $ 26,457  
Debt designated as nonderivative net investment hedges   (62,263 )  141,675    151,083  
Cumulative translation adjustment   (128,109 )  (20,593 )  (368,130 )
Total foreign currency translation gains (losses), net  $ (194,673 ) $ 98,482   $ (190,590 )
             
Cash flow hedges  (1)(2)  $ (11,269 ) $ 4,665   $ (5,815 )
Our share of derivatives from unconsolidated co-investment ventures   (2,848 )  (6,000 )  4,492  
Total unrealized losses on derivative contracts, net  $ (14,117 ) $ (1,335 ) $ (1,323 )
Total change in other comprehensive income (loss)  $ (208,790 ) $ 97,147   $ (191,913 )
 
(1) We estimate an additional expense of $ 4.8 million will be reclassified to Interest Expense over the next 12 months from
December 31, 2020, due to the amortization of previously settled derivatives designated as cash flow hedges.
 
(2) Included in the year ended December 31, 2020 was $ 16.8 million in losses associated with the termination of the four treasury
lock contracts.
 
Fair Value Measurements
 
We have estimated the fair value of our financial instruments using available market information and valuation methodologies we
believe to be appropriate for these purposes. Considerable judgment and a high degree of subjectivity are involved in developing
these estimates and, accordingly , they are not necessarily indicative of amounts that we would realize on disposition. See Note 2 for
more information on our fair value measurements policy .
 
Fair Value Measurements on a Recurring Basis
 
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, other than the derivatives discussed previously , we had no significant financial assets or financial
liabilities that were measured at fair value on a recurring basis in the Consolidated Financial Statements. All of our derivatives held at
December 31, 2020 and 2019 were classified as Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy .
 
Fair Value Measurements on Nonrecurring Basis
 
Acquired properties and assets we expect to sell or contribute are significant nonfinancial assets that met the criteria to be measured
at fair value on a nonrecurring basis, as detailed in our accounting policy in Note 2. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, we estimated
the fair value of our properties using Level 2 or Level 3 inputs from the fair value hierarchy . See more information on our acquired
properties in Notes 3 and 4 and assets held for sale or contribution in Note 6.
 
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
 
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the carrying amounts of certain financial instruments, including cash and cash equivalents, accounts
and notes receivable, accounts payable and accrued expenses were representative of their fair values.
 
The dif ferences in the fair value of our debt from the carrying value in the table below were the result of dif ferences in interest rates or
borrowing spreads that were available to us at December 31, 2020 and 2019, as compared with those in ef fect when the debt was
issued or assumed, including reduced borrowing spreads due to our credit ratings. The fair value of the senior notes increased in
2020 due to the decrease in bond yields in the market as compared to the higher weighted average interest rates on our senior notes.
The senior notes and many of the issuances of secured mortgage debt contain prepayment penalties or yield maintenance provisions
that could make the cost of refinancing the debt at lower rates exceed the benefit that would be derived from doing so. W e evaluate
this on an on-going basis and have taken the opportunity to refinance some of our debt at lower rates and longer maturities as
discussed in Note 8.
92
 
 
The following table reflects the carrying amounts and estimated fair values of our debt at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2020   2019  
  Carrying V alue   Fair V alue   Carrying V alue   Fair V alue  
Credit Facilities  $ 171,794   $ 171,794   $ 184,255   $ 184,255  
Senior notes   14,275,870    15,452,381    9,660,570    10,228,715  
Term loans and unsecured other   1,764,311    1,785,706    1,441,882    1,463,841  
Secured mortgage   637,101    673,549    619,170    651,047  
Total  $ 16,849,076   $ 18,083,430   $ 11,905,877   $ 12,527,858
 
 
 
NOTE 16. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
 
Environmental Matters
 
A majority of the properties we acquire, including land, are subjected to environmental reviews either by us or the previous owners. In
addition, we may incur environmental remediation costs associated with certain land parcels we acquire in connection with the
development of the land. W e have acquired certain properties that may have been leased to or previously owned by companies that
discharged hazardous materials. W e establish a liability at the time of acquisition to cover such costs and adjust the liabilities as
appropriate when additional information becomes available. W e record our environmental liabilities in Other Liabilities . We purchase
various environmental insurance policies to mitigate our exposure to environmental liabilities. W e are not aware of any environmental
liabilities that would have a material adverse ef fect on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
 
Indemnification Agreements
 
We have entered into agreements whereby we indemnify certain co-investment ventures, or our venture partners, outside of the U.S.
for taxes that may be assessed with respect to certain properties we contributed to these ventures. Our contributions to these
ventures are generally structured as contributions of shares of companies that own the real estate assets. Accordingly , the capital
gains associated with the step up in the value of the underlying real estate assets, for tax purposes, are deferred and transferred at
contribution. W e have generally indemnified these ventures to the extent that the ventures incur capital gains or withholding tax as a
result of a direct sale. The agreements limit the amount that is subject to our indemnification with respect to each property to 100% of
the actual tax liabilities related to the capital gains that are deferred and transferred by us to the ventures at the time of the initial
contribution less any deferred tax assets transferred with the property .
 
The outcome under these agreements is uncertain as it depends on the method and timing of dissolution of the related venture or
disposition of any properties by the venture. W e record liabilities related to the indemnification agreements in Other Liabilities . We
continue to monitor these agreements and the likelihood of the sale of assets that would result in recognition and will adjust the
potential liability in the future as facts and circumstances dictate.
 
Off-Balance Sheet Liabilities
 
We have issued performance and surety bonds and standby letters of credit in connection with certain development projects.
Performance and surety bonds are commonly required by public agencies from real estate developers. Performance and surety bonds
are renewable and expire on the completion of the improvements and infrastructure. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had $ 275.2
million and $ 240.6  million, respectively , outstanding under such arrangements.
 
We may be required under capital commitments or we may choose to make additional capital contributions to certain of our
unconsolidated entities, representing our proportionate ownership interest, should additional capital contributions be necessary to fund
development or acquisition costs, repayment of debt or operational shortfalls. See Note 5 for further discussion related to equity
commitments to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
Litigation
 
From time to time, we are party to a variety of legal proceedings arising in the ordinary course of business. W e believe that, with
respect to any such matters that we are currently a party to, the ultimate disposition of any such matter will not have material adverse
effect on our business, financial position or results of operations.
 
93
 
 
NOTE 17. BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
Our current business strategy includes two operating segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital. W e generate
revenues, earnings, net operating income and cash flows through our segments, as follows:
 
• Real Estate Operations.  This operating segment represents the ownership and development of operating properties and is the
largest component of our revenue and earnings. W e collect rent from our customers through operating leases, including
reimbursements for the majority of our property operating costs. Each operating property is considered to be an individual
operating segment with similar economic characteristics; these properties are combined within the reportable business segment
based on geographic location. Our Real Estate Operations segment also includes development activities that lead to rental
operations, including land held for development and properties currently under development. Within this line of business, we
utilize the following: (i) our land bank; (ii) the development expertise of our local teams; and (iii) our customer relationships. Land
we own and lease to customers under land leases, along with land and buildings we lease, is also included in this segment.
 
• Strategic Capital.  This operating segment represents the management of unconsolidated co-investment ventures. W e generate
strategic capital revenues primarily from our unconsolidated co-investment ventures through asset management and property
management services and we earn additional revenues by providing leasing, acquisition, construction, development, financing
and disposition services. Depending on the structure of the venture and the returns provided to our partners, we also earn
revenues through promotes periodically during the life of a venture or upon liquidation. Each unconsolidated co-investment
venture we manage is considered to be an individual operating segment with similar economic characteristics; these ventures
are combined within the reportable business segment based on geographic location.
 
Reconciliations are presented below for: (i) each reportable business segment’ s revenues from external customers to Total Revenues ;
(ii) each reportable business segment’ s net operating income from external customers to Operating Income and Earnings Before
Income T axes ; and (iii) each reportable business segment’ s assets to Total Assets . Our chief operating decision makers rely primarily
on net operating income and similar measures to make decisions about allocating resources and assessing segment performance.
The applicable components of Total Revenues, Operating Income, Earnings Before Income T axes  and Total Assets  are allocated to
each reportable business segment’ s revenues, net operating income and assets. Items that are not directly assignable to a segment,
such as certain corporate income and expenses, are not allocated but reflected as reconciling items.
 
94
 
 
The following reconciliations are presented in thousands:
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
   2020    2019    2018  
Revenues:             
Real estate operations segment:             
U.S.  $3,600,335   $2,645,194   $2,173,279  
Other Americas   87,830    94,984    119,954  
Europe   68,801    44,356    54,405  
Asia   44,782    54,201    50,511  
Total real estate operations segment   3,801,748    2,838,735    2,398,149  
Strategic capital segment:             
U.S.   354,825    86,271    74,618  
Other Americas   37,696    40,347    32,434  
Europe   145,016    283,909    174,898  
Asia   99,450    81,359    124,350  
Total strategic capital segment   636,987    491,886    406,300  
             
Total revenues   4,438,735    3,330,621    2,804,449  
             
Segment net operating income:             
Real estate operations segment:             
U.S. (1)   2,679,685    1,953,727    1,621,665  
Other Americas   64,473    69,393    89,044  
Europe   43,531    27,525    34,807  
Asia   31,986    40,675    38,425  
Total real estate operations segment   2,819,675    2,091,320    1,783,941  
Strategic capital segment:             
U.S. (1)   237,271    (10,945 )  4,712  
Other Americas   24,923    27,369    19,874  
Europe   99,504    246,213    136,240  
Asia   57,248    44,588    88,434  
Total strategic capital segment   418,946    307,225    249,260  
             
Total segment net operating income   3,238,621    2,398,545    2,033,201  
             
Reconciling items:             
General and administrative expenses   (274,845 )  (266,718 )  (238,985 )
Depreciation and amortization expenses   (1,561,969 )  (1,139,879 )  (947,214 )
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   464,942    467,577    469,817  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net   252,195    390,241    371,179  
Operating income   2,118,944    1,849,766    1,687,998  
             
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   297,370    200,178    298,260  
Interest expense   (314,507 )  (239,953 )  (229,141 )
Interest and other income, net   1,044    24,213    14,663  
Foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   (167,473 )  (41,715 )  117,096  
Losses on early extinguishment of debt, net   (188,290 )  (16,126 )  (2,586 )
Earnings before income taxes  $1,747,088   $1,776,363   $1,886,290
 
 
95
 
 
  December 31,  
   2020    2019  
Segment assets:         
Real estate operations segment:         
U.S.  $42,559,023   $27,999,868  
Other Americas   1,145,699    1,332,237  
Europe   1,604,393    1,379,579  
Asia   1,081,876    879,072  
Total real estate operations segment   46,390,991    31,590,756  
Strategic capital segment (2):         
U.S.   13,257    14,529  
Europe   25,280    25,280  
Asia   354   359 
Total strategic capital segment   38,891    40,168  
Total segment assets   46,429,882    31,630,924  
         
Reconciling items:         
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities   7,602,014    6,237,371  
Assets held for sale or contribution   1,070,724    720,685  
Lease right-of-use assets   125,670    111,439  
Cash and cash equivalents   598,086    1,088,855  
Other assets   238,629    242,576  
Total reconciling items   9,635,123    8,400,926  
Total assets  $56,065,005   $40,031,850
 
 
(1) This includes compensation, personnel costs and PPP awards for employees who were located in the U.S. but also support
other geographies.
 
(2) Represents management contracts and goodwill recorded in connection with business combinations associated with the
Strategic Capital segment. Goodwill was $25.3 million at December 31, 2020 and 2019.
 
NOTE 18. SUPPLEMENTAL CASH FLOW INFORMATION
 
Our significant noncash investing and financing activities for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 included the
following:
 
• We completed the Liberty T ransaction on February 4, 2020 for $ 13.0 billion through the issuance of equity and the assumption
of debt. See Note 3 for more information on this transaction. Additionally , USL V assumed debt as part of the IPT T ransaction.
See Note 8 for more information on the assumption of debt.
 
• As partial consideration for the disposition of a portfolio of properties during 2020, the buyer assumed debt of $ 169.8  million.
 
• We recognized Lease Right-Of-Use (“ROU”) Assets  and Lease Liabilities on the Consolidated Balance Sheets, including new
leases, renewals and modifications in 2020 of $ 47.8 million each, related to leases in which we are the lessee. W e adopted the
new lease standard on January 1, 2019 and recognized Lease ROU Assets  of $523.8  million and Lease Liabilities  of $527.3
million in 2019.
 
• We capitalized $ 22.4 million, $ 21.4 million and $ 26.4 million in 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively , of equity-based
compensation expense. Beginning January 1, 2019, upon adoption of the new lease standard internal costs related to our
leasing activities are expensed as incurred.
 
• We received $ 433.7  million, $ 646.8  million and $ 386.7  million of ownership interests in certain unconsolidated co-investment
ventures as a portion of our proceeds from the contribution of properties to these entities during 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively , as disclosed in Note 5. Included in 2019 was our initial 20.0% investment in PBL V in exchange for our contribution
of the initial portfolio of properties to PBL V upon formation.
 
• We reinvested distributions from unconsolidated co-investment ventures of $ 45.6 million and $ 80.9 million and increased our
ownership in 2020 and 2019, respectively .
 
• We issued 0.7 million and 1.2 million shares in 2020 and 2019, respectively , of the Parent’ s common stock upon redemption of
an equal number of common limited partnership units in the OP .
 
• We issued 0.5 million common limited partnership units for $ 48.5 million as partial consideration for the acquisition of properties
in 2020. See Note 11 for more information.
96
 
 
• We received $ 23.7 million of equity interests in PCCLF for the contribution of real estate properties from Prologis China Logistics
Venture II, LP in 2020.
 
• We and our existing partner in Prologis China Logistics V enture I, LP received equity interests in the newly formed PCCLF for
the contribution of the existing portfolio of assets in 2019.
 
• We purchased our partners’ interest in a consolidated venture through the distribution of an operating property for $ 11.4 million
in 2019.
 
• We formed a consolidated venture into which our partner contributed $ 11.8 million of land in 2018.
 
• We completed the DCT T ransaction on August 22, 2018 for $ 8.5 billion through the issuance of equity and the assumption of
debt. See Note 3 for more information on this transaction.
 
97
 
 
NOTE 19. SELECTED QUARTERLY FINANCIAL DATA (UNAUDITED)
 
The following table details our selected quarterly financial data (in thousands, except per share and unit data):
 
  Three Months Ended  
Prologis, Inc.  March 31,   June 30,   September 30,   December 31,  
2020:                 
Rental revenues  $878,807   $944,366   $ 980,148   $ 987,810  
Total revenues  $978,241   $1,266,124   $ 1,082,773   $ 1,111,597  
Rental expenses  $(227,618 ) $(232,109 ) $ (245,490 ) $ (246,846 )
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net  $162,750   $ 86,416   $ 134,207   $ 81,569  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  $ 31,491   $ 43,939   $ 108,927   $ 67,838  
Operating income  $468,057   $611,987   $ 556,520   $ 482,380  
Consolidated net earnings  $521,164   $454,938   $ 332,521   $ 308,007  
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $489,418   $404,539   $ 298,695   $ 280,470  
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Basic (1)  $ 0.70  $ 0.55  $ 0.40  $ 0.38 
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Diluted (1)(2)  $ 0.70  $ 0.54  $ 0.40  $ 0.38 
2019:                 
Rental revenues  $696,807   $700,689   $ 710,465   $ 723,857  
Total revenues  $772,052   $790,372   $ 942,181   $ 826,016  
Rental expenses  $(188,068 ) $(181,138 ) $ (180,864 ) $ (184,196 )
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net  $ 42,441   $196,941   $ 63,935   $ 164,260  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  $145,767   $ 27,254   $ 59,379   $ 157,841  
Operating income  $376,590   $442,056   $ 471,480   $ 559,640  
Consolidated net earnings  $373,765   $410,826   $ 491,013   $ 426,242  
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $347,047   $383,784   $ 450,639   $ 385,480  
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Basic  (1)  $ 0.55  $ 0.61  $ 0.71  $ 0.61 
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Diluted  (1)(2)  $ 0.55  $ 0.60  $ 0.71  $ 0.61 
                 
Prologis, L.P .                 
2020:                 
Rental revenues  $878,807   $944,366   $ 980,148   $ 987,810  
Total revenues  $978,241   $1,266,124   $ 1,082,773   $ 1,111,597  
Rental expenses  $(227,618 ) $(232,109 ) $ (245,490 ) $ (246,846 )
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net  $162,750   $ 86,416   $ 134,207   $ 81,569  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  $ 31,491   $ 43,939   $ 108,927   $ 67,838  
Operating income  $468,057   $611,987   $ 556,520   $ 482,380  
Consolidated net earnings  $521,164   $454,938   $ 332,521   $ 308,007  
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $503,388   $416,189   $ 307,069   $ 288,097  
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders –
     Basic (1)  $ 0.70  $ 0.55  $ 0.40  $ 0.38 
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders –
     Diluted (1)(2)  $ 0.70  $ 0.54  $ 0.40  $ 0.38 
2019:                 
Rental revenues  $696,807   $700,689   $ 710,465   $ 723,857  
Total revenues  $772,052   $790,372   $ 942,181   $ 826,016  
Rental expenses  $(188,068 ) $(181,138 ) $ (180,864 ) $ (184,196 )
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net  $ 42,441   $196,941   $ 63,935   $ 164,260  
Gains on other dispositions of investments in real estate, net  $145,767   $ 27,254   $ 59,379   $ 157,841  
Operating income  $376,590   $442,056   $ 471,480   $ 559,640  
Consolidated net earnings  $373,765   $410,826   $ 491,013   $ 426,242  
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $357,621   $395,470   $ 463,997   $ 396,527  
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders –
     Basic  (1)  $ 0.55  $ 0.61  $ 0.71  $ 0.61 
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders –
     Diluted  (1)(2)  $ 0.55  $ 0.60  $ 0.71  $ 0.61
 
 
(1)Quarterly earnings per common share or unit amounts may not total to the annual amounts due to rounding and the changes in
the number of weighted average common shares or units outstanding included in the calculation of basic and diluted shares or
units.
98
 
 
(2)Income allocated to the exchangeable OP units not held by the Parent has been included in the numerator and exchangeable
OP units have been included in the denominator for the purpose of computing diluted earnings per share for all periods since
the per share and unit is the same.
 
99
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC. AND PROLOGIS, L.P .
SCHEDULE III – REAL EST ATE AND ACCUMULA TED DEPRECIA TION
DECEMBER 31, 2020
(In thousands of U.S. dollars, as applicable)
 
       Initial Cost to
Prologis   Costs
Capitalized  Gross Amounts at Which Carried
at December 31, 2020        
DescriptionNo. of
Bldgs.  Encum-
brances Land   Building &
Improvements  Subsequent
to
Acquisition  Land   Building &
Improvements  Total
(a,b)   Accumulated
Depreciation
(c)   Date of
Construction/
Acquisition
Operating Properties (d)                                    
                                    
U.S. Markets                                    
Atlanta 116  (d)  261,566   1,016,540   317,849   281,825   1,314,130   1,595,955   (252,437) 1994-2020
Austin 10     12,783   52,335   9,009   12,837   61,290   74,127   (25,055) 1994-2015
Baltimore/Washington
D.C. 75  (d)  300,564   722,249   186,875   312,814   896,874   1,209,688   (129,013) 1995-2020
Central PA 33     240,657   955,273   113,300   253,737   1,055,493   1,309,230   (175,222) 2002-2020
Central Valley 33  (d)  160,963   386,853   758,043   178,444   1,127,415   1,305,859   (184,917) 1999-2020
Charlotte 37  (d)  93,695   273,544   81,523   104,768   343,994   448,762   (51,437) 1994-2020
Chicago 193  (d)  718,152   2,073,268   454,347   747,058   2,498,709   3,245,767   (578,271) 1995-2020
Cincinnati 35  (d)  62,241   280,877   123,422   69,743   396,797   466,540   (60,109) 1996-2020
Columbus 26  (d)  31,733   161,881   60,539   34,683   219,470   254,153   (84,430) 1996-2020
Dallas/Fort Worth 164  (d)  353,302   1,472,061   379,898   377,457   1,827,804   2,205,261   (389,041) 1994-2020
Denver 36     103,427   295,412   128,095   101,834   425,100   526,934   (121,543) 1993-2019
Houston 179  (d)  366,568   1,873,268   237,476   409,365   2,067,947   2,477,312   (227,974) 1993-2020
Indianapolis 22     22,798   148,741   59,603   26,164   204,978   231,142   (56,037) 1995-2020
Jacksonville 1     -   2,892   273   -   3,165   3,165   (2,494) 2011
Las Vegas 52     125,176   261,616   217,118   120,839   483,071   603,910   (93,472) 1996-2019
Lehigh Valley 55     852,286   1,902,902   253,954   924,487   2,084,655   3,009,142   (121,431) 2004-2020
Louisville 12     48,237   258,025   46,183   50,633   301,812   352,445   (73,870) 2005-2020
Nashville 21     61,126   236,777   62,631   62,717   297,817   360,534   (51,601) 1995-2019
New Jersey/New York City 128  (d)  1,469,070   1,865,445   565,329   1,478,901   2,420,943   3,899,844   (585,688) 1996-2020
Orlando 74     138,215   513,462   98,991   147,199   603,469   750,668   (97,255) 1994-2020
Phoenix 46     135,243   394,219   254,259   148,027   635,694   783,721   (72,123) 1992-2020
Portland 39  (e)  118,738   276,956   77,107   134,824   337,977   472,801   (43,667) 2006-2020
Reno 16  (d)  23,918   142,279   89,701   25,393   230,505   255,898   (76,740) 1994-2015
San Antonio 20  (d)  25,735   95,828   42,620   25,958   138,225   164,183   (57,852) 1994-2016
San Francisco Bay Area 225  (d)  977,606   1,615,008   445,972   987,471   2,051,115   3,038,586   (686,136) 1993-2020
Seattle 98  (e)  629,092   1,107,409   279,649   648,115   1,368,035   2,016,150   (205,279) 2008-2020
South Florida 110  (d)  511,731   917,668   249,439   525,570   1,153,268   1,678,838   (247,745) 1994-2020
Southern California 350  (d)(e)  3,230,864   4,726,603   1,298,305   3,406,330   5,849,442   9,255,772   (1,380,360) 2005-2020
Subtotal U.S. Markets:  2,206     11,075,486   24,029,391   6,891,510   11,597,193   30,399,194   41,996,387   (6,131,199)  
                                    
Other Americas Markets                                    
Canada 33  (d)  260,142   389,451   269,044   288,184   630,453   918,637   (132,351) 2008-2020
Mexico  1     730   2,287   3,132   1,942   4,207   6,149   (1,767) 2011
Subtotal Other Americas
Markets:  34     260,872   391,738   272,176   290,126   634,660   924,786   (134,118)  
                                    
Europe Markets                                    
France 4     11,560   5,248   44,161   10,071   50,898   60,969   (1,937) 2018-2020
Germany 2     11,401   5,918   854   11,401   6,772   18,173   (4,474) 2011
Spain 6     13,446   39,696   22,948   12,723   63,367   76,090   (17,339) 2011-2018
U.K. 2     60,218   28,711   3,113   60,226   31,816   92,042   (3,557) 2018-2019
Subtotal Europe Markets: 14     96,625   79,573   71,076   94,421   152,853   247,274   (27,307)  
                                    
Asia Markets                                    
Japan 2  (d)  35,667   -   159,733   35,936   159,464   195,400   (15,293) 2016-2019
Singapore 5     -   139,576   4,196   -   143,772   143,772   (62,424) 2011
Subtotal Asia Markets:  7     35,667   139,576   163,929   35,936   303,236   339,172   (77,717)  
Total Operating Properties 2,261     11,468,650   24,640,278   7,398,691   12,017,676   31,489,943   43,507,619   (6,370,341)  
 
100
 
 
PROLOGIS, INC. AND PROLOGIS, L.P .
SCHEDULE III – REAL EST ATE AND ACCUMULA TED DEPRECIA TION
DECEMBER 31, 2020
(In thousands of U.S. dollars, as applicable)
 
       Initial Cost to
Prologis   Costs
Capitalized  Gross Amounts at Which Carried
at December 31, 2020       Date of
DescriptionNo. of
Bldgs.  Encum-
brances Land   Building &
Improvements  Subsequent
to
Acquisition  Land   Building &
Improvements  Total
(a,b)   Accumulated
Depreciation
(c)   Construction/
Acquisition
(f)
Development Portfolio                                    
                                    
U.S. Markets                                    
Atlanta 1     3,407   -   6,699   3,407   6,699   10,106       
Baltimore/Washington 4     40,230   -   4,580   40,230   4,580   44,810       
Central Valley 2     2,459   -   20,969   2,459   20,969   23,428      2020
Chicago 1     7,004   -   21,373   7,004   21,373   28,377      2020
Cincinnati 1     1,272   -   -   1,272   -   1,272       
Dallas/Ft. Worth 5     8,799   -   59,543   8,799   59,543   68,342      2020
Denver 1     2,661   -   16,186   2,661   16,186   18,847      2020
Houston 1     2,212   -   9,430   2,212   9,430   11,642      2020
Indianapolis 1     2,153   -   623   2,153   623   2,776       
Las Vegas 2     38,395   -   7,578   38,395   7,578   45,973       
Lehigh Valley 2     62,916   -   39,375   62,916   39,375   102,291       
Louisville 2     7,910   -   10,831   7,910   10,831   18,741      2020
Nashville 2     5,281   -   492   5,281   492   5,773       
New Jersey/New York City 1     3,350   -   6,377   3,350   6,377   9,727       
Orlando 2     11,693   -   12,668   11,693   12,668   24,361       
Phoenix 5     19,482   10,742   19,434   19,482   30,176   49,658      2020
Portland 2     11,298   -   28,741   11,298   28,741   40,039       
Reno 1     1,471   -   13,201   1,471   13,201   14,672       
San Francisco Bay Area 4     15,841   -   40,765   15,841   40,765   56,606      2020
Seattle 2     27,130   -   13,349   27,130   13,349   40,479      2020
South Florida 1     8,886   2,637   8,100   8,886   10,737   19,623      2020
Southern California 3     21,242   -   13,777   21,242   13,777   35,019       
Subtotal U.S. Markets:  46     305,092   13,379   354,091   305,092   367,470   672,562       
                                    
Other Americas Markets                                    
Canada 2     22,775   -   30,653   22,775   30,653   53,428       
Mexico 2     13,228   -   6,696   13,228   6,696   19,924       
Subtotal Other Americas
Markets:  4     36,003   -   37,349   36,003   37,349   73,352       
                                    
Europe Markets                                    
Czech Republic 2     3,709   -   13,242   3,709   13,242   16,951      2020
France 2     14,754   -   30,611   14,754   30,611   45,365      2020
Germany 3     15,184   -   47,035   15,184   47,035   62,219      2020
Italy 6     38,445   -   43,873   38,445   43,873   82,318      2020
Netherlands 3     15,343   -   39,003   15,343   39,003   54,346      2020
Poland 2     10,481   -   37,720   10,481   37,720   48,201       
Slovakia 2     5,146   -   12,461   5,146   12,461   17,607      2020
U.K. 6     139,243   -   92,829   139,243   92,829   232,072       
Subtotal Europe Markets: 26     242,305   -   316,774   242,305   316,774   559,079       
                                    
Asia Markets                                    
Japan 9  (d)  210,925   -   366,693   210,925   366,693   577,618      2020
Subtotal Asia Markets:  9     210,925   -   366,693   210,925   366,693   577,618       
Total Development Portfolio 85     794,325   13,379   1,074,907   794,325   1,088,286   1,882,611       
                                    
GRAND TOTAL  2,346     12,262,975   24,653,657   8,473,598   12,812,001   32,578,229   45,390,230   (6,370,341)  
 
Schedule III – Footnotes
 
(a) The following table reconciles real estate assets per Schedule III to the Consolidated Balance Sheets in Item 8. Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data at December 31, 2020 (in thousands):
 
 Total operating properties and development portfolio per Schedule III  $ 45,390,230  (g)
 Land   1,606,358   
 Other real estate investments (i)   3,387,740   
 Total per Consolidated Balance Sheets  $ 50,384,328   
 
 (i)Other real estate investments includes non-strategic assets acquired in the Liberty T ransaction that are not held for long-term
investment and the net book value of such assets as of December 31, 2020.
 
(b) The aggregate cost for federal tax purposes at December 31, 2020, of our real estate assets was approximately $ 36 billion
(unaudited).
 
101
 
 
(c) Real estate assets (excluding land balances) are depreciated over their estimated useful lives. These useful lives are generally
5 to 7 years for capital improvements, 10 years for standard tenant improvements, 15 to 25 years for depreciable land
improvements, 25 to 35 years for operating properties acquired based on the age of the building and 40 years for operating
properties we develop.
 
The following table reconciles accumulated depreciation per Schedule III to the Consolidated Balance Sheets in Item 8.
Financial Statements and Supplementary Data at December 31, 2020 (in thousands):
 
 Total accumulated depreciation per Schedule III  $ 6,370,341  (g)
 Accumulated depreciation on other real estate investments   168,815   
 Total per Consolidated Balance Sheets  $ 6,539,156   
 
(d) Properties with an aggregate undepreciated cost of $ 1.6 billion secure $ 639.0  million of mortgage notes. See Note 8 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data for more information related to our
secured mortgage debt.
 
(e) Assessment bonds of $ 10.3 million are secured by assessments (similar to property taxes) on various underlying real estate
properties with an aggregate undepreciated cost of $ 622.5  million. The assessment bonds are included in term loans and
unsecured other debt in Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary
Data.
 
(f) Date of construction is provided for properties in the development portfolio that were completed but not yet stabilized.
 
(g)The following table summarizes our real estate assets and accumulated depreciation per Schedule III for the years ended
December 31 (in thousands):
 
   2020   2019   2018  
 Real estate assets:             
 Balance at beginning of year  $33,157,100   $32,774,956   $24,178,816  
 Acquisitions of and improvements to operating properties, development
     activity and net ef fect of changes in foreign exchange rates and other   13,985,898    2,821,919    10,106,651  
 Basis of operating properties disposed of   (1,045,128 )  (1,471,764 )  (1,461,458 )
 Change in the development portfolio balance, including the acquisition of
     properties   13,345    (273,534 )  549,312  
 Assets transferred to held for sale and contribution   (720,985 )  (694,477 )  (598,365 )
 Balance at end year  $45,390,230   $33,157,100   $32,774,956  
              
 Accumulated depreciation:             
 Balance at beginning of year  $5,294,212   $4,550,958   $3,971,501  
 Depreciation expense   1,112,075    843,872    703,215  
 Balances retired upon disposition of operating properties and net ef fect of
     changes in foreign exchange rates and other   (35,083 )  (77,583 )  (119,029 )
 Assets transferred to held for sale and contribution   (863)  (23,035 )  (4,729 )
 Balance at end of year  $6,370,341   $5,294,212   $4,550,958
 
 
 
 
102
 
Certain of the following documents are filed herewith. Certain other of the following documents that have been previously filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission and, pursuant to Rule 12b-32, are incorporated herein by reference.
 
2.1a
 Amended and Restated Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of August 20, 2019, among Industrial Property T rust
Inc., Prologis, L.P . and Rockies Acquisition LLC. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.2 to Prologis’ Current Report
From 8-K/A filed on August 23, 2019).
 
2.2a
 Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of July 15, 2019, by and among Prologis, L.P ., Rockies Acquisition LLC, and
Industrial Property T rust Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Prologis’ Current Report From 8-K filed on July
15, 2019).
 
2.3a
 Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of October 27, 2019, by and among the Prologis Parties and the Liberty
Parties. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Prologis’ Current Report form 8-K filed on October 27, 2019).
 
3.1
 Articles of Incorporation of Prologis (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’ Registration Statement on
Form S-11 (No. 333-35915) filed September 18, 1997).
 
3.2  Articles Supplementary establishing and fixing the rights and preferences of the Series Q Cumulative Redeemable
Preferred Stock of Prologis (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 to Prologis’ Registration Statement on Form 8-A
filed June 2, 2011).
 
3.3  Articles of Merger of New Pumpkin Inc., a Maryland corporation, with and into Prologis, Inc., a Maryland corporation,
changing the name of “AMB Property Corporation” to “Prologis, Inc.”, as filed with the Stated Department of
Assessments and T axation of Maryland on June 2, 2011, and ef fective June 3, 2011 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
3.4  Articles of Amendment (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 8,
2012).
 
3.5  Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of the Operating Partnership (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.6 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
3.6  First Amendment to Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Prologis, L.P ., dated
February 27, 2014, (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February
27, 2014).
 
3.7  Second Amendment to the Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of the Limited Partnership of Prologis, L.P .,
dated October 7, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October
13, 2015).
 
3.8  Amended and Restated Certificate of Limited Partnership of the Operating Partnership (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.7 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
3.9  Articles Supplementary dated April 3, 2014, (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on April 3, 2014).
 
3.10  Eighth Amended and Restated Bylaws of Prologis, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’ Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on September 23, 2016).
 
3.11  Third Amendment to Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Prologis, L.P . (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 4, 2020).
 
3.12  Prologis, Inc. Articles of Amendment, dated May 4, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’ Current
Report Form 8-K filed on May 4, 2020).
   
4.1†  Description of Registrant’ s Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
   
4.2  Form of Certificate for Common Stock of Prologis (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’ Registration
Statement on Form S-4/A (No. 333-172741) filed April 12, 2011).
 
4.3  Form of Certificate for the Series Q Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock of Prologis (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Registration Statement on Form S-4/A (No. 333-172741) filed April 28, 2011).
 
4.4  Indenture, dated as of June 8, 2011, by and among the Operating Partnership, as issuer , Prologis, as guarantor , and
U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Registration Statement
on Form S-3 (No. 333-177112) filed September 30, 2011).
 
103
 
4.5  Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 15, 2013, among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P . and U.S. Bank National
Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed August 15, 2013).
 
4.6  Form of Sixth Supplemental Indenture among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., Elavon Financial Services Limited, UK
Branch, Elavon Financial Services Limited and U.S. Bank National Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1
to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed December 2, 2013).
 
4.7  Form of Seventh Supplemental Indenture among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., Elavon Financial Services Limited, UK
Branch, Elavon Financial Services Limited and U.S. Bank National Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1
to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed February 18, 2014).
 
4.8  Form of Eighth Supplemental Indenture among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., U.S. Bank National Association and Elavon
Financial Services DAC, UK Branch (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed
on June 6, 2017).
 
4.9  Indenture dated as of August 1, 2018 among Prologis Euro Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P . and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’ Registration Statement on Form 8-K/A filed
on August 1, 2018).
 
4.10  First Supplemental Indenture dated as of August 1, 2018 among Prologis Euro Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P ., U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee, transfer agent and security registrar and Elavon Financial Services DAC, UK Branch,
as paying agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Registration Statement on Form 8-K/A filed on
August 1, 2018).
 
4.11  Form of lndenture dated as of September 25, 2018 among Prologis Y en Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P . and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.9 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K/A filed on
September 24, 2018).
 
4.12  Form of First Supplemental Indenture dated as of September 25, 2018 among Prologis Y en Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P .,
U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee, transfer agent, paying agent and security registrar (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.10 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K/A filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.13  Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of March 26, 2019 among Prologis Y en Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P . and U.S.
Bank National Association as trustee, transfer agent, paying agent and security registrar (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on April 23, 2019).
   
4.14  Form of 2.750% Notes due 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed
August 15, 2013).
 
4.15  Form of 4.250% Notes due 2023 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed
August 15, 2013).
 
4.16  3.350% Notes due 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed
November 1, 2013).
 
4.17  Form of 3.000% Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed
December 2, 2013).
 
4.18  Form of 3.375% Notes due 2024 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed
February 18, 2014).
 
4.19  Form of 3.00% Notes due 2026 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on May 28, 2014).
 
4.20  Form of 1.375% Notes due 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on October 6, 2014).
 
4.21  Form of 1.375% Notes due 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 of Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed
May 12, 2015).
 
4.22  Form of 3.750% Notes due 2025 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 of Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed
October 30, 2015).
 
4.23  Form of Floating Rate Notes due 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K
filed on January 26, 2018).
 
104
 
4.24  Form of 2.250% Notes due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 6, 2017).
 
4.25  Form of Floating Rate Notes due 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K
filed on January 26, 2018).
 
4.26  Form of 3.875% Notes Due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 20, 2018).
 
4.27  Form of 4.375% Notes Due 2048 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 20, 2018).
 
4.28  Form of 1.875% Notes Due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on
July 31, 2018).
 
4.29  Form of 0.652% Notes due 2025 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K/A filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.30  Form of 0.972% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K/A filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.31  Form of 1.077% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K/A filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.32  Form of 1.470% Notes due 2038 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K/A filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.33  Form of 1.15% Notes due 2039 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 10-Q filed on
April 23, 2019).
   
4.34  Form of 0.250% Notes due 2027 9incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’ Registration Statement 8-A12B
filed on September 10, 2019).
   
4.35  Form of 0.625% Notes due 2031 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’ Registration Statement 8-A12B
filed on September 10, 2019).
   
4.36  Form of 1.500% Notes due 2049 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis’ Registration Statement 8-A12B
filed on September 10, 2019).
   
4.37  Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 3.375% Notes due 2024 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed February 18, 2014).
 
4.38  Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 3.00% Notes due 2026 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 28, 2014).
 
4.39  Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to 1.375% Notes due 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 6, 2014).
 
4.40  Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 1.375% Notes due 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 12, 2015).
 
4.41  Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 3.750% Notes due 2025 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 30, 2015).
 
4.42  Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to 2.250% Notes due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 6, 2017).
 
4.43  Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to Floating Rate Notes due 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on January 26, 2018.
 
4.44 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to 3.875% Notes Due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A filed on June 20, 2018).
 
4.45 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to 4.375% Notes Due 2048 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A filed on June 20, 2018).
 
105
 
4.46 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to 0.652% Notes due 2025 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.47 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to 0.972% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.48 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to 1.077% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.7 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A filed on September 24, 2018) .
 
4.49 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to 1.470% Notes due 2038 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A filed on September 24, 2018) .
 
4.50 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to 1.875% Notes Due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Registration Statement on Form 8-K/A filed on August 1, 2018).
 
4.51 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 1.15% Notes due 2039 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 10-Q filed in April 23, 2019).
 
4.52 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 0.250% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Registration Statement 8-A12B filed on September 10, 2019).
 
4.53 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 0.625% Notes due 2031 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Registration Statement 8-A12B filed on September 10, 2019).
 
4.54 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 1.500% Notes due 2049 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis’
Registration Statement 8-A12B filed on September 10, 2019).
 
4.55 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 0.375% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis
L.P.’s Registration Statement on Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.56 Form of 0.375% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis L.P .’s Registration Statement on
Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.57 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 1.000% Notes due 2035 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis
L.P.’s Registration Statement on Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.58 Form of 1.000% Notes due 2035 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis L.P .’s Registration Statement on
Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.59 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the Floating Rates Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to
Prologis L.P .’s Registration Statement on Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.60 Form of Floating Rate Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis L.P .’s Registration Statement
on Form 8-A12B filed on February 10, 2020).
 
4.61 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 3.250% Notes due 2026 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis
L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.62 Form of 3.250% Notes due 2026 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis L.P .’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.63 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 4.375% Notes due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis
L.P.’s Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.64 Form of 4.375% Notes due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis L.P .’s Current Report Form 8-K
filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.65 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 2.125% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis
L.P.’s Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.66 Form of 2.125% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis L.P .’s Current Report Form 8-K
filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.67 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 2.250% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.7 to Prologis
L.P.’s Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2020).
 
106
 
4.68 Form of 2.250% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to Prologis L.P .’s Current Report Form 8-K
filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.69 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 3.000% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.9 to Prologis
L.P.’s Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.70 Form of 3.000% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.10 to Prologis L.P .’s Current Report Form 8-K
filed on February 14, 2020).
 
4.71 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 0.589% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 23, 2020).
 
4.72 Form of 0.589% Notes due 2027 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2020).
 
4.73 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 0.850% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 23, 2020).
 
4.74 Form of 0.850% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2020).
 
4.75 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 1.003% Notes due 2032 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 23, 2020).
 
4.76 Form of 1.003% Notes due 2032 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2020).
 
4.77 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 1.222% Notes due 2035 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.7 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 23, 2020).
 
4.78 Form of 1.222% Notes due 2035 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2020).
 
4.79 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 1.600% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.9 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 23, 2020).
 
4.80 Form of 1.600% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.10 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 23, 2020).
 
4.81 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 1.250% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on August 19, 2020).
 
4.82 Form of 1.250% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on
August 19, 2020).
 
4.83 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the 2.125% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on August 19, 2020).
 
4.84 Form of 2.125% Notes due 2050 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on
August 19, 2020).
 
4.85 Form of Of ficers’ Certificate related to the Floating Rate Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on December 23, 2020).
 
4.86 Form of Floating Rate Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K
filed on December 23, 2020).
 
Other debt instruments are omitted in accordance with Item 601(b)(4)(iii)(A) of Registration S-K. Copies of such instruments will be
furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission upon request.
 
10.1  Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of ProLogis Fraser , L.P., dated as of August 4, 2004
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the T rust’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2004).
 
107
 
10.2  Fifteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Prologis 2, L.P ., (f/k/a AMB Property II, L.P .) dated
February 19, 2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to Prologis’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.3*  Amended and Restated 2002 Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to
Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 4, 2006  and also incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the
Operating Partnership’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 4, 2006).
 
10.4*  The Amended and Restated 2002 Stock Option and Incentive Plan of AMB Property Corporation and AMB Property , L.P.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 15, 2007  and also
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Operating Partnership’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 15,
2007).
 
10.5*  Prologis Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed
December 22, 2011).
 
10.6*  Prologis, Inc. 2016 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form
8-K filed on August 16, 2016).
 
10.7*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2016 Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2
to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 16, 2016).
 
10.8*  Form of Participation Points and L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 27, 2014).
 
10.9*  Second Amended and Restated Prologis Promote Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2014).
 
10.10*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Second Amended and Restated Prologis Promote Plan L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 18, 2014).
 
10.11*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (General) (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 to Prologis’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014).
 
10.12*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (L TIP Unit election)
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.27 to Prologis’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31,
2015).
 
10.13*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.5 to Prologis’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014).
 
10.14*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (Bonus exchange) (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to Prologis’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014).
 
10.15*  ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the T rust’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed June 2, 2006).
 
10.16*  First Amendment of the ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Trust’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2010).
 
10.17*  Second Amendment of the ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Trust’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 19, 2010).
 
10.18*  Third Amendment of the ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Trust’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2010).
 
10.19*  Form of Non-Qualified Share Option A ward T erms; The T rust 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.25 to the T rust’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.20*  Form of Restricted Share A ward T erms; ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.27 to the T rust’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.21*  Form of Performance Share A ward T erms; ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.26 to the T rust’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.22*  ProLogis 2000 Share Option Plan for Outside T rustees (as Amended and Restated Ef fective as of December 31, 2008)
(incorporated by reference to exhibit 10.13 to ProLogis’ Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008).
 
108
 
10.23*  ProLogis Deferred Fee Plan for T rustees (As Amended and Restated Ef fective as of May 14, 2010) (incorporated by
reference to exhibit 10.3 to ProLogis’ Form 8-K filed on May 19, 2010).
 
10.24*  Form of Indemnification Agreement between ProLogis and certain directors and executive of ficers (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
10.25*  Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement; Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012).
 
10.26*  Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on
Form 8-K filed May 8, 2012).
 
10.27*  Form of Director Deferred Stock Unit A ward terms (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’ Current Report
on Form 8-K filed May 8, 2012).
 
10.28*  Form of Change of Control and Noncompetition Agreement by and between Prologis, Inc. and its executive of ficers
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed August 16, 2013).
 
10.29*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (General form 2015) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.57 to Prologis’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.30*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (Bonus exchange) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’ Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2015).
 
10.31*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (General form 2016) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.48 to Prologis’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015).
 
10.32*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Exchange A ward Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.58 to Prologis’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.33*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan Equity Exchange Of fer LTIP Unit A ward Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.59 to Prologis’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.34*  Amended and Restated Prologis, Inc. 2011 Notional Account Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.60 to Prologis’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.35*  Amended and Restated Prologis, Inc. Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.61 to Prologis’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.36*  Second Amended and Restated Prologis 2005 Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.62 to Prologis’ Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.37*  Prologis, Inc. 2018 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K
filed on January 18, 2018).
 
10.38*  Prologis, Inc. Amended and Restated 2018 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on March 27, 2018).
 
10.39*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2018 Amendment to Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit A ward Agreements (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on March 27, 2018).
 
10.40*  Amended and Restated Director Deferred Stock Unit A ward T erms (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 7, 2018).
 
10.41  Form of T ime-Sharing Agreement for Hamid Moghadam (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current
Report on Form 10-Q filed on October 22, 2018).
 
10.42*  Prologis, Inc. Second Amended and Restated 2018 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.43*  Form of Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’ Current
Report Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.44*  Form of L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (Bonus Exchange) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Prologis’ Current
Report Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
109
 
10.45*  Form of L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (Omnibus) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Prologis’ Current Report
Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.46*  Form of RSU Agreement (Global) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed
on August 28, 2018).
 
10.47*  Form of RSU Agreement (L TIP Unit Election) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to Prologis’ Current Report Form
8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.48*  Form of NEO Retirement Eligibility W aiver (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-
K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.49  Term Loan Agreement dated as of August 18, 2016 among Prologis GK Holdings Y .K., as borrower , Prologis, Inc. and
Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, the banks listed on the signature pages thereof, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking
Corporation, as Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K
filed on August 22, 2016).
 
10.50  Guaranty of Payment dated as of August 18, 2016 among Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, and
Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent, for the banks that are from time to time parties to the
Term Loan Agreement dated as of August 18, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’ Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 22, 2016).
 
10.51  Letter Agreement dated February 3, 2017 by and between Prologis, Inc. and Hamid R. Moghadam (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 3, 2017).
 
10.52  Fifth Amended and Restated Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of February 16, 2017, among Prologis Marunouchi
Finance Investment Limited Partnership, as initial borrower , Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, the lenders
listed on the signature pages thereof, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 21, 2017).
 
10.53  Guaranty of Payment, date as of February 16, 2017, among Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, Sumitomo
Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent, for the banks that are from time to time parties to the Fifth Amend
and Restated Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of February 16, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to
Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 22, 2017).
 
10.54  Amended and Restated Senior T erm Loan Agreement dated as of May 4, 2017 among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P .,
various af filiates of Prologis, L.P ., various lenders and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K on May 8, 2017).
 
10.55  Second Amended and Restated Global Senior Credit Agreement, dated as of January 16, 2019, by and among Prologis,
Inc., Prologis, L.P ., various af filiates of Prologis, L.P ., various lenders and Bank of America, N.A., as Global
Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K on January 16,
2019).
 
10.56  Term Loan Agreement dated as of March 4, 2019 among Prologis GK Holdings Y .K., as borrower , Prologis, L.P ., as
guarantor , the lenders party thereto, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on March 6, 2019).
 
10.57  Guaranty of Payment dated as of March 4, 2019 between Prologis, L.P ., as guarantor , and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking
Corporation, as Administrative Agent, for the lenders that are from time to time parties to the T erm Loan Agreement
dated as of March 4, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on
March 6, 2019).
   
10.58  Amended and Restated Change in Control and Noncompetition Agreement, dated April 30, 2019, between Prologis, Inc.
and Hamid R. Moghadam (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report From 8-K filed on May
3, 2019).
   
10.59  Form of Retirement Eligibility W aiver Amendment for Hamid Moghadam (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on December 10, 2019).
   
10.60  Form of Retirement Eligibility W aiver Amendment for Named Executive Of ficers (other than Hamid Moghadam)
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on December 10, 2019).
   
10.61  Prologis, Inc. 2020 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form
8-K filed on May 4, 2020).
   
110
 
10.62  Sixth Amended and Restated Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of July 10, 2020, among Prologis Marunouchi
Finance Investment Limited Partnership, as initial borrower , Prologis, L.P ., as guarantor , the lenders listed on the
signature pages thereof, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K filed on July 14, 2020).
   
10.63  Guaranty of Payment, dated as of July 10, 2020, between Prologis, L.P ., as guarantor , and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking
Corporation, as Administrative Agent, for the banks that are from time to time parties to the Sixth Amended and
Restated Revolving Credit Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis' Current Report Form 8-K
filed on July 14, 2020).
   
10.64*  Form of First Amendment to Amended and Restated Prologis, Inc. 2011 Notional Account Deferred Compensation Plan
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
   
10.65*  Form of L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (Omnibus 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’ Current
Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
   
10.66*  Form of L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (Bonus Exchange 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
   
10.67*  Form of Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit A ward Agreement for Named Executive Of ficers (2020) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
   
10.68*  Form of Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (General 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to
Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
   
10.69*  Form of Deferred Compensation L TIP Unit A ward Agreement (2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to
Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
   
10.70*  Form of RSU Agreement (Global 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 to Prologis’ Current Report Form 8-K
filed on September 25, 2020).
   
10.71*  Form of RSU Agreement (Bonus Exchange 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 to Prologis’ Current Report
Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
   
10.72*  Form of RSU Agreement (L TIP Unit Election 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9 to Prologis’ Current Report
Form 8-K filed on September 25, 2020).
   
21.1†  Subsidiaries of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .
 
23.1†  Consent of KPMG LLP with respect to Prologis, Inc.
 
23.2†  Consent of KPMG LLP with respect to Prologis, L.P .
 
24.1†  Power of Attorney for Prologis, Inc. (included in signature page of this annual report).
 
24.2†  Power of Attorney for Prologis, L.P . (included in signature page of this annual report).
 
31.1†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer of Prologis, Inc.
 
31.2†  Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer of Prologis, Inc.
 
31.3†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer for Prologis, L.P .
 
31.4†  Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer for Prologis, L.P .
 
32.1†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer of Prologis, Inc., pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 
32.2†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer for Prologis, L.P ., pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 
99.1  Supplemental United States Federal Income T ax Considerations (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 20, 2016).
 
99.2  Blackout Notice provided to directors and executive of ficers of Prologis. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 to
Prologis’ Current Report on Form 8-K filed November 22, 2019).
 
111
 
101. INS†  Inline XBRL Instance Document - the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL
tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL Document.
 
101. SCH†  Inline XBRL T axonomy Extension Schema
 
101. CAL†  Inline XBRL T axonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase
 
101. DEF†  Inline XBRL T axonomy Extension Definition Linkbase
 
101. LAB†  Inline XBRL T axonomy Extension Label Linkbase
 
101. PRE†  Inline XBRL T axonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase
   
104  Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101).
 
* Management Contract or Compensatory Plan or Arrangement
† Filed herewith
a Prologis has omitted certain schedules and exhibits pursuant to Item 601(b)(2) of Regulation S-K and shall furnish
supplementally to the SEC copies of any of the omitted schedules and exhibits upon request by the SEC.
 
 
 
 
 
 
112
 
SIGNA TURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report
to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
PROLOGIS, INC.
   
By: /s/ Hamid R. Moghadam
  Hamid R. Moghadam
  Chief Executive Of ficer
 
Date: February 10, 2021
 
POWER OF A TTORNEY
 
KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that we, the undersigned of ficers and directors of Prologis, Inc., hereby severally
constitute Hamid R. Moghadam, Thomas S. Olinger and Edward S. Nekritz, and each of them singly , our true and lawful attorneys
with full power to them, and each of them singly , to sign for us and in our names in the capacities indicated below , the Form 10-K filed
herewith and any and all amendments to said Form 10-K, and generally to do all such things in our names and in our capacities as
officers and directors to enable Prologis, Inc. to comply with the provisions of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and all
requirements of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, hereby ratifying and confirming our signatures as they may be signed
by our said attorneys, or any of them, to said Form 10-K and any and all amendments thereto.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
 
Signature  Title  Date
     
/s/ Hamid R. Moghadam  Chairman of the Board and Chief
Executive Of ficer February 10, 2021
Hamid R. Moghadam   
     
/s/ Thomas S. Olinger  Chief Financial Of ficer  February 10, 2021
Thomas S. Olinger   
     
/s/ Lori A. Palazzolo  Managing Director and Chief
Accounting Of ficer February 10, 2021
Lori A. Palazzolo   
     
/s/ Cristina G. Bita  Director  February 10, 2021
Cristina G. Bita   
     
/s/ George L. Fotiades  Director  February 10, 2021
George L. Fotiades   
     
/s/ Lydia H. Kennard  Director  February 10, 2021
Lydia H. Kennard     
     
/s/ Irving F . Lyons III  Director  February 10, 2021
Irving F . Lyons III   
     
/s/ Avid Modjtabai  Director  February 10, 2021
Avid Modjtabai     
     
/s/ David P . O’Connor  Director  February 10, 2021
David P . O’Connor     
     
/s/ Olivier Piani  Director  February 10, 2021
Olivier Piani     
     
/s/ Jef frey L. Skelton  Director  February 10, 2021
Jeffrey L. Skelton     
     
/s/ Carl B. W ebb  Director  February 10, 2021
Carl B. W ebb     
     
/s/ William D. Zollars  Director  February 10, 2021
William D. Zollars     
113
 
 
SIGNA TURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report
to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
PROLOGIS, L.P .
By: Prologis, Inc., its general partner
   
By: /s/ Hamid R. Moghadam
  Hamid R. Moghadam
  Chief Executive Of ficer
 
Date: February 10, 2021
 
POWER OF A TTORNEY
 
KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS, that we, the undersigned of ficers and directors of Prologis, L.P ., hereby severally
constitute Hamid R. Moghadam, Thomas S. Olinger and Edward S. Nekritz, and each of them singly , our true and lawful attorneys
with full power to them, and each of them singly , to sign for us and in our names in the capacities indicated below , the Form 10-K filed
herewith and any and all amendments to said Form 10-K, and generally to do all such things in our names and in our capacities as
officers and directors to enable Prologis, L.P . to comply with the provisions of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and all
requirements of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, hereby ratifying and confirming our signatures as they may be signed
by our said attorneys, or any of them, to said Form 10-K and any and all amendments thereto.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
 
Signature  Title  Date
     
/s/ Hamid R. Moghadam  Chairman of the Board and Chief
Executive Of ficer February 10, 2021
Hamid R. Moghadam   
     
/s/ Thomas S. Olinger  Chief Financial Of ficer  February 10, 2021
Thomas S. Olinger   
     
/s/ Lori A. Palazzolo  Managing Director and Chief
Accounting Of ficer February 10, 2021
Lori A. Palazzolo   
     
/s/ Cristina G. Bita  Director  February 10, 2021
Cristina G. Bita   
     
/s/ George L. Fotiades  Director  February 10, 2021
George L. Fotiades   
     
/s/ Lydia H. Kennard  Director  February 10, 2021
Lydia H. Kennard     
     
/s/ Irving F . Lyons III  Director  February 10, 2021
Irving F . Lyons III   
     
/s/ Avid Modjtabai  Director  February 10, 2021
Avid Modjtabai     
     
/s/ David P . O’Connor  Director  February 10, 2021
David P . O’Connor     
     
/s/ Olivier Piani  Director  February 10, 2021
Olivier Piani     
     
/s/ Jef frey L. Skelton  Director  February 10, 2021
Jeffrey L. Skelton     
     
/s/ Carl B. W ebb  Director  February 10, 2021
Carl B. W ebb     
     
/s/ William D. Zollars  Director  February 10, 2021
William D. Zollars     
 
114
